 Music fan Rep. Ed Markey on the new Federal Communications Commission: "During the Reagan administration, the FCC's style most often reflected that of the hard-rock group the Clash."  He'd prefer "the Modern Jazz Quartet, bringing with it an appreciation of tradition accompanied by both creativity and innovation."  We prefer the Beasty Boys.  Scientists have spent more than two decades and $100 million readying a new generation of genetically engineered food products for market.  But their first entree -- milk -- is becoming a marketer's nightmare.  Four big drug companies, led by Monsanto Co., plan to introduce separate versions next year of a genetically engineered hormone that boosts cows' milk production by as much as 25%.  The companies say their additive, bovine growth hormone, or BGH, is safe, and they have a stable of scientific and medical specialists to back their claim.  The Food and Drug Administration is expected to approve BGH early next year.  But it may already be too late.  Some of the nation's biggest milk processors and distributors, fearing a consumer backlash, are hastily backpedaling from BGH. Kraft USA, a subsidiary of Philip Morris Cos., and Borden Inc. say they won't handle milk products from test cow herds inoculated with the additive.  The nation's largest dairy cooperative, Associated Milk Producers Inc., says its 21,000 farmer members won't use the synthetic hormone on their cows.  Ben & Jerry's Homemade Inc., the Vermont ice cream maker, has gone even further.  The company is lobbying against the hormones with anti-BGH symbols imprinted on millions of its ice cream cartons.  "Consumers are obviously nervous about this substance," says a Ben & Jerry's spokesman.  But perhaps most damaging was the announcement last month that four of the nation's largest grocery chains won't be handling milk products from cows that have received BGH in tests.  The four chains are Safeway Stores Inc., Kroger Co., Stop & Shop Cos. and Vons Cos.  Supermarket officials complain that the drug makers are dumping onto the retailers responsibility for allaying consumers' fears about BGH.  The FDA is testing BGH on some 11,000 cows around the country.  Milk from the cows, which can't be distinguished from regular milk, is being sold for general consumption.  "We don't want our customers or stores being used as guinea pigs," a Safeway spokesman says, though he adds that Safeway, like the other chains, has no immediate plans to promote its position with customers.  An official of Kroger, which has 1,200 stores in 32 states, says: "If they think it's safe, let them step up to the plate and defend it."  That poses an unusually sticky problem for the makers of BGH, which include Upjohn Co., Eli Lilly & Co. and American Cyanamid Co. Market studies show that just mentioning hormone additives in milk repels many consumers.  Worse, consumers are especially wary of pro-BGH messages from drug and chemical companies.  A 1986 National Dairy Board study of consumer attitudes toward BGH warns that consumers view those companies as "the archvillains of the food world."  "This is going to be a horrible problem," says George Rice, president of GDR Enterprises, a Park Ridge, Ill., marketing consulting firm whose clients include big milk users like International Dairy Queen Inc. Mr. Rice recalls watching a recent television news report on BGH with several clients and their wives.  "There was instant sympathy against the drug companies and for the critics," he says.  Although BGH has become a hot political issue in dairy states such as Wisconsin, Vermont and Minnesota, drug company officials insist they don't see any spreading consumer backlash over the additive.  "We don't see consumers rising up en masse and saying, 'We don't want this,'" says James Brezovec, marketing director for Monsanto's dairy products operation.  Mr. Brezovec concedes that market studies do show consumers to be "a bit anxious" over biotechnology, but he says those fears will be erased by the FDA's expected approval of BGH and testimonials from scientific and medical specialists.  The four drug companies anticipate that BGH initially will bring in some $500 million in annual sales.  Even more important is the fact that milk is the first in a long line of genetically altered food products, from leaner chickens to larger squash, that are planned for market.  Monsanto alone already has invested more than $1 billion in biotechnology.  "With hindsight," says Mr. Rice, the marketer, "milk was an awfully poor place to make a beachhead for this technology."  The drug companies face an unusually complicated problem marketing BGH.  In effect, they must sell the synthetic hormone twice: to farmers, who worry that a flood of new milk into a saturated market will cause further economic damage to the dairy industry; and to consumers, who are leery of using synthetic hormones to produce milk, a product long promoted for its purity.  "There are a lot of strikes against the drug companies in this," says Jack Trout, who heads Trout & Ries, a Greenwich, Conn., marketing strategy firm.  Mr. Trout's solution: Sell BGH abroad first.  "Remember, 40% of the world is starving," he says.  "Exporting this stuff puts you on the side of the angels."  If the drug companies must sell BGH here first, Mr. Trout suggests that they avoid any reference to genetic engineering.  The term automatically triggers a negative consumer reaction, he says.  "The word issue is so critical in the public-relations battle," Mr. Trout says.  So far, however, the makers of BGH have simply sidestepped consumers in their sales pitch for the synthetic hormone.  Instead, they are concentrating on scientific and medical experts who they hope will become surrogates in the battle for consumers' acceptance of BGH.  For example, drug company officials have been playing up BGH to the leadership of the American Medical Association for two years, though so far the group hasn't taken a stand.  In its 1988 annual report, the Animal Health Institute, a lobbying group for the drug industry, says it distributed fliers on the additive to more than 16,000 doctors and other health professionals.  Consumer groups got just 50 fliers.  "The marketing strategy is to get the facts to those whom the consumer will look to for advice," says Monsanto's Mr. Brezovec.  Adds Stephen White, American Cyanamid's manager for BGH: "We have to rely on science and the FDA to ultimately win the day."  The drug companies apparently have found a sympathetic ear at the FDA. Agency officials have testified before Congress that milk from cows injected with BGH is safe for humans and animals and is "indistinguishable from ordinary milk."  The FDA has cleared the sale of milk from cows getting BGH on a test basis and will decide early next year whether the additive can be sold commercially to dairy farmers.  In its annual report, the Animal Health Institute boasts that Richard Teske and Richard Talbot, both veterinarians and senior officials at the FDA's Center for Veterinary Medicine, gave speeches to dairy groups last year on the safety of BGH.  Both officials are involved in the FDA's review of the additive.  Dr. Teske says it's unusual for FDA officials to speak publicly on products under review by the agency, but the speeches were given to "clear up criticism {of BGH} based on lack of information about FDA's review process."  The BGH makers gave approval for the speeches, he said.  But the companies' strategy backfired at Kraft, where the drug makers have been pitching BGH's merits for two years to Kraft's research department.  Kraft's sensitivity to BGH's marketing problems overrode any scientific merits.  "This is a market associated with small children," says Gregory Stroh, Kraft USA's vice president in charge of refrigerated products.  "It's very sensitive."  Not only has Kraft declared that it will avoid milk from cows involved in BGH tests, but like the other companies resisting the additive, Mr. Stroh says Kraft may shun BGH even if it is cleared by the FDA.  "We're going to follow our consumers' concerns on this," Mr. Stroh says.  Morgan Grenfell Group PLC, a major British merchant bank, said pretax profit rose 50% in the first half, boosted by growth in its domestic and international corporate finance business.  Profits also were helped by the fact that Morgan Grenfell closed its loss-ridden U.K. securities operations last year.  Those operations resulted in a net loss of #8 million ($5.1 million) in the first half of 1988.  Pretax profit in the 1989 first half totaled #32.8 million, up from #21.9 million a year earlier.  "Prospects for the second half of the year are, to date, promising despite the uncertain economic environment in which we operate," said Sir Peter Carey, Morgan Grenfell's chairman, in a statement.  Sir Peter added that the bank's asset-managment group "continued to add new business and products."  Domestic and international banking activities also "developed well," he said.  C.J. Lawrence, Morgan Grenfell Inc., the bank's U.S. brokerage subsidiary, was profitable, Sir Peter added.  However, Morgan Grenfell doesn't give a detailed breakdown of its earnings.  The bank said some limited trading in fixed-income instruments in the United Kingdom continued in the first half.  This area, which had been incurring losses, has since been closed.  Morgan Grenfell wouldn't disclose the extent of the losses or the cost of closing the operation.  Concerning its corporate finance business, Finance Director David Ewart said Morgan Grenfell advised on 13 domestic bids in the first half, with a total value of 4.4 billion pounds.  Morgan Grenfell was the main adviser to Minorco S.A., which gained a majority stake in Consolidated Gold Fields PLC, but failed to acquire the company because its 3.5 billion-pound bid was thwarted by U.S. legal action.  The results were in line with expectations.  Steven Thorn, an analyst at Phillips & Drew Ltd., said the results were "encouraging" for Morgan Grenfell, which had two years of declining profits as a result of losses in its securities business.  Atari Corp. said it will begin selling a computer smaller than a videocassette tape in the U.S. for $399.95.  The computer, with a standard typewriter-style keyboard, has been on the European market for about two months and has been selling briskly, the company said.  The maker of computers and video games said the one-pound personal computer will be delivered soon to selected retailers in the U.S.  Arthur E. Parsons was named to the additional posts of chairman and chief executive officer of Dialcom Inc., a unit of this communication and information-services company.  Mr. Parsons, who was president and chief operating officer of Dialcom, succeeds John Morris, who is joining the parent company to plan the intended acquisition of McDonnell Douglas Corp.'s Tymnet division.  International Business Machines Corp. decided to postpone a long-awaited new entry in the booming workstation market, giving its competitors a clear field for the rest of the year, sources said.  IBM had been widely expected to introduce the new models next month.  But sources said the company decided to delay the new line until early next year to have more software available.  The apparent delay is a short-term setback to IBM's effort to pick up momentum in the fastest-growing segment of the computer industry, where it is struggling against competition from Sun Microsystems Inc., Digital Equipment Corp. and Hewlett-Packard Co.  The market for workstations -- powerful computers used by engineers, scientists and financial analysts -- is growing about 40% a year and is expected to reach $6.8 billion this year, according to Framingham, Mass.-based market researcher International Data Corp.  An IBM spokesman read a statement saying that the company "is considering a number of announcement alternatives, including later this year and the first quarter of next year.  Any speculation on specific announcement dates at this time would be misleading."  Sources said that IBM had planned to make the announcement Oct. 17 and had gone so far as to rent hotel suites for that date.  Its competitors had long planned for IBM's announcment at that time.  IBM's competitors are expected to benefit from a delay of even a few months.  "Digital is going to have more than 200 software packages running on its workstations by the time IBM is shipping," said Marc G. Schulman, an analyst with UBS Securities Inc. Abundant software packages are critical to the success of a computer line.  Depending on who's counting, either Sun or Hewlett-Packard hold the lead in this competitive business.  The focus of most of the attention today is in the market for machines based on the Unix software operating system.  Mr. Schulman called Digital's DECstation line "the absolute leader in price performance" in that market.  But Mr. Schulman and other analysts expect that IBM will price its new line aggressively in a bid to make up for lost time in the Unix-based workstation market.  IBM's current workstation product, the RT, has captured only a tiny share, says International Data's David Card.  William J. Filip, IBM's assistant general manager of personal systems, said last night that "we have not and had not selected a final date for an announcement.  At some point, we will pull the plug and proceed to an announcement.  But we haven't made that call yet."  He said that IBM is continuing work on software and endorsements of the new line.  But he declined comment on pricing.  "We intend to be competitive in this fast-moving marketplace," he said.  ---  Paul B. Carroll contributed to this article.  Whitman Corp. said it completed its previously disclosed purchase for about $140 million of Grand Metropolitan PLC's Van de Kamp's Frozen Seafoods division.  Van de Kamp's, with annual sales of "more than $100 million," will become part of Whitman's specialty-foods subsidiary.  Whitman is a consumer-goods and services concern; Grand Met PLC is the British food-and-drink company that last year purchased Pillsbury Co., owner of Van de Kamp's.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  Johnston Coca-Cola Bottling Group Inc. -- $300 million of notes in a two-part offering.  One part consists of $100 million of 10 1/4% senior notes due Sept. 15, 1999, priced at par and rated Ba-2 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and triple-B-minus by Standard & Poor's Corp.  The other part consists of $200 million of 11 3/8% subordinated notes due Sept. 15, 2001, priced at par and rated single-B-1 by Moody's and double-B-plus by S&P.  Both parts of the issue will be sold through Salomon Brothers Inc.  Both issues are non-callable until Sept. 15, 1994.  Price Communications Corp. -- $50 million of 10% convertible senior subordinated debentures due Sept. 15, 2004, priced at par.  The debentures are convertible into common at $8.80 a share, representing a 30.37% conversion premium over yesterday's closing price.  Rated Caa by Moody's and triple-C by S&P, the issue will be sold through Dillon Read & Co.  The issue is non-callable for five years.  A sinking fund is scheduled to begin in 1999 that will retire 75% of the issue before maturity.  Associates Corp. of North America -- $200 million of 8 5/8% notes, due Nov. 15, 1994, won in competitive bidding by Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. and reoffered at 99.835 to yield 8.66%.  Rated double-A-3 by Moody's Investors Service Inc. and double-A-minus by Standard & Poor's Corp., the non-callable issue was priced 67 basis points above the Treasury's five-year note.  Xerox Credit Corp. -- $150 million of 8 3/4% notes due Sept. 15, 1993, priced at 99.725 to yield 8.832%.  The issue was priced 80 basis points above the Treasury's four-year note.  Rated single-A-2 by Moody's and single-A-plus by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Salomon Brothers Inc.  @ MUNICIPALS  Port Authority of New York and New Jersey -- $100 million of consolidated bonds, 65th Series, due 2004-2010 and 2024, apparently won by a PaineWebber Inc. group.  The bonds, rated single-A-1/double-A-minus, were priced for reoffering to yield from 7% in 2004 to 7.25% in 2024.  The term bonds have a 7% coupon and are priced to yield 7.25% in 2024.  Interest on the bonds isn't subject to the federal alternative minimum tax.  Port Authority of New York and New Jersey -- $100 million of consolidated bonds, 66th Series, due 2004-2010 and 2024, apparently won by a Prudential-Bache Capital Funding group.  The bonds, rated single-A-1/double-A-minus, were priced for reoffering to yield from 7.25% in 2004 and 2005 to 7.49% in 2024.  There are $81 million of 7 1/4% term bonds due 2024 priced at 97 to yield 7.49%.  Interest on the bonds will be treated as a preference item in calculating the federal alternative minimum tax.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. -- $500 million of Remic mortgage securities offered in 12 classes by Prudential-Bache Securites Inc.  The offering, Series 92, backed by Freddie Mac 9 1/2% securities, brings Freddie Mac's 1989 Remic volume to $26.9 billion and its total issuance to $40.9 billion since the program began in February 1988.  For classes on which details were available from the underwriter, yields range from 9.12%, or 95 basis points above the rate on four-year Treasury securities, to 10.38%, or 215 basis points above 20-year Treasurys.  The collateral has a weighted average remaining term to maturity of 29.6 years.  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $475 million of Remic mortgage securities offered in nine classes by Morgan Stanley & Co.  The offering, Series 1989-67, backed by Fannie Mae 9 1/2% securities, brings Fannie Mae's 1989 Remic issuance to $24.4 billion and its total volume to $36.5 billion since the program began in April 1987.  No pricing details were available from the underwriter.  @ OTHER  Turkey -- $832.2 million of zero-coupon government trust certificates due from Nov. 15, 1989, to Nov. 15, 2013, priced to yield from 8.30% to 8.71%.  Proceeds of about $403 million will be used by Turkey to repay military loans made under a U.S. government program.  The zero-coupon certificates were priced at spreads from 29 basis points above the comparable Treasury zero-coupon security, for certificates maturing from 2010 to 2013, to 35 basis points above the comparable Treasury zero-coupon security for certificates due from May 15, 1990, to Nov. 15, 1990.  The certificates are rated triple-A by Moody's and S&P.  @ EUROBONDS  Exxon Capital Corp. (U.S. parent) -- $250 million of 8 1/2% Eurobonds due Sept. 29, 1994, priced at 99.80 to yield 8.55%, via Credit Suisse First Boston.  Fees 0.325.  Vereins & Westbank Internationale S.A. (West German parent) -- 75 million Canadian dollars of 11 1/8% Eurobonds due Oct. 11, 1991, priced at 101.625 to yield 10.83%, less full fees, via Bankers Trust International Ltd. Fees 1 1/8.  Volkswagen International Finance (West German parent) -- 150 billion lire of 12 1/2% Eurobonds due Oct. 12, 1994, priced at 101.875 to yield 12.5% less full fees, via Credito Italiano.  Bankers Trust International joint lead.  Fees 1 7/8.  Ideal Basic Industries Inc. said a federal court in Muskogee, Okla., has entered a judgment of $14 million against the cement maker in a malicious prosecution case brought by four former employees.  Ideal said it has filed a motion asking the judge to overturn the judgment.  The company said it believes the case wasn't appropriate for a jury trial.  If that motion isn't granted, the company plans to appeal the ruling, a company spokesman said.  The plaintiffs filed their suit after the company dropped a case alleging that the four union employees had conspired to file false workers compensation claims and had conspired to commit acts of sabotage in an attempt to increase the union's bargaining power.  McCown DeLeeuw & Co., a private venture banking firm, said it acquired Graphic Arts Center.  It didn't disclose a price.  Graphic Arts was previously owned by Continental Graphics Holdings Inc. of Los Angeles, which went private late last year.  Graphic Arts, based in Portland, Ore., specializes in printing annual reports, advertising literature and upscale catalogs.  It employs about 600 workers and has annual sales of about $110 million.  Unicorp Canada Corp. said it shelved a previously reported plan to buy Lincoln Savings Bank from its U.S. subsidiary because of uncertainty surrounding recent U.S. thrift legislation.  Unicorp said it also called off a related special $4.50-a-share payment to minority holders of the unit, 74%-owned Unicorp American Corp., but still plans to liquidate the New York City-based unit's real-estate assets.  The portfolio had a 1988 book value of about $240 million, including mortgages and accounts receivable, the company said.  Unicorp Canada, based in Toronto, controls operations in the gas utility, merchant banking and financial-services industries.  Unicorp said it would reassess the acquisition proposal in December when it is hoped the new legislation will have been clarified.  Unicorp American's shareholders reacted negatively to the news.  Yesterday, in composite trading on the American Stock Exchange, its stock closed at $3.375, off 75 cents.  In Toronto, Unicorp Canada's Class A common closed at $6.875, down 12.5 cents, on volume of 4,584 shares.  James Leech, president of Unicorp Canada, said the American unit's "major asset and major source of cash flow is the bank and it will concentrate on that."  He said the U.S. real-estate portfolio is in a "soft market" and some pieces are non-income producing.  When the liquidation is completed, Unicorp American's sole asset will be a 100% interest in New York City-based Lincoln Savings, Mr. Leech said.  He added that the value of the bank had been enhanced by the new thrift legislation.  Unicorp Canada said it will provide the American unit with a $25 million line of credit to enhance its working capital during the liquidation.  It said the unit isn't expected to declare any further cash dividends on its common shares for the foreseeable future.  Recently, Unicorp American declared a 7.5-cents-a-share quarterly dividend, which will be paid Sept. 30 to stock of record today.  Ford Motor Co. said it plans to triple its North American heavy-truck expenditures over the next five years and move some production from Brazil where heavy inflation greatly increased costs.  Ford declined to specify how much it will spend in the five years.  But Kenneth F. Smith, Ford's heavy-truck operations manager, said the company will "have modernized or replaced every product in the Ford heavy-truck line."  Ford said it will move some production of its Cargo line of medium and heavy-duty trucks from Brazil to Ford's Kentucky Truck plant in Louisville, Ky.  It will mark the first time Ford has built that truck model in the U.S.  A Ford spokesman said it isn't clear whether the addition of the Cargo truck will require an expansion of the Kentucky Truck plant.  Ford officials said production of the Cargo line is expected to begin in the fourth quarter of 1990.  Analysts said the decision to significantly increase heavy-truck expenditures is crucial for Ford, which has lagged new product introductions by competing heavy-truck makers.  "Ford has spent a lot of time fine-tuning its existing products while companies like Paccar and Freightliner have continuously brought out new models," said William J. Linden, vice president of Martin Labbe Associates, an Ormond Beach, Fla., heavy-truck consulting firm.  "Now it's Ford's turn to step forward with new products to keep pace."  Ford's Mr. Smith said the company is working on a new gas engine with electronic port fuel injection, an expanded line of diesel engines with electronic controls, and new Class 8 heavy-duty truck tractors, among other projects.  Noxso Corp. said it submitted to the Energy Department's Clean Coal Technology Program a proposal, along with the MK-Ferguson Co. unit of Morrison Knudsen Corp., W.R. Grace & Co. and Ohio Edison Co., to co-fund a $66 million commercial demonstration of the Noxso pollution-control process.  The team would build and operate a simultaneous flue-gas treatment facility at Ohio Edison's Niles Power Plant in northeastern Ohio.  If funded, the two-year demonstration will provide data on the elimination of two pollutants that contribute to acid rain.  The companies ask that the Energy Department fund 50%, or $33 million, of the total cost of this proposal, while Noxso and the other three companies would provide $25 million.  Additional financial support is being provided by the Ohio Coal Development Office, the Electric Power Research Institute, the Gas Research Institute, and East Ohio Gas Co.  It's make-or-break time for Volkswagen of America.  After years of dismal U.S. car sales, the West German auto maker is bracing to relaunch its franchise and convince dealers and car buyers it's alive and ready for the '90s.  Included in the plan are new management, sportier cars and a new ad campaign.  Its new pitch, created by DDB Needham Worldwide, harkens back to its 1960s heyday with a desperate plea: "It's time to think about Volkswagen again."  It won't be easy whipping up that kind of nostalgic enthusiasm.  The car maker, whose U.S. sales plummeted to just 1.5% of the market last year after peaking at 7% in 1970, is only a marginal player in the auto industry here.  This year's first-half sales plunged 25% below a year earlier, making the outlook even bleaker.  It's still No. 1 in Europe, but Americans just don't rate Volkswagens the way their European counterparts do.  "We should be getting more consideration than we have been," says Bill Gelgota, Volkswagen's new director of marketing.  "It's been a frustration of ours.  We're saying, 'Hey, Volkswagen is out there making cars that you should consider.  You've got to see us and drive us to believe it.'"  The company's new marketing strategy spotlights its brand-new, un-Volkswagenlike Corrado model.  It's not a boxy or squat car out of the traditional Volkswagen mold; instead, the sporty Corrado is a sleek, streamlined coupe.  For the first time, Volkswagen can tout a model equipped with power windows, power door locks and air conditioning as standard features.  Previously, Volkswagen's no-frills cars only offered those amenities as options.  This is the first Volkswagen model ever to have a tilt steering wheel.  With the new ad campaign, meanwhile, DDB Needham, a unit of Omnicom Group, makes a none-too-veiled attempt to bring back the cachet that Volkswagen had in the 1960s as a cutting-edge, unconventional car maker for nonconformists.  "It takes a lot of guts to call a Volkswagen a sports car" a new print ad wryly suggests.  The ad boasts, among other things, that the Corrado's top track-speed of 140 miles per hour is higher than that of a Porsche 944.  A television spot makes an even more blatant attempt to bring back the good old days with footage from an old black-and-white ad introducing the Karmann Ghia, which it mixes with fresh shots of the Corrado.  "It's 1955, Volkswagen makes a distinctly European sports car . . .  And it's cute," the announcer says.  As the Corrado is wheeled out, the announcer says: "It's 1990, Volkswagen makes a distinctly European sports car . . .  And it's not cute.  At $17,900, it's time to think about Volkswagen again."  The TV and print ads break next month.  Serious questions remain, however, as to whether Volkswagen can successfully convince consumers to put it on the short list along with BMW and Mercedes -- or even Toyota's Celica or Nissan's 240SX -- when shopping for a sports car.  Executives involved with the new campaign acknowledge it will take time, adding that the campaign is as much an image-building one as it is a car-selling effort.  But they see the marketplace as favorable for a Volkswagen renaissance.  "Values are changing in the U.S.," says John Bernbach, president of DDB Needham, the agency which has serviced the account since 1959.  "There's an anti-yuppie backlash going on.  A real backlash against conspicuous consumption," he says.  Americans want a stylish car and quality German engineering, he adds, but many are ever more skeptical of some cars' steep price tags.  The lower-priced Corrado, Mr. Bernbach says, will benefit from a "return to traditional, mainstream values" in which consumers are more concerned about what they get for the money they spend.  Mr. Gelgota says faulty media planning in the past was in part responsible for the company's inability to communicate its message.  The car maker often came out with blitz of commercials for a couple of weeks, he says, but then stopped advertising for a long period.  This time, Volkswagen is committed to run a heavy media plan for several months.  It hopes to reach a slightly more affluent and better-educated crowd by advertising primarily on TV and radio news programs.  According to Advertising Age, Volkswagen spent $167 million advertising its cars in the U.S. in 1987.  ---  Ad Notes. . . .   NEW ACCOUNTS: Ralston-Purina Co., St. Louis, awarded a new product assignment for its grocery-products division to Levine, Huntley, Schmidt & Beaver, New York. . . .  Vintwood International, Huntington, N.Y., awarded its $3 million to $5 million Cella Wines ad account to Korey, Kay & Partners, New York. . . .  The U.S. Mint named Grey Advertising, New York, to handle its $3 million silver Eisenhower commemorative coin account.  The junk bond market, which has ballooned to $200 billion in less than a decade, is caught in its worst shakeout yet.  The damage goes well beyond the plunge in junk bond prices, which continued yesterday as many bonds fell another $10 for each $1,000 face amount.  Institutional investors say liquidity, or the ability to buy and sell bonds in a market, has temporarily dried up for hundreds of junk bond issues.  Just about all of the Wall Street securities firms active in the market aren't making bids for junk bonds they previously sold to investors, money managers say.  More than ever, nervous investors are backpedaling from junk bonds they think are too risky -- like those of Interco, Southland Corp. and, particularly, units of Campeau Corp., the real estate and retailing giant whose cash squeeze set off the turmoil this week in the junk market.  Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., by far the biggest underwriter of junk bonds, yesterday promised to upgrade the junk bonds it brings to market.  Speaking at a conference attended by many large institutional junk bond buyers, Joseph C. Bencivenga, Drexel senior vice president and head of junk bond research, said, "You guys don't want it any more, and you can't be force fed something you're not hungry for."  Mr. Bencivenga said the record spreads in junk bond yields over Treasury issues showed junk buyers were balking at buying inferior-quality offerings.  Despite signs of continued growth for the economy and a one percentage-point drop in interest rates this year, "the junk bond market is going through a difficult shakeout," said an official at Salomon Brothers Inc.  "Some of the most publicized {junk bond} deals done by the most sophisticated people have collapsed."  And never was the contrast between "good" junk and "bad" junk more striking than it is today.  "Tiering is a new buzzword," said David Feinman, a Drexel trader.  In a market notorious for its big risks and, recently, its big busts, money managers, traders and underwriters of junk bonds are shaken.  "People with aggressive accounts are getting hurt," said Amy Minella, a manager of junk bonds for closely held Deltec Securities Corp. "People with conservative accounts are doing just fine.  Unfortunately, much of the market hasn't performed well the past two months.  People got hurt so much they don't want to take a chance anymore."  Among the very hardest-hit offerings are Campeau's Allied Stores Corp. and Federated Department Stores Inc. bonds, which have tumbled as much as 70 points, or $500 for each $1,000 face amount, this year.  The junk market has been unsettled for the past seven months, as junk bonds underperformed most investment-grade issues.  Ms. Minella of Deltec points out that thrift institutions, which own an estimated 14% of junk bonds outstanding, are being required by the government to phase out their junk bond holdings.  "That has created considerable selling pressure," she said.  In addition, mutual funds and other investors have sold poorly performing junk bonds recently to make their portfolios look more secure and to claim tax benefits from losses.  "We've had panics before, and this one will right itself out," she said.  But in the meantime, investors have become extremely sensitive to the differences in risk among various junk bond issues.  Such differences have become pronounced during the past month.  For instance, FMC Corp.'s $220 million of 12 1/4% bonds due 1998, which are perceived as relatively safe securities, have declined modestly to a price of 105 from 106 7/8 in mid-August.  But Southland's $350 million of 15 3/4% bonds due 1997 have plummeted to 60 from 85 1/2 a month ago.  Among other weak issues, SCI TV's $100 million of 16 1/2% bonds due 1997 have tumbled to a price of 27 from 42 less than a month ago.  Even so, some junk bond specialists remain optimistic.  "There's enormous value in the market right now," said Mr. Feinman of Drexel.  "High-yield bonds should outperform equities at this point."  But underwriters are having a hard time convincing investors.  First Boston Corp., for example, was forced to pull a nearly $475 million offering by Ohio Mattress Co. after it couldn't find sufficient buyers for the bonds.  Referring to the failed Ohio Mattress offering, Drexel's Mr. Bencivenga said, "You don't have to look too far to find out that it can be complicated and treacherous to bring high-yield bonds to the marketplace today.  We at Drexel are undertaking a very hard look at that, and trying to up our standards dramatically."  Despite the rough times in the junk bond market, many investors are far from throwing in the towel.  "The problems aren't being caused by anything in the economy," says Ms. Minella of Deltec.  "The deals cratering today were bad to begin with.  But the pendulum is moving.  There are fewer bad deals today, because buyers are saying forget it.  Junk bonds have a place in a bond portfolio, and over time you should be able to make 13 1/2% a year."  --- James A. White contributed to this article.  McKesson Corp. has hung out the for-hire sign after its chief executive officer suddenly resigned last week, and the new chief will have to pursue a changed game plan.  Under Thomas W. Field, the former chief executive who quit because of unexplained differences over management philosophy and McKesson's future, the strategy was to sell off the company's non-drug businesses and to grab market share for its drug-distribution operations through acquisitions.  The plan was largely devised by Mr. Field's predecessor, Neil E. Harlan, who has returned to become interim chief executive and chairman.  But now, McKesson must find new ways to expand its drug business.  The Federal Trade Commission put a damper on the buy-market-share strategy last year when it foiled McKesson's attempt to acquire Alco Health Services Corp. of Valley Forge, Pa., on antitrust grounds.  "The biggest issue is where it is going" in its drug business, says analyst Paul Farrel of Goldman Sachs & Co.  "The FTC has basically told them it will be tough to grow through acquisition."  The new helmsman also must decide whether to sell the troublesome PCS Inc. subsidiary and must carry out the company's strategy of expanding, rather than selling, the company's remaining non-drug businesses -- auto-products and bottled-water interests.  And the management turnover comes at a time when McKesson's short-term results aren't rosy.  Net earnings rose only 3.8% to $24 million in the first quarter ended June 30.  Fiscal second-quarter earnings will be hit, says 68-year-old Mr. Harlan, by several one-time charges: severance pay for an executive, investments in bottled-water marketing and spending to get the PCS unit, which processes drug claims, into the Medicare-claims processing business.  Still, Mr. Harlan says he agrees with analysts' estimates that net will climb about 10% on a 10% rise in sales for the quarter.  Mr. Harlan says the company should meet its corporate goals this fiscal year: 10% to 12% profit growth, a 40% debt ratio and a 15% return on equity for fiscal 1990.  McKesson earned $100.6 million on $7.05 billion on sales in the year ended March 31.  The strong financial position will give the company potential to "take advantage of any acquisition opportunity."  The company has earmarked $200 million to build up its drug-distribution centers over five years.  Those opportunities won't include mammoth deals like the attempted $508 million bid for Alco Health, McKesson says.  Acquisitions in drugs -- McKesson is evaluating several now -- will be smaller regional companies, says Rex Malson, executive vice president of operations.  Instead, McKesson's expansion push will be in its Armor All and bottled-water divisions.  The units have been a fat cash cow for the company, contributing 42% of the company's operating profit last year on only 7% of its revenue.  McKesson wants to milk more profits by grabbing markets for other auto-care products -- things like lubricants and cleaners -- and to become the first bottled-water vendor to distribute nationally.  The company is shopping for small auto-product companies and plans to invade the New York market for its seltzer water in 1991 after expanding in Texas and Florida.  Drug distribution, though, will remain a mainstay.  The McKesson Drug unit now accounts for 82% of McKesson's revenue and 56% of operating profit.  Ironically, McKesson nearly ditched its drug divisions in the 1970s.  Founded in 1833 to supply pharmaceuticals to clipper ships docked in Manhattan, McKesson evolved into a food, chemical and drug conglomerate when it merged with Foremost Dairies Inc. to become Foremost-McKesson Inc. in 1967.  When Mr. Harlan joined the company in 1974, the company's drug business was chronically unprofitable.  That all changed in 1983, when the Federal Trade Commission rescinded an earlier ruling preventing McKesson from buying drug firms, a ruling instated when Foremost acquired McKesson in 1967.  Mr. Field joined in the middle of a wave of restructuring that saw the company unload most of its nondistribution units while launching a barrage of acquisitions of drug distributors, health-and-beauty-aid concerns and software companies. (The company dropped the Foremost name in 1983.)  Now that the acquisition pace in drugs has slowed, the new chief must compete with other mammoth distribution firms using a method that Mr. Harlan used to beat rivals in the 1980s: technology.  McKesson executives have already laid out the plan.  The company has just introduced point-of-sales systems for drugstores, a technology in which cash registers like the ones now used in grocery stores send order information automatically to McKesson's automated warehouses.  The system helps McKesson gain market share, because drugstores employing it will buy from McKesson.  Another tack: McKesson is tying thousands of independent druggists into its computer network to provide them with the same high-volume, low-cost advantages that the drugstore chains enjoy.  McKesson has an edge in computerization over competitors such as Alco, Foxmeyer Corp. and Bergen Brunswig Corp., analysts say.  And its size means it can provide distribution and computer services more cheaply than competitors.  What's more, analysts say, some of McKesson's rivals have business troubles or are debt-ridden from leveraged buy-outs, making it hard for them to keep pace with McKesson in technology investments.  The new chief executive also faces a piece of unfinished business: what to do with PCS, a processor of prescription-drug claims that is 86.2%-owned by McKesson.  Mr. Harlan admits that there is "lack of total compatibility" between PCS and McKesson's business.  One analyst calls it an "inherent conflict of interest."  McKesson is caught between PCS's insurance-company clients, which are demanding sharp reductions in reimbursements for certain drugs, and the pharmacies who oppose those reductions.  The company must decide whether to sell off the unit to resolve the quandary.  Mr. Harlan won't say just who are likely to be candidates to take over the company's new mandate.  McKesson officials say several senior McKesson executives are in the running.  Mr. Harlan dispels any notion that he will stay on.  "I have a home on the coast of Maine.  I have a new boat," he says.  "I'd like to get back there."  Thortec International Inc. said its fiscal third-quarter loss widened to $8.9 million from $2.2 million a year earlier, largely because of one-time charges associated with a former unit and the relocation of its corporate headquarters.  The San Francisco engineering services concern also said it is in discussions with potential investors that could lead to the sale of a controlling interest in the company.  An official said the firm doesn't yet have a firm proposal.  Thortec said the loss for the quarter ended July 31 included $4.2 million in charges related to the previously announced reduction in the company's interest in URS International Inc.  The deficit also included the operating loss for the unit, a consulting firm in Southeast Asia.  In addition, the loss included $700,000 in expenses tied to moving the company headquarters from San Mateo, Calif.  In a new and as-yet unannounced approach to countries turning to democracy, the International Monetary Fund may soon approve a six-month standby loan to help Brazil obtain credit from other sources and avoid a debt crisis before its November election.  If approved, the standby loan probably would total between $600 million and $900 million, and would be the first such six-month IMF agreement in more than 30 years.  It would represent an attempt by the international agency to respond to Brazil's need for international backing at a difficult time in its domestic political life.  Such an agreement would free more than $3 billion in pledged loans from Japan, the World Bank and international banks.  That, in turn, would make it easier for Brazil to make a $1.6 billion interest payment to banks that falls due on Monday and to stay current on its international obligations as its presidential elections approach.  Brazil, which has returned to democracy only in the past few years, is scheduled to hold presidential elections this November, and a new leader would take over next year.  Disagreements with the IMF over Brazil's monetary and fiscal policies following the country's failure to meet earlier financial targets until now have stymied its attempts to borrow abroad.  Normally, the IMF doesn't approve standby credit arrangements for less than 12 months because compliance with the customary conditions it usually imposes can't be monitored in a shorter period.  A senior Brazilian official said a six-month arrangement isn't yet "a formal offer," but said the matter has been discussed at length recently with IMF officials.  This official added that the conversations have gone better in recent days, and that he hoped for agreement by the end of next week.  Brazil's finance minister, Mailson da Nobrega, is due to meet with IMF managing director Michel Camdessus on Sept. 22, he added.  An IMF spokesman declined to comment on the discussions with Brazil.  Brazil's trade surplus is expected to total about $16 billion this year.  That's less than expected because imports have surged, reaching almost $2 billion in August.  Exports, which totaled more than $3 billion in August, have increased, too.  Meanwhile, the IMF, at a board meeting Wednesday, approved a further disbursement of about $180 million of loans to Venezuela, bankers and officials said.  That country now is negotiating with its bank creditors in New York and is expected to reach a proposed bank-debt agreement soon.  The U.S. and the Soviet Union are on the brink of a new arms-control treaty allowing inspection of chemical-warfare facilities, perhaps in time for the meeting next week between Foreign Secretary Shevardnadze and Secretary of State Baker.  Good.  We only hope that Secretary Baker makes clear the first installation we want to inspect is Military Compound No. 19 at Sverdlovsk.  Strictly speaking, to be sure, U.S. intelligence analysts who named Compound No. 19 do not believe it's a chemical-weapons facility.  Rather, it's a biological-weapons facility.  But surely no serious treaty would allow the Soviets to say: No, you can't inspect that one, it's animal, not mineral.  Indeed, resolving the Sverdlovsk anthrax episode is a test of any seriousness about chemical/biological arms control.  For Compound No. 19 is at the heart of a 1979 anthrax epidemic U.S. analysts have called a "biological Chernobyl."  The U.S. position is that the epidemic resulted from an accident that released large quantities of anthrax spores being stored or processed at the installation.  This would be a violation of the 1972 agreement on biological warfare, which the U.S. accepted while admitting it was totally unverifiable.  The U.S. assessment was repeated in stunning detail in 1987, and repeated as recently as February.  The Soviet position is that the epidemic was merely the result of tainted meat.  Last year a Soviet delegation led by Dr. Pyotr Burgasov, former deputy minister of health, visited Washington with a detailed account of these claims.  The Soviets showed slides of victims of ordinary intestinal anthrax.  They disputed reports that there were also cases of the even more virulent pulmonary variety, caused by inhalation of spores and a sure sign of biological warfare.  The visit was organized by Harvard biologist Matthew Meselson, and some American scientists were impressed by the richness of detail in the Soviet account.  U.S. government analysts were not impressed.  In particular, the Soviet health officials offered no new information on Compound No. 19.  Dr. Burgasov was quoted as saying he did not discuss the epidemic with military officials because he had already found tainted meat, and "I couldn't imagine that in the midst of a highly populated area that there could be any work on highly dangerous pathogens."  Now, either U.S. intelligence was and remains grossly wrong, or the Soviets have offered a carefully concocted script of lies.  And there the matter stands as the U.S. and Soviets prepare to conclude the treaty on chemical weapons.  The treaty supposedly will contain land-breaking verification provisions, but in practice the difficulties may be insurmountable.  A look at Compound No. 19 today would be comforting, for example, but it would scarcely be conclusive about what was produced there in 1979 and could now be stored elsewhere.  One can argue that even imperfect verification would be helpful, of course, but it is not serious diplomacy or serious arms control to conclude a treaty covering chemical technologies while looking the other way on intimately related biological technologies.  Arms negotiators have tended to take chemical and biological negotiations as practice grounds for negotiating on nuclear missiles, and the Bush administration seems to want some treaty it can cite as arms-control progress.  But the day for this sport, if it ever existed, is past.  Iran and Iraq have just fought a war with chemical weaponry.  Chemical programs are proliferating in Third World nations, notably Gadhafi's Libya.  Nearly all of the nations with chemical programs have biological-weapons programs as well.  If "glasnost" has reduced the superpower nuclear threat, terrorist use of chemical and biological weapons looks like a primary military threat of the next decade or two.  Beyond that, seriousness about the Sverdlosk incident, and for that matter "yellow rain" in Southeast Asia, is a test of glasnost itself.  By now we are accustomed to headlines about the Soviets admitting the crime of the Hitler-Stalin pact or confessing or almost confessing to the massacre of the Polish officer corps in the Katyn forest.  We need to know if this openness is subject to expiration of a statute of limitations; are dusty crimes being confessed merely to buttress the credibility of current lies?  So if there is to be a new verification regime for chemical weapons, a great deal hangs on resolving the issue of anthrax at Sverdlovsk.  Can we get the kind of investigation that would either produce a Soviet admission or give U.S. analysts some confidence in saying they were wrong?  It would be nice to know that the U.S. government has even asked.  A dispute over gambling is tearing apart the Akwesasne Mohawk Indian reserve that straddles the U.S.-Canada border here.  Late last month, a mob of 250 marched to the just-renovated Golden Knight casino and set it on fire, gutting the two-story building.  A day later a sniper shot out electrical transformers at another casino, Tony's Vegas International.  This month, about 50 opponents of gambling had a six-hour argument with members of the self-appointed Mohawk Sovereignty Security Force, punctuated by fist fights and brandished baseball bats.  The security force, better known as the Warrior Society, supports gambling.  Last weekend somebody put two bullets through another electrical transformer, blacking out about 1,200 homes and businesses on the reserve for several hours.  This week, tensions have abated, but residents fear violence could return.  "Many hundreds of people are sufficiently opposed to gambling to put their lives on the line," says Doug George-Kanetiio, editor of Akwesasne Notes.  The casinos are all located in the U.S.  The first one appeared in late 1987 and two more were added last year.  Although illegal, they operated quietly and ran into few problems with the law.  But as business boomed, new gambling houses were built early this year, and advertising campaigns were launched in Montreal, the main source of customers.  That caught the attention of New York state police, who raided the casinos in June and July.  They say they don't plan any more actions, however.  Meantime, Gov. Mario Cuomo has agreed to a request by Indian chiefs on the U.S. side to open negotiations on legalization.  Opponents of the casinos fear they will draw undesirables to the bucolic St. Lawrence valley and temptation to the reserve's 9,000 residents.  They also worry that the attraction of $75-a-shift jobs will keep high school students from going on to college.  And they don't want Akwesasne to be known as the gambling mecca of upstate New York.  Advocates counter that gambling creates much-needed jobs and brings other economic benefits.  "We could put about anything on this reserve" with the money earned from the casinos, says Michael Oakes, a pit boss at the French Riveria Casino that is partly owned by his father.  Mr. Oakes, who keeps a rifle in the corner of the building's unfinished front room, argues that "just because these places opened doesn't mean their daughters are going to get {involved} with" drugs and prostitution.  The geography of the reserve complicates the dispute because there are three tribal governments: Elected councils on the U.S. and Canada sides and a third traditional council that covers the entire reserve and represents the Mohawk clans.  The Canadian and traditional councils oppose gambling, while the U.S. council is split 2-1 in favor.  Barely hidden behind the dispute is a deeper conflict over who runs the reserve.  "The casinos are the irritant but the power struggle is the real story," says John Boots of the Warrior Society.  Gambling opponents call the Warrior Society little more than an armed gang in the pay of the casinos, which they claim are at least partly owned by non-Indian outsiders.  The Mohawks who run the casinos insist they are the owners.  The Warriors say they are protecting the reserve and its inhabitants from outsiders, in particular the New York police.  The Warriors don't recognize the authority of any of the three councils.  There isn't a local police force on the U.S. side of the reserve.  Of the seven casinos, which are small, mostly one-story buildings, the Golden Knight was shut by fire and several others closed their doors out of fear of attack.  "It was going so well before this hullabaloo you had to line up at the slot machines," says one Canadian visitor as he watches his friend lose money at a $50-limit blackjack table.  Still, the gambling continues, and getting either side to back down will be difficult, says Mr. George-Kanetiio, the newspaper editor.  "Too many hard words have been spoken," he says.  Healthcare International Inc., Austin, Texas, agreed in principle to sell its Pali Momi Medical Center in Honolulu to Honolulu-based Kapiolani Health Care System.  Specific terms weren't disclosed.  But cash-strapped Healthcare said the sale calls for Kapiolani either to assume the payments on or pay off the $60 million mortgage on the facility; to assume or pay the lease and trade payables related to the acute-care hospital; and to make cash payments to Healthcare.  Last week, Healthcare said it failed to make the monthly $628,000 mortgage payment on the hospital due Sept. 1.  Healthcare, which also owes lease and interest payments to its HealthVest affiliate, has been trying to sell assets to raise cash.  The company said it hopes to have a definitive agreement to sell the Hawaiian facility by Sept. 30 and to complete the transaction by year end.  Healthcare, which operates health-care facilities, said the sale would "remove an ongoing drain" on its cash resources.  Continental Information Systems Corp., Syracuse, N.Y., approved the sale of substantially all assets to a group led by Harold S. Geneen, former chairman of ITT Corp., for $420 million, mostly in notes.  The plan calls for CIS Acquisition Corp. to pay $75 million in cash and $345 in unsecured promissory notes for the leasing company, which has been operating under Chapter 11 of the federal Bankruptcy Code since January.  Chapter 11 gives a company protection from creditor lawsuits while it continues operations and works out a debt repayment plan.  "Stockholder participation in the proceeds of the sale is uncertain," because proceeds may not be enough to satisfy creditor claims, Continental said.  Continental has received at least six proposals, from such firms as Comdisco Inc., Encore International, Finalco Group Inc., Technology Finance Group Inc. and Varilease Corp.  Some of the companies proposed buying only parts of it.  CENTEL Corp., Chicago, declared a special $1-a-share dividend, citing the "significant value" the telecommunications company received from the recent sale of its cable-television interests.  The special payout is payable Oct. 6 to stock of record Sept. 25.  UGI Corp.'s AmeriGas Propane unit has purchased the businesses of West Florida LP Gas Co. in Panama City, Fla., and Best L-P Gas Inc. in Canton, Ga., for about $31 million plus working capital.  The acquisitions are the first in Valley Forge, Pa.-based UGI's strategy to "substantially" increase AmeriGas Propane's operation, said James A. Sutton, UGI's chairman and chief executive officer.  The company is using the $100 million proceeds from the recent divestiture of its industrial gas businesses for these purchases.  Mr. Sutton added that AmeriGas expects to complete its purchase of KCS Group Inc.'s Utility Propone Co. unit for about $21.4 million.  UNIVERSAL FOODS Corp. declared a 3-for-2 stock split, payable Oct. 16 to stock of record Sept. 29.  The Milwaukee-based food concern also said its board is considering a 15.9% boost in the company's quarterly dividend rate to 17 cents on post-split shares, which is equal to 25.5 cents on the company's current 16.7 million shares outstanding.  Universal Foods last paid a dividend of 22 cents a share on Aug. 9.  The company expects to declare the dividend on Oct. 3.  The company also will ask shareholders at the annual meeting in January to increase authorized common shares to 100 million from 40 million.  The additional shares would be used for acquisitions, stock dividends and other corporate purposes.  American Savings Financial Corp. said holders approved a previously announced sale of the company to Seafirst Corp., a unit of BankAmerica Corp.  San Francisco-based BankAmerica has proposed issuing $30.05 of its stock for each American Savings share, giving the transaction an indicated value of $68.6 million.  Under the agreement, American Savings holders will receive more than $30.05 of BankAmerica stock if the market value of the stock averages more than $33.375 for the 10 days preceding the closing of the transaction.  The deal is expected to close before year end.  American Savings, Tacoma, Wash., is the parent of American Savings Bank, also based in Tacoma, which has shareholder equity of $50.3 million and assets of $655 million.  ADVANTA Corp., Horsham, Pa., announced a 10-cent a share dividend for 1989 and said it plans to begin a regular annual 10-cent payout on its common stock next year.  The marketer of consumer financial products also declared a $140 a share dividend on its 1,010 outstanding Class A preferred shares.  The 1989 common stock dividend is payable Oct. 17 to holders of record Sept. 29.  Advanta also said it repurchased $16.8 million of its $50 million 12 3/4% senior subordinated debentures, due in 1998.  The company said it may use $12.5 million of the repurchased debentures to satisfy the first sinking fund requirement on this issue which is due Dec. 1, 1996.  Rolls-Royce PLC posted a 60% surge in first-half pretax profit, reflecting a large backlog of orders and its recent acquisition of power engineering firm Northern Engineering Industries PLC.  The London jet engine maker said profit before tax rose to #101 million ($157.6 million) from #63 million a year ago.  In late trading on London's Stock Exchange yesterday, Rolls was up 3.5 pence to 196.5 pence.  Sir Francis Tombs, Rolls chairman, said the company is now finding synergies with NEI in a number of fields, expecting to take advantage of "future opportunities in the privatized electricity generating and nuclear industries."  The results include seven weeks' of earnings from NEI, which is contributing to Rolls's order book, currently at more than #5.5 billion.  Profit after tax and minorities rose 55% to #85 million, or 10.1 pence a share, from #55 million, or 6.9 pence a share.  The board recommended an interim per-share dividend of 2.30 pence, up from 2.10 pence.  Sales rose 25% to #1.12 billion from #893 million.  Attorneys for Michael R. Milken and his brother, Lowell Milken, sought a court order barring what they said were illegal leaks by the government of confidential information about the Milken investigation.  In a motion filed in federal court here, the Milken lawyers asked U.S. District Court Judge Kimba M. Wood to hold a hearing to identify the sources of the alleged leaks and to impose contempt sanctions on those responsible for divulging such information.  The attorneys said in the court filing that the government had leaked confidential information to reporters for The Wall Street Journal, the Washington Post, the New York Times and the Los Angeles Times.  The lawyers said that the leaks "threatened the ability of Michael Milken and Lowell Milken to receive a fair trial."  Jess Fardella, an assistant U.S. attorney who is a lead prosecutor in the Milken case, said, "We will respond in our court papers when we file a response to the motion."  Mary McCue, a spokeswoman for the Securities and Exchange Commission, said the SEC "has no comment that we wish to make."  The Milken motion identified both agencies as possible sources of the alleged leaks.  Michael Milken is the former chief of junk bond operations for Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  His brother is a former official in Drexel's Beverly Hills, Calif., office.  The two were charged in March in a 98-count indictment that alleged racketeering, securities fraud and tax fraud.  An expanded indictment alleging additional allegations of fraud and conspiracy is expected to be handed up as soon as next month.  Lawyers for the Milkens have asserted their clients' innocence and have said the two will fight the charges against them at trial.  Arthur L. Liman, the New York defense attorney who is representing Michael Milken, and Michael F. Armstrong, who is defending Lowell Milken, both have long decried numerous news reports relating to the government's investigation of their clients.  For the past three years, the lawyers said in the memorandum supporting their motion, "this case has been plagued by a constant stream of improper disclosures of confidential details of the investigation."  The lawyers said in their court filing that they believe the "leaks resulted from decisions by some in the government to use publicity as a prosecutorial weapon, carefully timing the disclosures to 'pressure' defendants, witnesses, and those under investigation."  The Milken court filing reprinted portions of several articles and alleged that the newspapers could not have obtained the information from any other source than the government.  In some cases, the Milkens' motion cited specific confidential government documents as the likely source of a newspaper story.  Criminal-law specialists say it is illegal for the government to disclose to the media or anyone else matters occurring before a grand jury.  Grand jury witnesses and their counsel are not subject to either federal or state secrecy rules.  Allegations by defense attorneys that government prosecutors and investigators have leaked details of confidential grand jury investigations to the media are common in high-profile cases, defense lawyers not involved in the Milken case say.  Defense lawyers often ask judges to issue protective orders barring the leaks and to award sanctions, as the Milkens' attorneys have done.  In some cases, lawyers have asked judges to bar further action by a grand jury or to dismiss an indictment as a result of pre-indictment or pre-trial publicity, defense lawyers say.  But a report prepared last year by a committee of the Association of the Bar of the City of New York concluded that defense lawyers are rarely able to prove that government officials leaked confidential information about a grand-jury investigation.  The report showed that judges rarely impose sanctions or throw out indictments as a result of unauthorized publicity.  The leading precedent on the issue is a 1980 federal appeals court case involving Bert Lance, the former U.S. budget director.  The appeals court ruled that a court hearing on allegations of governmental leaks will be granted only if the judge concludes from reading the articles -- along with court papers submitted by both parties -- that the information likely could not have come from any source but the government.  In their court filing, the Milken lawyers said, "We are not seeking to have any members of the media called, for we are not interested in confrontations with the press.  But let the responsible government officials be questioned under oath" about the leaks.  Attorneys for the Milkens said in their memorandum that the "government began unlawfully leaking confidential details of its investigation immediately after" convicted former stock speculator Ivan F. Boesky agreed to cooperate with the government's investigation of Wall Street in November 1986.  In recent weeks, they said, shortly after the government announced in open court that it expected additional charges against the Milkens to be filed on or about Oct. 1, "the leaks have risen in a crescendo of prejudicial news announcements."  Among the articles the lawyers cited was a story in this newspaper that prosecutors had widened a securities-fraud investigation to focus on an arrangement under which Drexel may have, in effect, paid off some customers to induce them to buy hard-to-sell securities from Drexel.  Another Wall Street Journal article mentioned by the Milken lawyers reported that Michael Milken allegedly arranged for his children to make millions of dollars from warrants meant solely for purchasers of Storer Communications Inc. preferred stock.  "There can be little doubt that the source of this highly prejudicial story is within the government," the attorneys said in their filing.  The attorneys also cited stories in the Washington Post that divulged the contents of a confidential SEC memorandum prepared in May 1988 by the SEC's enforcement division.  The lawyers in their motion seek to compel the government to produce that previously confidential memo.  The lawyers wrote that prosecutors shouldn't try to disavow responsibility for the leak of the SEC memorandum by claiming it came from the SEC and not the U.S. attorney's office.  "There is only one federal government in this country," the lawyers said.  Attorneys for both the SEC and the U.S. attorney's office have worked on the case together.  The Milken lawyers asked that oral arguments be held on Sept. 29 on the question of whether there should be a hearing concerning the alleged leaks.  The Milkens' attorneys said in their filing that if Judge Wood, who is presiding over the criminal case, allows them to take testimony from prosecutors, the procedure "will send a much-needed dose of deterrence to officials throughout the government who are tempted to short-circuit the judicial process by leaking prejudicial information to the press."  The lawyers wrote that such a hearing would be useful even if they are unable to determine the source of the leaks.  When I was in Hanoi last year, a remarkable military proposal was put to me by two officials of the Foreign Ministry.  Were the U.S. to normalize relations with Vietnam, they said, the Vietnamese would be prepared the next day to open talks on an American leasing agreement for space at Cam Ranh Bay and Danang.  Those two bases, built by the U.S., are the gemstones of the Soviet Pacific Fleet, the largest of Moscow's four fleets.  The subs, ships, TU-95 strategic bombers and YU-16 Badger fighter-bombers berthed at these two bases can reach across the Pacific, projecting Russian power farther than ever before.  The Foreign Ministry officials went out of their way to stress that the bases were on loan to the Soviets, which had no formal leasing agreement with Vietnam.  A return of American forces to Vietnam, not as combatants but as invited tenants, would be the largest strategic victory for the U.S. since the end of World War II -- even if those bases were "shared" by both Soviet and American forces, just as American ships are based at Guantanamo Bay in Cuba, while Soviet ships and subs are at Cienfuegos.  The possibility that the U.S. and Vietnam could reach agreement on Danang and Cam Ranh Bay anytime soon is, of course, unlikely.  It's even possible that the Vietnamese are putting forward this proposal in bad faith.  But the error of U.S. policy toward Vietnam is not that the administrations of President Reagan and President Bush have considered this option and rejected it.  The error is that neither administration apparently has even known about it.  For more than 10 years the U.S. has talked to Hanoi only about issues left over from the war: American soldiers held or missing in Vietnam, Amerasian children, and Vietnam's occupation of Cambodia.  Although the U.S. has dubbed these "humanitarian issues," it has in fact politicized them by demanding their resolution as preconditions for normalizing diplomatic relations.  One pre-condition is about to be met.  By the end of this month, Hanoi is scheduled to withdraw the last of its invading force from Cambodia.  That withdrawal is a good opportunity for the U.S. to reshape its policy toward Vietnam.  The first step is for the U.S. to recognize Vietnam.  Normalizing diplomatic relations costs the American taxpayer next to nothing.  It means merely that ambassadors are exchanged, embassies set up and formal, wide-ranging dialogue practiced.  A curious Washington alliance of House liberals and conservative Republican senators proposes instead of diplomatic recognition the smaller step of establishing an American interest section inside the Swedish Embassy in Hanoi.  The U.S. currently has a similar arrangement in Havana.  But an interest section will do nothing to further U.S. interests; it is merely a political hedge that leads to a state of permanent non-recognition.  In recognizing Vietnam, however, the U.S. should not automatically grant full trading privileges, but instead should announce a timetable for improving trade ties pegged to a Vietnamese timetable for accounting for POWs and MIAs.  Included in Washington's timetable should be such incentives as the granting of most-favored-nation trading status and help with the World Bank, the Asian Development Bank and the International Monetary Fund.  In the past 10 years, the U.S. has made next to no progress on recovering POWs in Vietnam or on bringing home the remains of American soldiers killed there.  The results have been just as unsatisfactory in Laos, even though the U.S. has maintained diplomatic relations with that country.  This is no doubt largely due to the fact that Laos is a client state of Vietnam and the U.S. has offered no inducement to either country to bring these issues to a conclusion.  Hanoi must know that the U.S. will reward Vietnamese cooperation in recovering POWs and that the U.S. is not interested in assigning blame for events that took place two decades ago.  Incentives should be included to encourage Hanoi to use its ties with Laos and Cambodia to settle the POW issue in those two countries.  The issue of recovering any POWs still in Indochina needs to be separated from and given priority to the MIA issue.  The U.S. must also continue to encourage Vietnam to return the remains of missing American soldiers, of course.  But the main focus should be on prisoners, not remains.  Just the opposite is now the case.  The second step toward normalization should be a "linkage" between American humanitarian and medical assistance and Vietnamese actions on releasing Amerasian children and implementing the Orderly Departure Program for South Vietnamese who want to come to the U.S.  Third, once Hanoi has settled the POW issue, Washington should permit private American investment in Vietnam, which is now banned.  The best way to encourage the Vietnamese government to continue its economic reforms and to gradually move out of the Soviet orbit is to offer positive inducements and rewards for actions with which the U.S. agrees.  Vietnamese Communist Party General Secretary Nguyen Van Linh, known in Asia as the "little Gorbachev," is a pragmatic leader who is carefully watching the reforms in the Soviet Union.  He has said that centralized power "has made our people lazy."  Vietnam is already adopting some free-market reforms and is likely to accelerate the pace of those reforms if encouraged by Washington and supported by private American assistance.  It desperately wants U.S. economic and technological help in goods as diverse as fertilizers and personal computers -- and is willing to bargain for it.  Asian businessmen already recognize that Vietnam offers not just a large, cheap and willing work force, but also a potential market.  Indonesia, Thailand and Singapore are already trading with Vietnam, despite the Association of Southeast Asian Nations' embargo.  Japan now honors the U.S.-ASEAN embargo but may change its policy after the Cambodian pullout.  Two years ago Honda postponed plans to build a plant in Vietnam after U.S. Sen. Robert Kasten (R., Wis.) condemned the project as a violation of the embargo.  Why should U.S. business take a back seat to Japan and ASEAN?  Fourth, Washington should work hand-in-hand with Hanoi to guarantee that the Khmer Rouge never returns to power in Cambodia.  So far, the Bush administration has publicly deplored the Khmer Rouge, but then privately sided with China in plans to include the Khmer Rouge in an interim Phonm Penh regime.  Secretary of State James Baker journeyed to the Paris conference on Cambodia last month where he spoke out passionately against the return of the Khmer Rouge.  But the very same afternoon, in a private meeting with the Chinese foreign minister, he agreed to Khmer Rouge participation in a new interim Cambodian government.  And last, the U.S. should substantially increase military and economic assistance to its front-line ally, Thailand.  This would be a strong signal that the U.S. has no intention of allowing a newly resurgent Vietnam to cause trouble.  The American history in Southeast Asia has been one of the misunderstanding of power and its exercise.  Since the end of the war, the U.S. has played the role of the ostrich, burying its head in the sand, rehashing its mistakes in Vietnam.  One more reason remains for recognizing Vietnam.  It was best expressed by Deputy Foreign Minister Nguyen Dy Nien during my trip to Hanoi last year.  As we sat in the official state guesthouse drinking tea, he said: "Even though the war is over, the bleeding continues on both sides.  Only the normalization of relations can stop the bleeding."  ---  Mr. LeBoutillier, a former congressman (R., N.Y.), is the author of "Vietnam Now: The Case for Normalizing Relations With Hanoi," due from Praeger next month.  The Senate Finance Committee agreed to cut the costs and the benefits of Medicare's catastrophic-illness insurance for the elderly in an effort to save the unpopular plan from repeal.  However, the committee still faces a series of difficult choices about how much to cut the premiums for the insurance, which benefits to cut and how to pay for those that remain.  Panel Chairman Lloyd Bentsen (D., Texas) said the committee will hold a public meeting Tuesday to hammer out how it will reduce the cost and coverage of the catastrophic insurance it passed just last year.  "I think we really made some headway, because we developed a majority feeling that we would agree to core benefits," Sen. Bentsen said after a closed-door meeting yesterday.  The plan would retain the current law's coverage of unlimited hospitalization after payment of a deductible, hospice care, some in-home health services and assistance to family members, and a few other benefits.  However, Sen. Bentsen's statement masked considerable disagreement on the committee over how to scale back other benefits, including coverage of prescription drugs and doctors' costs, as well as differences over how to reduce the premiums that have generated so much hostility from middle- and higher-income beneficiaries.  The catastrophic-illness plan enacted last year provided that the cost of the expanded coverage must be borne entirely by the beneficiaries.  It called for a flat fee that started at $4 a month this year and was scheduled to rise to $10.20 a month in 1993, and a surtax on income-tax liabilities starting at $150.  It's the surtax that generated the opposition.  The surtax rate began at 15% this year, but was capped at $800 per enrollee, a maximum that only a small percentage of the beneficiaries pay.  The surtax is scheduled to rise to 28%, or a maximum of $1,050 a person, in 1993.  The Finance Committee has agreed to leave the flat monthly premium alone and to reduce both the tax rate and the maximum surcharge, but it hasn't agreed on a new formula.  Sen. Bentsen has said he wants to reduce the maximum to $585 this year from $800, and he stressed that the committee won't touch the basic monthly premium.  The tax bill adopted yesterday by the House Ways and Means Committee would reduce benefits and boost the monthly premium in order to pay for a reduction in the surtax.  This plan, which has been criticized for hurting the poorest beneficiaries and helping the wealthiest, has fueled efforts in the House to repeal the program altogether.  Bush administration officials and leaders of organizations for the elderly believe the Finance Committee's plan could offer a politically attractive alternative to repeal.  Repeal would have an unpleasant effect on the budget, because the current law is designed to generate a surplus over the next few years.  One aspect of the emerging Senate plan could trigger opposition from the Bush administration, which has tried to stay out of the political firestorm over the catastrophic-illness plan.  Sen. Bentsen said the plan probably will require "outside financing."  The administration has said that it will oppose any effort to pay for the plan by raising taxes on non-beneficiaries or to tap into general revenues.  Aside from the size of the surtax, the most controversial issue the committee faces next week is how to trim benefits to reduce the cost of the plan.  One possibility would be to eliminate most of the drug benefits, leaving only coverage of at-home intravenous drug therapy and transplantrelated drugs.  Starting in 1991, the current law would pay 50% of the cost of prescription drugs after a $600 deductible, with the payment rising to 80% in 1993.  The other way to make a major cut in the cost of the coverage is to limit or eliminate payments to doctors.  Starting in 1990, the program is to pay all doctors' bills above an initial $1,370.  To ease opposition to the law, the committee also agreed to allow beneficiaries to opt out of the plan altogether.  Asha Corp. said it formed a joint venture with C&C Inc., a unit of Taylor, Mich.-based Masco Industries Inc., to make an all-glass auto roof system.  Valarie Valencia, Asha's treasurer, said she couldn't project annual revenue for the venture because no contract has been secured from the major automotive companies.  She added, however, that the Big Three U.S. auto makers have expressed interest in the "Cielo" roofing system.  Santa Barbara, Calif.-based Asha, which researches and develops four-wheel drive vehicles, would make the system, while C&C would market it.  Asha said its transparent roof technology solves problems of light control and insulation from heat and cold.  Bell Atlantic Corp. said an internal investigation of its Bell of Pennsylvania unit found that employees improperly disclosed customers' private telephone records to law enforcement officials and others without a court order.  The company said the investigation, which it considers to be completed, also found that employees of the unit's graphics operation, based in Pittsburgh, diverted company resources for private purposes and tried to cover up the practice.  According to Bell of Pennsylvania officials, disciplinary action is being taken against 13 employees in its security and graphics departments and procedures have been tightened to prevent future abuses.  In May, the company fired security director Robert Meinert and suspended the Pittsburgh graphics unit supervisor, a spokesman said.  This is the eighth investigation since 1985 -- either by the company or state officials -- looking into charges of employee misappropriation of company resources and improper phone record disclosure.  Robert Valentini, Bell of Pennsylvania's chairman and chief executive officer, said he commissioned the latest inquiry in April, after employees alleged that abuses and cover ups hadn't been fully investigated in earlier probes.  But a Pennsylvania legislator criticized the latest probe for failing to investigate allegations of wiretapping and disclosure of employees' private telephone toll records.  "The report is incomplete.  This is another case of Bell saying, 'Trust me,' " said Pennsylvania Rep. David R. Wright, chairman of the House Consumer Affairs Committee, which received allegations of wiretapping.  Bell spokesman Saul Kohler said an earlier investigation by the state Attorney General found no evidence of wiretapping.  Mr. Wright also faulted the company for failing to identify the employees who are being disciplined and for not disclosing whether top managers were responsible for the abuses.  The Bell of Pennsylvania case appears likely to heighten privacy concerns of consumer advocates and other telephone-industry critics.  Some critics cited recent allegations of wiretapping by former Cincinnati Bell Telephone Co. employees.  Cincinnati Bell has denied any involvement in wiretapping.  "Fears are going to continue to be expressed.  That's partly because new technologies, such as caller identification, threaten telephone privacy," said David Wagenhauser, a staff attorney at the Telecommunications Research and Action Center, a Washington-based consumer advocacy group.  Mr. Wagenhauser said it is impossible to say whether illegal wiretapping or disclosure of private telephone records is widespread because the abuses usually remain secret.  "The potential for privacy violations could increase because of the drug hysteria" and mounting pressure to investigate drug traffickers by any available means, Mr. Wagenhauser said.  But Mr. Wagenhauser said that Bell of Pennsylvania's public disclosure of its internal investigation could serve as a deterrent by putting employees on notice that the company won't tolerate privacy violations.  The Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission began an investigation of the company in 1987 after receiving an anonymous letter alleging that the company had aborted a probe into fraud and waste at the Pittsburgh graphics unit.  In 1988, the commission began investigating phone record disclosures after receiving allegations that the company was checking employees' private phone records to identify whistle blowers.  The company denied checking employee phone records.  Mr. Valentini said that a 264-page report by Kroll Associates, a New York investigation concern, thoroughly explored all the issues and the matter has been closed.  The report found that five present or former security employees had disclosed customers' toll records to law enforcement agencies and, in one case, to a Delaware bank investigating a stolen credit card.  Pennsylvania Attorney General Ernie Preate Jr. has largely completed a separate investigation of employees' allegations, but won't issue a report until his office reviews the Kroll report, said spokesman Robert Gentzel.  The Kroll report also found that employees of the company's Pittsburgh graphics unit had bought cameras for private use and done graphics work for friends or relatives prior to 1986.  The investigation's $1 million cost, as well as a $500,000 penalty levied by Pennsylvania regulators last December, will be borne by shareholders, Mr. Kohler said.  Assets of 463 money-market mutual funds rose $2.42 billion, to $347.07 billion, for the week ended Wednesday, according to the Investment Company Institute.  The institute, a Washington trade group that reports its weekly findings to the Federal Reserve, said assets grew in all fund categories.  On Wednesday, Donoghue's Money Fund Report said assets in the 389 funds it follows swelled $3.6 billion, to $339.6 billion.  The Holliston, Mass., newsletter largely attributed the big run-up to a declining stock market last week.  Donoghue's also said the average seven-day compounded yield rose for the first time since May to 8.61%, from 8.58%.  A longer-term yield measure declined.  "The yields on money-market funds inched up from their recent trough, and yield spreads in their favor widened slightly," said Jacob Dreyer, vice president and chief economist of the institute.  "The strength of continuing inflows into money-market funds is particularly noteworthy during this 'back to school' season, when people usually draw their cash balances down."  The 141 institutional funds increased assets by $79.9 million, to $84.85 billion, according to the institute.  The 227 general-purpose funds rose by $805.2 million, to $111.48 billion; the 95 broker-dealer funds grew by $1.53 billion, to $150.74 billion.  Gary G. Harmon, chief financial officer, will leave the firm at the end of this month to help found a new company.  Mr. Harmon, who has been with Avantek for 19 years, will remain on the board of the company, which makes microwave electronics.  The company said Mr. Harmon will help arrange financing for the new venture, which will be involved in the development and operation of a group of exclusive golfing clubs.  Steven J. Allan, vice president and controller, will succeed Mr. Harmon as chief financial officer.  {Last of a Series}  LONDON, Ky. -- Venture capital in America rarely trickles out of big cities and the high-tech corridors of the coasts.  But at Kentucky Highlands Investment Corp., new-venture money flows uphill -- into the poverty-ridden villages and backwoods shacks of the Appalachian Mountains.  The private, nonprofit venture fund's mission is to recharge southeastern Kentucky's moribund economy.  While other venture capitalists seek out glamour industries, Kentucky Highlands backs hograisers, tent manufacturers and makers of plastic lids -- all of them in a pocket of Appalachia that has been deeply depressed for more than a century.  "We don't get to look at that many slick deals, all packaged and ready to move," says Jerry Rickett, Kentucky Highlands' president.  In 21 years of fostering job growth in Appalachia, Kentucky Highlands has learned much about the importance of entrepreneurship in rural America.  The concern started in 1968 as part of a Great Society job-creation program, but it has since weaned itself from federal support and evolved into a rare hybrid: a private venture-capital fund motivated not by profit, but by its economic-development mission.  The concern maintains a rare mix of altruism and hard-nosed capitalism.  Its goal is economic development, but it seeks out "those in the community who have the skills and toughness to succeed in the marketplace," according to David Osborne, author of a recent book on state economic development strategies.  A lean operation with six employees, a handful of consultants and a mere $13 million in capital, it has toted up a record that might make an orthodox venture capitalist blush.  Eleven of the 19 new ventures it has financed have survived, most for three years or more.  Five of the eleven survivors are successful to varying degrees; six are just muddling along.  Another five ventures have flopped. (Three are still starting up.) But few economic-development programs can match Kentucky Highlands' track record.  Over the years, it has created 1,800 jobs generating more than $80 million in income for people in southeastern Kentucky.  It continues to create jobs at a rate of 200 a year, and has expanded its activities to recruiting branch manufacturing plants, developing industrial real estate and providing working capital for existing businesses.  It also has lured to its region a handful of entrepreneurs who have started successful new ventures and stayed.  "The shortest resource {in depressed rural areas} isn't a lack of market opportunities," says Tom Miller, director of program-related investments for the Ford Foundation and a former president of Kentucky Highlands.  "It's not a lack of labor that can do the job.  It's not a lack of capital.  It's a lack of the person that can stand in the middle of all that and deliver ideas that can succeed."  A handful of entrepreneurs recruited by Kentucky Highlands has had a remarkable impact on a region steeped in generations of joblessness.  Ever since Steven Meng responded in the mid-1970s to a Kentucky Highlands advertisement for staff members, the University of Kentucky business graduate has been starting, saving or shutting down businesses.  He shut down an audio-equipment maker Kentucky Highlands had backed and liquidated a stuffed-toy company it had started.  Then he helped start a women's clothing manufacturer, save a plastics manufacturer and a woodcrafts concern, and start a retail fixtures maker. (He has since left Kentucky Highlands' staff to run the woodcrafts and retail-fixtures concerns, in which he purchased a stake.)  All told, the businesses Mr. Meng has started or saved employ more than 500 workers, providing the only regular paychecks most of them have ever had.  In some areas, his ventures account for almost all significant economic activity.  By sticking with its entrepreneurial recruits through tough times, Kentucky Highlands has enabled some to found successful new companies where they might otherwise have foundered.  James C. Egnew, an aeronautical engineer from Nashville, Tenn., was lured by Kentucky Highlands' offer of financing to tiny Sterns, Ky., in the early 1970s to found a family-tent company that was successful for several years.  But when a flood of imports slashed prices in the family-tent market, his firm, Outdoor Venture Corp., nearly went under.  He was taking heavy losses on his inventory, but Kentucky Highlands provided added capital and helped persuade other lenders to stick with Outdoor Venture.  Soon, Mr. Egnew hit on another winner -- a military-tent business -- and eventually started making air bags for autos too.  Today, the two operations have sales of about $15 million, employ 200 people and support full- or part-time employment for an additional 100, including two job programs for the handicapped.  Kentucky Highlands has also found that it sometimes pays to back entrepreneurs who have been given a cold shoulder elsewhere.  When Jack O. Touratsos, an industrial engineer, sought startup financing for a plastics-molding plant, "I didn't have any money" to attract venture capital, he says.  "We were like a guy who goes into a singles bar with a wedding ring.  We were in a mundane industry.  We didn't have racehorses or computer technology.  We just didn't have the pizazz."  The company, based in Mt. Vernon, Ky., now is a thriving manufacturer that has generated 400 jobs, spun off three new machine shops and helped multiply the size of several truckers and other suppliers many times over.  Mr. Touratsos sold the firm, generating a profit of more than $3 million for Kentucky Highlands.  Kentucky Highlands also found that skilled management assistance to startups is even more crucial in depressed rural areas, where entrepreneurs are struggling against heavy odds.  After Kentucky Highlands lost $275,000 on a failed steel fabricating firm because the founder was underpricing his products, a member of the fund's board suggested that the fund should intervene more deeply in management.  "If it's our baby," he said, "we'd better rock it."  As a result, staffers now provide months of intensive help to some new ventures, long after other funds would have written them off.  Thomas Musbach, a former Cincinnati marketing and finance consultant recruited by Kentucky Highlands, worked as a staffer for a little less than a year before leaving to manage the turnaround of a troubled computer-peripherals maker in depressed Campton, Ky., saving 195 jobs in the process.  Mr. Touratsos' company almost went under in its third year; Mr. Meng jumped in as temporary chairman and persuaded suppliers to give the company a little more time.  At the woodcrafts concern in McKee, Ky., a hamlet of 500, Mr. Meng labors in a drab cement-block office on a gravel lot dredged from the side of a mountain.  Within a few miles, backwoods roads wander past dirt-floored shacks where families live in abject poverty.  "You get a bonus in seeing the effects your company is having on people," he says.  Many employees find better housing or buy a car for the first time, he says.  Mr. Musbach found the same incentive to stay.  He discovered in himself "a sense of altruism -- a sense that the people in this area deserve something better," he says.  Perhaps most important, Kentucky Highlands has found that "economic development probably is a 50-year problem in a rural community," Mr. Miller says.  "Whether we're reigniting the entrepreneurial engines remains to be seen."  Two years ago, Digital Equipment Corp. greeted its 30th birthday in grand style.  The fast-growing computer maker staged a marketing extravaganza on Boston's waterfront, a nine-day, $26 million fete that drew 55,000 people and turned the majestic Queen Elizabeth 2 and the cruise ship Oceanic into floating hotels.  Digital could afford to celebrate.  It had become the world's second-largest computer maker, a feat accomplished largely at the expense of International Business Machines Corp.  Its stock was soaring toward a record.  The ocean liners towering above the crowded piers said it all: Digital's ship had come in.  Today, Digital is nearly dead in the water.  Domestic sales have stalled, and some analysts predict that, for the three months ending Sept. 30, Digital will report its weakest quarter in four years.  Under fierce competitive pressure, the company is moving thousands of employees from assembly lines and corporate offices into the sales force.  It has slashed costs, frozen pay and stopped hiring.  This week, Digital offered a voluntary severance package to 700 manufacturing employees.  Digital isn't the only computer company that is hurting, by any means.  But its slowdown reflects the wrenching changes that have swept the business -- and shows how fast fortunes can shift in the industry's swift-moving currents.  As computers become more of a commodity, prices and profit margins are being squeezed.  And as companies turn to software and new chip designs for a competitive edge, fewer workers are needed to solder circuit boards.  Even strong companies are being forced to slim down.  "The whole world changed," says Jay P. Stevens, a computer-industry analyst at Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. "Digital was slow to see it coming.  Now, they're accepting the world as it really is."  The unaccustomed belt-tightening and growing use of technology acquired from outsiders have strained Digital's proud engineering culture and its long tradition of avoiding layoffs.  "This once was a place where working dawn to dark was rewarded.  But the big raises are gone, and benefits aren't what they used to be," one manager complains.  Workers in manufacturing and other shrinking areas say they expect to be forced out if they don't accept retraining or relocation to other parts of the company -- usually into sales.  The relentless pace of technology has forced Digital and other major computer makers into a delicate balancing act: They must keep their existing customers happy while developing the next generation of computers that they will need to stay competitive.  That has proved awkward for Digital.  For a decade, its marketing message was built around the flagship VAX computer design, which played the same software all across the company's product line.  It was a potent weapon against IBM, with its welter of incompatible designs.  The sales slogan "Digital has it now" was long used to devastating effect.  But a new computer design scrambled that strategy, and Digital has fumbled for months in trying to project a coherent new theme, even as it brought out a blizzard of new products.  In just a year, the company rebuilt its entire VAX minicomputer line.  At the same time, it adopted a powerful new computer-chip design that runs on industry-standard operating software -- marking a fundamental departure from the single-design VAX strategy.  The nonVAX design, licensed from outsiders, no less, might once have amounted to corporate heresy.  It was too much, too fast.  "We confused our customers, and it hurt us," Kenneth H. Olsen, Digital's president, says.  In another heresy, Mr. Olsen now says Digital should pay a dividend.  That overturns a longstanding strategy of hoarding cash to finance fast growth -- a stance more suited to a hot start-up company than the mature giant Digital has become.  "We believe in dividends," he says.  "We'll be looking at it again soon.  We haven't decided when."  He calls last year's $1 billion stock buy-back an "alternative" to a dividend.  Analysts say a dividend would make the shares more attractive to institutional holders and perhaps shore up the price, which has languished around $100 a share, half its pre-crash peak of $199.50.  Though painful, the sweeping changes should make the company more competitive in the long run, customers and analysts say.  And for all its worries, Digital remains strongly profitable.  In the fiscal year ended July 1, the company earned $1.07 billion -- though that was down from $1.3 billion a year earlier.  Sales grew 11%, to $12.74 billion.  In addition, Digital has "a phenomenal balance sheet, one of the best in American business," says Barry F. Bosak, a Smith Barney analyst.  Analysts applaud Digital's cost cutting.  It has backed out of leases, consolidated facilities and recently canceled plans for a $100 million technical center in Britain.  Capital spending, which doubled in fiscal 1988 to $1.52 billion, fell to $1.22 billion in 1989.  There won't be any lavish harborside bashes this year.  "They've slammed on the brakes," Mr. Bosak says.  Digital's aggressive efforts to broaden its product line should also pay off.  Across the computer industry, popular software standards such as DOS and Unix are migrating from desktop PCs and work stations into the market for larger business computers.  This shift -- plus a wave of powerful new chip designs based on RISC, or reduced instruction-set computing -- has irrevocably altered the industry.  It has hurt the high-cost minicomputer makers that don't have a large-enough base of customers to support proprietary-design processors: Prime Computer Inc., Data General Corp. and Wang Laboratories Inc. each sustained steep losses and were forced into layoffs and new strategies.  But Digital's strategy is steering it away from the traditional minicomputer.  Its sales of work stations -- powerful desktop computers -- totaled $1.1 billion last year, and it is closing in on first-place Sun Microsystems Inc. in that fast-growing market, says International Data Corp., a market-research firm.  Digital has developed new technology that welcomes other computers into VAX networks.  And, with a powerful new processor due out next month, it is poised to assault the mainframe market long dominated by IBM. Analysts say the new line is critically important to Digital, and they predict that it could boost sales by $1 billion next year.  That mainframes are a mature market showing single-digit annual growth doesn't faze Mr. Olsen -- it's still a $40 billion business.  "The market is so big we don't really care whether it grows or not," he says.  He adds that Digital's sales approach will differ from traditional mainframe marketing, focusing instead on emerging, faster-growing commercial and technical markets.  Customers haven't been the only ones confused by the dizzying pace of change at Digital.  Its sales force has trouble keeping up, too.  "Our people cringe when they see a Digital salesman coming," says Jay Delhom, a purchase planner for New Orleans-based Entergy Corp., one of the nation's largest electric utilities.  "Some don't know their own products.  They promise the moon and don't deliver."  That hasn't kept Mr. Delhom's company from buying Digital systems to run its nuclear-power plants.  "Digital's hardware sells itself, which is a good thing because no one else seems to be," he adds.  Digital knows it has a problem.  It is shaking up the management of the sales unit and sent the entire U.S. sales force of 6,300 to a company-run summer school at Brown University.  The shakeup has reverberated through the senior ranks -- and has reshuffled the race to succeed Mr. Olsen, who founded the company 32 years ago.  But the mess in sales isn't the only problem that slowed revenue growth into single digits in the latest quarter.  In a costly gamble, Digital decided last year to cancel a major computer design, leaving big customers without a replacement at the high end of its line.  The cancellation -- in effect, skipping a generation of computers -- allowed Digital to concentrate on the VAX 9000 mainframe-sized model due out this fall.  Though the move depressed short-run results, analysts see it bolstering Digital's long-term product position.  The new computer is the most powerful processor Digital has built.  Indeed, "it will be one of the fastest mainframes on the market," Mr. Olsen promises.  Analysts predict that Digital will price the new line at less than half the cost of comparable IBM mainframes.  The stakes are enormous.  "The VAX 9000 series is the key to a turnaround at Digital," says Dean Witter's Mr. Stevens.  He calls it the centerpiece of the strongest stable of Digital products since 1985 and says the company is poised for a powerful comeback, beginning next year.  Also important to Digital will be its increasingly urgent effort to trim its swollen payroll.  Growth in the work force exploded in 1988 and then slowed in 1989; the total now stands at about 125,800.  Analysts say Digital plans to keep the head count essentially flat for three years and let attrition take its toll.  As in 1985, it is retraining thousands of manufacturing and administrative workers for direct-sales jobs.  Digital's approach recalls IBM's 1987 efforts to cut overhead costs and bolster sales, but Digital moved far more quickly.  James Osterhoff, the vice president for finance, says Digital hasn't any plans for layoffs this fiscal year.  But he says Digital's no-layoff history "is a tradition, not a policy."  He is concerned about overhead in Europe, where sales are still strong, and is looking for ways to slow spending on the weak U.S. market.  "The question is, are we doing enough, and are we doing it fast enough?" he says.  Digital is still investing heavily in research -- it spent $1.53 billion in the year ended July 1 -- and software now commands a growing share of that investment.  A crucial effort has been to embrace evolving software standards and make them work in Digital networks.  Like many competitors, Digital was caught off guard by the clamor for standard software.  Although its VAX line has been enormously popular, fueling Digital's explosive growth since 1985, more and more customers don't want to get hooked on computers based on proprietary software.  "In the VAX prison, the food's great, but you're still locked in," says George Colony, a consultant at Forrester Research Inc. Moreover, PCs linked into networks are often far less costly than minicomputers and use off-the-shelf software.  But PCs can't offer the power, sophistication and security that many large customers need.  And most standard software isn't yet suited for hard-core commercial computing, such as on-line transaction processing.  Typical transaction-processing tasks, in which hundreds of terminals interact with a database, include airline reservations, on-line retail-sales tracking and bank teller networks, and such operations are a prime target for the VAX line, especially the 9000.  Transaction processing "will be the savior of the VAX," which will probably last well into the 1990s, says Terry Shannon of International Data.  Meanwhile, Digital also is pushing ahead with new computer designs.  Its new line, priced substantially below the VAX, runs on Unix operating software with chips from MIPS Computer Systems Inc.  At first, Digital couldn't come up with a clear marketing theme for the two lines.  But now it has, analysts say.  "More than any computer maker, Digital has positioned itself as the company that can tie together computers running different operating systems and different software on the same network at the same time," says Marc G. Schulman, an analyst at UBS Securities Inc. Digital has developed software that weaves disparate systems into a single network, he adds.  That approach enables customers to buy Digital's proprietary VAX without fearing that their investment will become obsolete if they get Unix-based computers later, says Barry F. Willman of Sanford C. Bernstein & Co. "No one else is doing what Digital has done," he says.  IBM's Systems Applications Architecture is a similar concept, he notes, except that it focuses on integrating only IBM operating systems.  Mr. Schulman calls Digital's capability in this regard "one of Digital's strongest assets," but he complains that the company "has done a poor job, up to now, communicating this strategy to the world."  As it changes its image, Digital is also changing the way it is run.  Through the summer, executives forged a new management structure, dismantled marketing and product-strategy councils and rebuilt the sales operation.  Digital was broken into a portfolio of business segments, and a new operating committee has been formed, effectively tightening Mr. Olsen's control.  Insiders say Mr. Olsen manages the company like the engineer that he is, taking apart things that don't work and tinkering with them until they do.  "He tore apart the sales operation, and he didn't like what he saw," a senior manager says.  In the aftermath, John J. Shields, a dynamic senior vice president who just a year ago was seen as Mr. Olsen's heir apparent, appears out of favor.  And Charles E. Shue, who had been vice president of U.S. sales, quietly resigned last month.  With the contest to succeed Mr. Olsen clouded and the man himself in no hurry to go, speculation now centers on a new generation of managers.  "Replacing the founder can be the hardest transition a company can make," says John F. Smith, a senior vice president and himself a candidate.  "It's not like passing the baton from a fourth CEO to the fifth."  If Mr. Olsen has someone in mind, he isn't saying.  "It's wide open," he insists.  Though he used to say he would name a successor at age 65, he is 63 now and has no plans to retire.  "I've changed my mind," he says.  "They may have to kick me out."  Ashland Oil Inc.'s former chairman Orin E. Atkins pleaded guilty to two counts of conspiracy and wire fraud in a scheme to sell confidential company documents to Iran.  Mr. Atkins, chairman and chief executive officer from 1972 to 1981, said in a statement in federal court in New York yesterday that he regretted his action.  "I have fully cooperated with the U.S. government and it is impossible to describe how deeply I regret my involvement in these events and the pain I have caused to those I love and admire."  Mr. Atkins faces fines of up to $250,000 and five years in jail for each count.  Sentencing is scheduled Nov. 16 before U.S. District Judge Charles S. Haight, Manhattan.  In a related matter, Charles D. Barnett, an attorney formerly with a law firm that represented Ashland and some of its officers, was indicted on seven counts of conspiracy and wire fraud.  He will be arraigned next Thursday.  The charges against both men stem from a seven-year investigation by the U.S. Attorney's office in New York into allegations that the Ashland, Ky.-based company was defrauded by former officers who attempted to sell confidential documents and their consulting services to the National Iranian Oil Co.  The documents revealed information needed by the Iranians in their 1985 lawsuits against Ashland, which sought payment for $283 million of crude oil shipped in 1979.  Last week, Ashland agreed to pay Iran $325 million to settle the 10-year dispute.  Mr. Atkins, 65 years old, was arrested after U.S. Customs agents videotaped him in July 1988, instructing his associates to sell the documents to Iran.  A spokeswoman for Ashland said, "We have been outraged by this entire incident."  Company officials notified federal authorities two years ago that the Iranians had access to the documents and requested an investigation.  Ashland "was shocked to learn of Mr. Atkins's involvement," the spokeswoman said.  Mr. Barnett, 38, of Palm Beach, Fla., couldn't immediately be reached for comment.  Mr. Barnett was involved in obtaining the private documents from Ashland after Mr. Atkins had left the company, according to the charges.  The indictment said Mr. Barnett and others requested 25% of any money Iran received from Ashland's settlement of the lawsuits filed by Iran.  Federal officials said they are continuing their investigation.  No details on the investigation were available.  A federal judge ruled that the Philippine government can proceed with its suit charging Westinghouse Electric Co. and another company with bribing former Philippine President Ferdinand Marcos to win a nuclear power-plant contract.  Judge Dickinson R. Debevoise in Newark, N.J., ruled that it was too early to make a final determination to dismiss the case but that he would consider another such motion from Westinghouse after more evidence had been presented.  The suit concerns the construction of a $2.3 billion, 600-megawatt plant on the Bataan peninsula.  Construction, started in 1976, ended shortly before Mr. Marcos was ousted in a popular uprising three years ago.  The government of Corazon Aquino ordered that the plant could not begin operating because of alleged safety problems.  The Philippine government contends that Westinghouse caused Mr. Marcos to violate his fiduciary duty to the country by passing bribes to him through "consultants."  The government is seeking to recover its investment in the plant, along with damages and the alleged bribes.  In May, Judge Debevoise divided the suit into two parts.  The majority of claims, involving breach of contract, negligence, fraud and antitrust, were sent to the International Chamber of Commerce to be resolved through arbitration.  Those discussions are continuing.  Louis Briskman, deputy general counsel of Westinghouse, said the company asked the judge to dismiss the remaining allegations, in part, because the U.S. Justice Department had investigated the same claims and found no wrongdoing on the part of Westinghouse.  The International Chamber of Commerce also will decide on Westinghouse's request for $30 million in fees the company claims it is owed for work on the plant.  Judge Debevoise said the court could let the suit proceed without ruling on the "political question" of the legality or illegality of the Marcos regime.  The court must decide only whether bribery or the acceptance of a bribe was legal under the laws that applied at the time, the judge said.  In a statement following the decision, Philippine Secretary Sedfrey Ordonez said the ruling would allow the government to gain access to business records of Westinghouse and the other company named in the case, Burns & Roe Enterprises Inc., Oradell, N.J., concerning any transactions with Mr. Marcos.  Pittsburgh-based Westinghouse and Burns & Roe have denied that the consultancy fees were bribes.  Westinghouse's attorney, Mr. Briskman, said the company would file a response to the charges; the judge gave the company two months to do so.  "The Philippine government is looking for a scapegoat to pick up the cost of the plant.  We've never committed bribery," Mr. Briskman said.  An attorney for the Philippine government declined to comment on the case.  BRUNO'S INC.'S new 6 1/2% convertible subordinated debentures were rated triple-B-plus by Standard & Poor's Corp.  The rating was misstated in yesterday's list of new securities issues.  (See: "New Securities Issues" -- WSJ Sept. 14, 1989)  Your Aug. 17 editorial page contained "The Poem Heard Round the World," with Richard F. Barrett's comment on Edwin Markham's poem "The Man With a Hoe," inspired by Millet's painting.  The theme is in these stirring lines:  O masters, lords and rulers in all  lands,  How will the future reckon with this  man?  How answer his brute questions in that  hour  When whirlwinds of rebellion shake all  shores?  Mr. Barrett was reminded of China and the Soviet Union, and he asked whether stronger societies there could make these countries "more formidable adversaries" for the West and "fiercer competition for diminishing resources."  I reply from history that poverty and hopelessness nourish the rise of dictators, whose demagoguery uses the carrot of a better life to raise armies by further impoverishing the populace.  Roy Campbell, born in South Africa, wrote (years after Markham) in "The Serf":  The ploughman drives  Over the toppled clods and falling  flowers,  The timeless, surly patience of the  serf  That moves the nearest to the naked  earth  And ploughs down palaces, and  thrones, and towers.  Both of these poets sang a song of all mankind.  Mr. Barrett and the rest of us should never fear that others, too, may achieve freedom, knowledge and security.  Wars are made of lesser stuff.  Harry Polikoff  New York  ---  Rather than characterize the "stirrings" of China and the Soviet Union in the commercial perspective of "more customers" or the foreboding language of "formidable adversaries," is it not possible to see in these awakenings the genesis of a new emergence of the importance of human rights? . . .  remembering other words of Edwin Markham.  We are blind until we see  That in the human plan  Nothing is worth the making  If it does not make the man.  Why build these cities glorious  If man unbuilded goes?  In vain we build the world  Unless the builder also grows.  Edward F. Krieg  Washington  ---  Mr. Barrett suggests too strongly to be ignored that Edwin Markham's prophecy in "The Man With a Hoe" was fulfilled in China recently when Millet's "Man With a Hoe" demonstrated for reform.  I think not.  I think the brutality with which the demonstrations were suppressed was possible only because the Chinese government judged, quite correctly, that the man with the hoe was not yet ready to lift it in support of the actual demonstrators, the students.  The peasant, typically, is an archconservative, not able to perceive the extent of his degradation and wholly supportive of authority.  By an extraordinary coincidence you quoted Edmund Burke's anticipatory refutation of Markham's romantic notion in the column adjacent to Mr. Barrett's essay: "It is not to be imagined, because a political system is, under certain aspects, very unwise in its contrivance, and very mischievous in its effects, that it therefore can have no long duration.  Its very defects may tend to its stability, because they are agreeable to its nature."  Failure to understand the political inertia of the man with the hoe can lead to suicidal miscalculations, as we demonstrated with the Bay of Pigs invasion.  John R. Powell  Pinckney, Mich.  ---  Mr. Barrett seems to have substituted a new line for one in the original.  The original, as I have always known it, is:  When this dumb terror shall appeal  to God  After the silence of the centuries?  It now appears:  When this dumb terror shall rise to  the judge of the world,  After the silence of the centuries?  This would appear to be not only without poetic license, but of course ruins the meter of the poem.  I am wondering who granted the license, if such be the case; or is it in deference to the Soviets, who might prefer judge to "God"?  Heskin A. Whittaker  Orlando, Fla.  ---  In regard to questions concerning the changed line in Markham's poem: My source was "The Britannica Library of Great American Writing," edited by Louis Untermeyer.  It is hard for me to believe Mr. Untermeyer would have changed Markham's text, considering his stature in the literary world.  I cannot help wondering if perhaps Markham, like W.B. Yeats, went on revising his works after they were published.  Richard F. Barrett  San Jose, Calif.  Rep. Harold Ford of Tennessee is a member of the Black Caucus.  He says he has heard from a lot of middle-class blacks on cutting capital gains.  "They're saying you ought to take a second look at this."  Yesterday, House Ways and Means Democrats did just that, setting off what could be a tax revolt in the Democratic Party itself.  Despite enormous political pressure, the Gang of Six dissident Democrats on Ways and Means held together and passed a capital-gains tax cut 19 to 17.  Democratic Rep. Ed Jenkins won approval of his plan to drop the top rate on capital gains to 19.6% from 28% for 2 1/2 years and then index it for inflation after that.  Almost as significant is the last-minute political maneuvering that took place around the bill.  On Wednesday Chairman Dan Rostenkowski apparently had reached a sensible compromise with Rep. Jenkins to cut the tax on capital gains.  The deal collapsed when the Democratic leadership, led by Majority Leader Richard Gephardt, demanded that he repudiate it.  It appears that the Democratic leadership can't find a way to concede that George Bush and the dissident Democrats have the political and economic high ground on capital gains.  They verge on apoplexy in attacking a capital-gains cut.  "This was George Bush's idea to help out his wealthy friends, and the people who are going to wind up paying for it are the middle class," cries Rumpelstiltskin Gephardt.  Sounds to us like the same class-warfare strategy that sent Mr. Gephardt's presidential bid crashing to earth after Iowa; if he's intent on taking the House Democrats for the same ride, it's fine with us.  It turns out, however, that regular Members returned from their districts after the August recess having received an education on who all benefits from a lower rate on capital gains.  Rep. Tom McMillen, a Maryland Democrat, sees a capital-gains tax cut not as a populist class-war issue but as a way to spur economic growth and reward investment: "It's as important for the woman who sells her hair salon as to a millionaire," he says.  Faced with a mini-revolt in their party, House Speaker Foley and Majority Leader Gephardt have now backed off earlier threats to make capital gains a test of party loyalty.  But they want to kill or cripple the bill, most likely by hanging as many liberal ornaments on it as possible.  Senator Bentsen, for example, is talking about substituting a revival of Individual Retirement Accounts for a capital-gains rate cut.  We have nothing in particular against IRAs, but that's a matter for another day, namely the murky subject of personal savings rates.  We don't know that the Democratic establishment can win this fight by trying to change the subject.  Indeed, if there's one thing Mr. Bush and the tax-revolt Democrats have to do with the capital-gains bill from here on out it's Keep It Clean.  The folks back home will understand what's at stake, even while the small band in Speaker Foley's office is trying to give the Democrats credit for destroying it.  ALASKA AIR GROUP Inc.'s order of six McDonnell Douglas Corp. MD-80 aircraft will be delivered between October 1993 and March 1995.  A recent edition misstated the plane model and the delivery dates.  (See: "Business Brief -- Alaska Air Group Inc.: Purchase of Six MD-60 Jets for $180 Million Is Planned" -- WSJ Sept. 13, 1989)  Credit ratings on about $3 billion of long-term debt and $900 million of preferred stock of Chemical Banking Corp. and certain subsidiaries were cut by Standard & Poor's Corp.  The move reflects the bank holding company's "slower-than-expected progress in reducing high levels of non-performing assets, particularly in Texas, and relatively large exposures to Latin American borrowers, particularly Brazil and Mexico," the rating concern said.  S&P called "below average" Chemical's level of tangible capital and its reserves to cover problem loans.  "These risks are partly mitigated by a successful middle market and consumer franchise in the New York metropolitan area, good non-Texas-based domestic asset quality and a strong global foreign exchange trading capability," S&P said.  The rating downgrades include, among others, the senior debt of the parent and Chemical New York N.V., to single-A-minus from single-A; the parent's subordinated debt to triple-B-plus from single-A-minus, and its commercial paper to single-A-2 from single-A-1.  A spokesman for Chemical said the downgrade "does not reflect a deterioration in our financial or credit condition."  Nonperforming assets at Chemical's Texas Commerce Bancshares unit "peaked in the second quarter of 1988 and have been trending down every quarter since," the spokesman said.  "We are confident that this decline will continue," he said.  As for the bank's loan exposure to less-developed countries, the spokesman said: "Most analysts look at our reserves as a percent of medium- and long-term loans outstanding.  As of June 30, 1989, this ratio was 29%.  Our money-center-bank peers are clustered around 30%."  Responding to S&P's remarks about capital adequacy, the spokesman said the bank's common equity at June 30 was 4.2% of total assets, up from 2.94% at the end of 1987.  From "Soviet Military Power," 6th edition, March 1987, published by the U.S. Department of Defense:  The Sverdlovsk Biological Warfare Facility: Events of 1979.  During early April 1979, an accidental release of anthrax occurred in Sverdlovsk that caused many casualties and most likely a very high death rate among Soviet citizens who were exposed.  The government at that time admitted only to some public health problems, which it said were caused by the illegal sale of anthrax-contaminated meat.  Soviet leaders have never acknowledged the existence of the Sverdlovsk facility.  The U.S. Government has often requested an explanation of what happened in Sverdlovsk, but the Soviets persist in blaming contaminated meat for the anthrax epidemic.  Our analysis shows that the following events occurred:  -- Early in April 1979, an accidental release of anthrax occurred within the Microbiology and Virology Institute in Sverdlovsk City.  The Institute is a military facility located in the southwestern outskirts of the city.  While bulk quantities of anthrax spores in dry form were probably being prepared, a pressurized system most likely exploded.  -- As much as 10 kilograms of dry anthrax spores were released from the institute.  -- The bacterial aerosol contaminated an area with a radius of at least 3 to 5 kilometers.  -- Within two weeks, which is within the time frame expected for the disease to develop, a significant number of deaths occurred.  -- Residents and workers within the contaminated area contracted pulmonary anthrax through inhalation.  Additionally, some may have contracted anthrax by skin contact and, over time, a number may have contracted anthrax by consumption of food contaminated by the fallout of spores.  -- Initial disinfection and decontamination procedures were largely ineffective.  -- Mass immunizations with the Soviet anthrax vaccine were partially effective at best.  -- Vaccinations and antibiotic treatment were administered too late as an initial response. -- Containment procedures were effective in confining the problem to the southwest area of Sverdlovsk City.  -- Strict censorship as to the true nature of the incident served to neutralize early panic and to limit the fears of the Sverdlovsk population.  -- Containment procedures continued into July 1979.  Some inspection procedures were conducted until fall 1979.  In summary:  -- A major outbreak of anthrax occurred at a closed military installation.  -- The Soviets have persisted in claiming that a routine outbreak of anthrax among animals caused intestinal anthrax among people who consumed the bad meat.  -- The extraordinary efforts to "cleanup" are inconsistent with the Soviet explanation.  -- Reports surfaced that hundreds of Soviet citizens died from inhalation anthrax within 7 to 10 days of the outbreak despite heroic efforts by Soviet doctors to save their lives.  -- Other reports stated that in subsequent weeks, 1,000 or more cases may have developed.  These figures are about 100 or more times the annual incidence of inhalation and intestinal anthrax throughout the U.S.S.R. in recent years.  -- Heavy military involvement and early military casualties immediately after the accident, total military control within two weeks, plus rooftop spraying of decontaminating solutions from aircraft are not consistent with public health control measures for dealing with anthrax acquired by eating bad meat.  -- The reported aerial spraying activity and disinfection with steam and hypochlorite solution around the military facility were clearly intended to decontaminate surfaces affected by an infectious aerosol.  Collectively, these events are a very strong contradiction of the Soviet position that the anthrax outbreak was just a public health problem resulting from the sale of contaminated meat.  ---  From testimony by Dr. Barry Erlick, biological weapons analyst, U.S. Army, before the Senate Governmental Affairs Committee and the Permanent Subcommittee on Investigations, Feb. 1989:  Sen. LIEBERMAN: Dr. Erlick, Judge Webster, in his testimony this morning, suggested that one of the inhibitions that may keep some nations from getting into chemical and biological warfare is the prospect of accident.  I believe I just heard you make reference to the incident in Russia in 1979, and I gather there's still -- which was an outbreak of anthrax.  Dr. ERLICK: That's correct.  Sen. LIEBERMAN: Is it your best judgment that that resulted from an accident in a biological weapons production facility?  Dr. ERLICK: Yes, it is.  It's the assessment of the intelligence community.  Sen. LIEBERMAN: All right.  And can you just describe for us what the impact -- first, what you understand the nature of the accident was  Dr. ERLICK: Sure.  Sen. LIEBERMAN: -- was there an explosion?  And then, what the impact was on the civilian population.  Dr. ERLICK: Yes.  What happened basically in 1979, April, they did have, we believe, an explosion.  Approximately ten pounds of anthrax was released.  The cloud did travel some distance, and they suffered an undetermined amount of deaths.  But the point is that they were significant -- that it was a significant number and that initially many of these deaths were due to pulmonary anthrax so they died very quickly and very gruesomely.  This facility was identified as a biological warfare facility, and it was difficult in terms of their controlling the accident because they had to spray subsequent to the accident and treat the people medically.  So, it was a significant problem.  We could sort of call it "biological Chernobyl."  Sen. LIEBERMAN: Do I understand that the Soviets still deny that that was an explosion that  Dr. ERLICK: Yes, they do.  We've had several iterations from the Soviets.  Sen. LIEBERMAN: All right.  But our conclusion is that it clearly was an explosion in the facility.  Dr. ERLICK: Yes, it is, absolutely.  Sen. LIEBERMAN: And that would clearly say that that was a violation of the 1972 accords between the two countries.  Dr. ERLICK: Yes, that would be.  ---  A related editorial appears nearby. {See: "REVIEW & OUTLOOK (Editorial): Test of Glasnost" -- WSJ Sept. 15, 1989}  COAST SAVINGS FINANCIAL Inc.'s restructuring program includes an offer to holders of convertible bonds to exchange 54 common shares for each $1,000 of bonds.  Tuesday's edition misstated the terms of the offer.  (See: "Coast Savings Plans Major Restructuring in Response to Law" -- WSJ Sept. 12, 1989)  Turned off by James Wright's ethics scandal, challenge-proof incumbents and their party's stands on some issues, liberal small donors have deserted House Democrats by the thousands.  Their donations to the Democratic Congressional Campaign Committee, political arm of the party's House members, plunged by nearly two-thirds in the 12 months ended June 30, to below $1.1 million.  The DCCC has cushioned the blow by carrying on a two-way love affair with political-action committees, which increased their giving during the same period by 18%, to $1.9 million.  When asked what he would do without PAC funds, the DCCC's executive director, Richard Bates, says, "I don't want to find out."  Meanwhile the committee's chairman, Rep. Beryl Anthony (D., Ark.) is rallying colleagues against various Republican proposals to eliminate business and labor PACs or to cut their donation limit to $1,000.  "That's moving in the wrong direction," he says, praising PACs as "a way for small donors to participate in the system."  His affection is reciprocated.  "We like the fact that Beryl is supporting PACs," says Steven Stockmeyer, lobbyist for the National Association of Business PACs.  The dramatic loss of small-donor support has forced staff reductions and cost-cutting measures at the DCCC, and even labor unrest at the committee's unionized television studio, where party officials are gingerly attempting to negotiate a more favorable new contract.  The committee borrowed $1 million last year and has been stretched further by an unexpectedly large number of special House elections this year, in which it has spent nearly $280,000 so far.  At last report on July 30, it owed $1.7 million -- more than the debts of all other national Democratic and Republican party committees combined.  The committee doesn't seem to be hurt politically, at least not yet.  With help from borrowed funds, it increased financial aid to candidates to $3.1 million in the 1988 elections, up from $2.2 million in 1986.  Democrats gained three House seats despite George Bush's landslide, increasing their majority to 260 to 175.  Furthermore, Democrats have held their own during the six special elections decided so far this year.  They lost one seat to the Republicans in Florida but picked up a formerly GOP seat in Indiana.  In balloting Tuesday, Democrats held on to Mr. Wright's seat in Texas and the California district formerly represented by the committee's ex-chairman, Tony Coelho.  "We do not discount them as a first-class political operation," says John Buckley, spokesman for the rival National Republican Congressional Committee.  Most party committees have seen their small donations decline in recent years, but the DCCC experienced a remarkable collapse starting about a year ago.  An analysis of its reports to the Federal Election Commission shows that persons giving $200 or less gave just under $1.1 million in the year ended June 30, down from $2.8 million a year earlier.  Party officials say much of the money was siphoned off by their presidential candidate, Michael Dukakis, who raised millions through direct-mail appeals to liberal donors.  Some also was drained by Jesse Jackson's populist solicitations.  "Plenty of liberal money moved to Jackson," says Roger Craver, who was the DCCC's direct-mail consultant until a few months ago.  DCCC officials say Speaker Wright's problems hurt the committee badly.  His signature on direct-mail appeals never did work as well as that of his popular predecessor, Thomas O'Neill, even in the best of times.  And this year, says Mr. Bates, "The speaker's troubles came to the forefront. . . .  We went three to four months and the only thing people were reading about Congress was the {proposed} 51% pay raise and Jim Wright is under investigation."  Also, donors don't believe Democrats are in danger of losing their huge majority.  For years liberals gave partly because they feared Republicans could make good on their talk of seizing control of the House in a political realignment.  But now the commentary is about a "challenge-proof Congress" in which House incumbents, fat with PAC money and official perquisites, have won more than 98% of the time in each of the last two elections.  Mr. Craver says the news media began to focus on that theme about a year ago.  "That's when we started to see the permanent fall-off," he says.  "It was related to the perception on the part of the donors that the committee didn't need money."  The DCCC hasn't found much profit in current issues, either.  Liberals used to open their checkbooks to Democrats at the mention of Reagan plans for aid to Nicaraguan Contra rebels or nuclear disarmament, but both those themes have faded in the Bush-Gorbachev era.  "We were void of any cutting issues," says Mr. Schloss.  President Bush's desire to reduce capital-gains taxes for investors was made to order for a populist Democratic appeal; Speaker Thomas Foley blasted it as a giveaway to the rich.  But the DCCC couldn't exploit that one -- Chairman Anthony, who is pro-business, is siding with Republicans for a lowered rate.  Democrats also find themselves in bad standing with elderly donors, who used to give heavily from fear that Republicans would cut Social Security benefits.  But now pensioners are up in arms over a scheduled surtax to pay for new benefits.  "We were out crowing about increased benefits under health care, and suddenly this controversy came up about funding," Rep. Anthony laments.  With small donations in a slump, the DCCC is courting not only PACs but individual business donors as well.  A special August dinner costing $1,000 per person raised $400,000, with more promised.  Mr. Anthony enthusiastically plans an even bigger dinner next year, to raise perhaps $1 million.  But Mr. Carver, for one, says the $1,000 donors are less motivated by liberal ideology than by business interests.  "It's all what I call asphalt-contractor money," he says.  Party aides say their mail-solicitation money is doing a little better now, particularly a "memorial letter" eulogizing the late Rep. Claude Pepper, champion of the elderly.  "I'm upbeat about where it's headed," Rep. Anthony says.  Meanwhile Democrats embrace their other donors.  Rep. Anthony says he woos business PAC leaders by telling them that a way to avoid being criticized for giving exclusively to incumbents is to give some money to the DCCC.  And Mr. Stockmeyer, the business-PAC lobbyist, says that when he visits Democratic lawmakers to line up opposition to anti-PAC proposals, "the most frequent message we get is, why are you meeting with us Democrats?  We like you."  CONGRESS CAREENS toward a budget crisis amid bitter spending debates.  Cutting capital-gains taxes and modifying catastrophic health care defy compromise.  Differences on anti-drug spending add budget uncertainty.  Indiana Rep. Hamilton calls the fiscal 1990 budget deliberations "awful and deteriorating" as lawmakers approach the Oct. 16 deadline that would trigger automatic spending cuts.  Probable amendments to legislation to raise the federal debt ceiling above $3 trillion by Oct. 31 compound budget worries.  Texas Sen. Gramm wants to set deficit goals through fiscal 1999 and remove the Social Security surplus from the calculations after fiscal 1993.  Budget chief Darman argues for reducing the deficit first and tinkering with the law later.  Meeting next fiscal year's deficit goal will be even tougher because of plans to expand Medicaid and build prisons.  BANK TROUBLES could follow the path of savings and loans, some experts warn.  The banking industry is shakier than regulators have let on, critics contend.  The FDIC expects bank failures to total about 200 this year; it rescued 220 last year, when its bank-insurance fund registered the first loss ever -- more than $4 billion.  Regulators have about 1,000 banks with $100 billion in assets on their "problem" list.  "It is possible that losses in the commercial banking industry could eclipse those of the thrift industry," Robert Litan of Brookings Institution and Dan Brumbaugh of Stanford say in a paper.  Regulators say that the fears are overstated and that problem banks are on the decline.  The issue will be examined next week by a subcommittee headed by Rep. Annunzio.  BENTSEN BOOSTS his presidential hopes by seeking to sharply expand IRAs.  The Texas senator's call to increase the tax-deductible savings plans rather than cut the capital-gains tax wins praise.  "It's great politics," says Democratic consultant Greg Schneiders.  IRAs would benefit more voters than a capital-gains tax cut mainly for the wealthy.  The idea, predicts Democratic strategist Horace Busby, "will help push Bentsen out front for 1992."  Bentsen's move gives Democrats an alternative to Bush's drive to cut the capital-gains tax.  He still needs a victory on the plan to score big, but even a close defeat would be a political plus.  "Maybe, after all, the Democrats do have a triple-digit IQ," says GOP theorist Kevin Phillips.  Bentsen, who analysts think has decided to run for president, is scheduled to speak at a major political dinner next month in Iowa.  INTERNAL SQUABBLING slows two NATO proposals that the U.S. had hoped to present when conventional arms-reduction talks with the Soviets resumed last week.  Greece balks at limits on troop movements that might interfere with its testy relationship with Turkey.  Italy and France object that tight verification on arms plants might spill their foreign-trade secrets.  GUN CONTROLLERS intend to take a shot at helping fight the war on drugs by pressing gun restrictions.  Advocates such as Ohio Sen. Metzenbaum consider cracking down harder on assault weapons.  But the administration resists anti-gun moves.  FRUITFUL EXCHANGE?  Israel nears an agreement to export fruit and vegetables to the Soviet Union.  In return, Tel Aviv is expected to seek steps to encourage the direct emigration of Soviet Jews to Israel.  Currently, most Jews who leave the Soviet Union don't end up in Israel.  DISEASE DEBATE?  The nation's AIDS research chief, Anthony Fauci, worries about a possible "backlash in funding" for AIDS because of competing demands for cancer and heart research.  The government will spend $1.31 billion this year to research AIDS, which will kill about 34,000 Americans, compared with $1.01 billion to study heart disease, which will kill about 778,000.  CONGRESS DIGS for more dirt in the HUD scandal as Kemp ponders reforms.  A House subcommittee explores contradictions to testimony by former HUD Secretary Pierce, who in an about-face canceled a planned appearance today.  Democrats hope to show in later hearings that the Reagan White House had a hand in doling out funds to Republican faithful.  The panel also will probe a former Denver HUD official, Michael Queenan, who donated $100,000 to the GOP last year after getting HUD subsidies for projects in which he had a stake.  HUD chief Kemp considers changes being debated internally: rental subsidies that would lead to home ownership, and creating nonprofit groups to generate federal mortgage insurance business in inner cities.  Another idea: Encourage pension funds and insurance companies to invest $1 billion each in low- and moderate-income housing.  Those who believe "the time has come for a major change in the direction of national housing policy," says one memo to Kemp, "are waiting for a leader."  MINOR MEMOS: Recalling his Democratic Convention fiasco, Arkansas Gov. Clinton jokes that speeches by governors are being discouraged at Bush's education summit for fear "I'm going to give the one I gave last year." . . .  Rep. Lantos, who is probing the scandal at the Department of Housing and Urban Development, hits the speaker circuit with a speech he dubs "The Long HUD Summer." . . .  Begorra] Included in an interest group's list of Italian-Americans in Congress is Sen. Patrick Leahy; his mother was Italian.  SOUTHLAND CORP., based in Dallas, is the nation's largest convenience-store operator.  The company was misidentified in yesterday's edition.  (See: "Circle K Calls Off Search for Buyer, Suspends Dividend" -- WSJ Sept. 14, 1989)  Moody's Investors Service Inc. said it raised the ratings on about $2 billion of securities of Coastal Corp. and its subsidiaries.  The ratings concern raised the Houston-based energy company's senior debt rating to Baa-3 from Ba-1 and assigned a Baa-3 rating to the company's planned $200 million senior debenture issue.  Moody's said the upgrades were prompted by Coastal's improving financial condition, which will be helped by a planned equity sale, as well as expected earnings growth.  Moody's also upgraded Coastal's senior debentures, notes and Eurobonds to Baa-3 from Ba-1, its senior subordinated notes to Ba-1 from Ba-2 and subordinated notes to Ba-2 from Ba-3.  Also upgraded are the ratings of Coastal's ANR Pipeline Co. unit's first mortgage bonds to Baa-1 from Baa-2 and ANR's debentures to Baa-2 from Baa-3.  And, the ratings of the company's Colorado Interstate Gas Co. unit's first mortgage bonds were raised to Baa- 1 from Baa-2 and debentures to Baa-2 from Baa-3.  The Nashville Network, in a move that may foreshadow increasing symbiotic links between television and the publishing business, is putting out its own magazine.  The first issue of Country America, the magazine of the country-oriented cable-TV channel, went on sale this week with a run of about 400,000 copies.  The introduction follows last week's announcement by Capital Cities/ABC Inc. that it has been testing its own magazine to promote daytime soaps on its ABC network.  Country America, which bills itself as a "magazine for those who enjoy the country way of life and country music," crisscrosses the boundaries between electronic and print media.  Its structure permits a dizzying loop of "cross-media merchandising" opportunities, including what appear to be the first-ever ads inside ads.  Country America is a venture between the Nashville Network, the closely held operation whose owners also run Opryland USA; Group W Satellite Communications, the Westinghouse Electric Co. unit that markets and distributes the network's offerings to 46 million U.S. households; and Meredith Corp., the Des Moines, Iowa, publisher of Ladies' Home Journal, Better Homes and Gardens and a host of other home-and-craft-oriented magazines.  The country-radio network jointly owned by Group W and the Nashville Network touts the magazine, which itself is stuffed with promos for the Nashville Network.  The network in turn carries ads plugging the new magazine -- through spots called "The Country America Minute."  But only half of the minute is spent touting the magazine, with the rest filled by two 15-second inserts that, the network says, "showcase advertisers' print creatives."  Under that unusual approach, viewers are shown pictures of printed ads appearing in a magazine they're being asked to buy.  Nashville Network and Group W dreamed up Country America as a way to bolster interest in the country network, and to publish the channel's listings at a time when the outpouring of cable fare makes it difficult for many viewers to know what's on.  They then brought their brainchild to Meredith, which controls editorial content and prints the magazine.  Country America, which costs $1.95 on the newsstands, was designed to stand on its own.  Indeed, it devotes about 80% of its coverage to country "life style" matters -- the October issue takes a look at a national storytelling festival, fall fishing in the Ozarks and a feature on autumn cooking, among other things.  A spokeswoman for the venture notes that such folksy topics are "consistent with our mix on the network," which beams to viewers shows about fishing, traveling in recreational vehicles and country cooking, in addition to plaintive country crooners.  A minimum 20% of each month's features relate to country music -- the network's bread and butter.  And each issue will carry an eight-page program guide to the network's offerings.  Says the venture's spokeswoman, "Advertisers want value-added advertising," instead of simply buying 30-second spots.  "They want involvement in programming, or involvement like this, in a magazine."  "Country America and the Nashville Network complement each other editorially and in audience," says the magazine's publisher, James Gabal.  In a release, he calls the free TV plug for qualifying magazine advertisers "a package that can't be matched by any other buy."  In the planned Capital Cities/ABC magazine, it's understood that ABC will offer ad packages that tie in daytime commercial time with pages in the magazine, and the network will peddle subscriptions to the publication, to be called Episodes, during ad breaks.  Farm & Home Financial Corp. said it has been indicted by a grand jury in St. Louis in connection with a former employee's alleged failure to report certain monetary transactions to the government.  Lynn Ewing, general counsel for Farm & Home, said the transactions involved the purchase of $100,000 and $120,000 in money orders on two separate dates in 1984.  Under U.S law, if a money order valued at more than $10,000 is purchased in a single day, it is considered a reportable transaction, he said.  Farm & Home said the transaction may have been part of money laundering scheme that "appears to have been perpetrated by individuals unrelated to the company."  The company said that at no time did it, or any of its employees benefit as a result of the alleged scheme, nor is it alleged in the indictment that they did.  Farm & Home said it has strict provisions in place for proper federal regulatory reporting.  When it discovered the transactions, the company said it promptly notified the appropriate federal authorities.  The company said it will "vigorously contest" the grand jury's charges as it relates to Farm & Home.  New York Daily News Editor F. Gilman Spencer resigned yesterday after a week of internal strife at the paper over the endorsement of a candidate in the city's Democratic mayoral primary.  James Hoge, publisher and president of the Daily News, quickly named James P. Willse, the paper's managing editor, to succeed Mr. Spencer in the top editor's post.  Mr. Hoge could not be reached for comment, but in a news release said he accepted Mr. Spencer's resignation "with regret."  While some members of the Daily News staff said Mr. Spencer's unexpected departure was directly related to the endorsement issue, Mr. Spencer denied that was the case.  "We are spirited people at this paper," said Mr. Spencer.  "We had fun discussing the endorsement.  This was just an appropriate time to go."  The fight over the endorsement started in recent weeks because Mr. Hoge favored endorsing Mayor Edward I. Koch; Mr. Spencer, along with other top editors, wanted to endorse Manhattan Borough President David Dinkins, the only black candidate and the eventual winner of the primary.  In a compromise, the paper endorsed Richard Ravitch, a businessman and former chairman of the Metropolitan Transportation Authority, who finished poorly in the primary.  Because of Mr. Spencer's age, 64, there has been continued speculation in recent years that he would retire, though it wasn't expected any time soon.  Mr. Spencer came to the Daily News, owned by Chicago-based Tribune Co., five years ago after serving as editor at the Philadelphia Daily News.  A Daily News staff columnist who asked not to be identified said Mr. Spencer's resignation was indeed a surprise, but added there was a widespread feeling of excitement among staff members about Mr. Willse's appointment.  "Spencer was charming but not really hands-on, while Willse is much more in control," the columnist said.  "Willse is a die-hard New Yorker and is much more decisive than Spencer.  There is a feeling some new things will happen here."  Mr. Willse, 45, is a New York native and son of a New York police detective.  John Cotter, metropolitan editor of the rival New York Post, also describes Mr. Willse as a more hands-on editor.  "The staff at the Daily News should be overjoyed.  This is good for the News," said Mr. Cotter.  The Daily News, which faces continued competition from a recently revived New York Post and Times Mirror Co.'s New York Newsday, has critical labor negotiations with New York's 10 newspaper unions next March.  In 1987, Mr. Hoge bargained for and won union concessions equal to $25 million in annual operating savings, which he said the paper needed to continue publishing.  Mr. Spencer said he wanted to leave the paper before the labor negotiations began.  Mr. Hoge did not name a successor to Mr. Willse as managing editor, though sources at the paper said one of the leading candidates is Sharon Rosenhause, a former editor and reporter for the Los Angeles Times, and currently deputy managing editor for projects, reporting to Mr. Willse.  Two familiar giants are squaring off in Evansville, Ind., and it looks like McWar.  Pizza Hut Inc., the nation's largest pizza chain, is launching an advertising campaign that attacks McDonald's Corp.'s entry into the pizza business.  Thirty-second television commercials, which were to begin running last night in the Evansville market, combine humor and nastiness in knocking McDonald's for using frozen dough.  The spots liken McDonald's dough to a hockey puck being slapped around the TV screen.  "Don't be McFooled," the ad counsels.  Noting that PepsiCo Inc.'s Pizza Hut uses only fresh pizza dough, the commercial advises viewers, "Get a fresh-baked pan pizza from Pizza Hut."  When McDonald's, the world's biggest fast-food chain, tried another pizza product in 1987, its frozen dough "received a cold reception," the spot claims.  A McDonald's spokesman said the company wanted to thank Pizza Hut "for giving our own ad campaign some extra topping."  The spokesman added that "customers seem to be loving" the McDonald's pizza, though he wouldn't be more specific about how the new product is faring.  McDonald's is testing pizza in Evansville as part of an effort to entice customers in during the dinner hour -- its slowest time of the day.  In Texas, McDonald's is testing a fried chicken product.  So far, Kentucky Fried Chicken Corp., another PepsiCo unit, hasn't gone after McDonald's with any ads.  But, says a spokesman for the chicken chain, "We're certainly watching the test closely."  Though Pizza Hut's spots are done with what the company's marketers say is a "wink," the chain is serious about stopping McDonald's before it rolls out a competing product nationwide.  Pizza Hut, based in Wichita, Kan., now has 22% of the $14 billion-a-year market for pizza, which doesn't include sales at grocery stores.  Two other big pizza chains say they're taking a wait-and-see attitude toward McDonald's new product.  "We want to wait for {McDonald's} to establish their initial effort before we have something to react to," says a spokesman for Domino's Inc., No. 2 in the pizza market with a 17% share.  The delivery-based chain says it will research the impact of McDonald's test in Evansville on Domino's 12 area outlets, as well as where the McDonald's pizza customers are coming from.  The Evansville franchisee for Little Caesar's, the nation's No. 3 pizza chain, is taking a more relaxed attitude toward McDonald's pizza rollout, which has become one of the most closely watched tests ever of a fast-food product.  "McDonald's will sell some pizza," says B.T. Atherton, vice president of L&A Ventures Inc., which operates a dozen Little Caesar's restaurants in the Evansville area.  "But," he adds, "as with most things, when people think of pizza, they don't necessarily think of McDonald's -- just as they don't think of them for steak or barbecue."  Mr. Atherton has sampled McDonald's product.  His verdict: "It's very apparent that the crust is not made fresh daily."  Pizza Hut is hammering away at that point in print ads in the Evansville papers.  "Great-tasting pizza is nothing to be clowned around with," the full-page ad says.  It isn't "McFrozen.  We offer a choice of three great crusts.  Not just McOne.  We have 12 toppings. . . .  They McDon't.  And finally, we have great pizzas for lunch and dinner.  Not just after McFour o'clock."  The ad carries a line describing it as "a public service message."  A Pizza Hut marketing official says that was done in jest, but a spokeswoman for the Advertising Council, a New York-based group that places public service ads for a variety of nonprofit organizations, questions whether it's appropriate.  "I'm surprised they're allowed to leave that on there.  Usually a public-service ad can't promote a product," she said.  In July, McDonald's began testing four varieties of a 14-inch pizza in two stores and in recent weeks expanded the test into 24 company-owned stores in and around Evansville.  McDonald's is the latest of several companies to choose the Evansville area, which has representative demographics, as a test market.  Evansville also is where Procter & Gamble Co. first tested its Crest toothpaste.  As part of that test, McDonald's is blitzing the market with advertisements that emphasize the speed with which its pizza is baked.  It will take no more than 5 1/2 minutes, promise the ads, which take a swipe at the longer time people normally wait for a restaurant pizza.  "It's just unreal how they've hit this market," Mr. Atherton says.  "They run {ads} just about every hour, day and night.  They've pulled out all the stops."  Though McDonald's, based in Oak Brook, Ill., says this pizza may not be any more successful than others it has tried, some small pizza operators in the test market aren't waiting.  Coupons offering several dollars off competing products are available.  Pizza Hut isn't cutting prices, but it is doing just about everything else to trip up McDonald's, including taste tests with hundreds of customers, says David Novak, senior vice president of marketing.  "We had overwhelming taste preference," Mr. Novak says.  "It was hard to find people who didn't like our pizza better.  Our crust is superior, our toppings are superior."  Mr. Novak describes McDonald's product as "frozen pizza, a little bit better."  Broadway Management Co., which gambled on purchasing older office buildings in Manhattan in heavily leveraged transactions, has lost control of close to a dozen properties because it is unable to pay its debts.  The big New York developer met with dozens of creditors earlier this week in an attempt to restructure loans on the remainder of its portfolio, real estate sources say.  "Broadway Management is in active discussions with its lenders and is optimistic that we can all arrive at terms that will permit us to continue as a viable organization," a Broadway spokesman said.  Broadway's difficulty paying its bills has led it to yield effective control over about half of its 26 properties to one of its investment partners, Berisford Capital Corp. Berisford is a U.S. unit of Berisford International PLC, London, a publicly held firm that had 1988 revenue of about $4.6 billion.  In a real estate partnership, when one partner can't meet its financial obligations another can take over debt payments and seize control of the assets, as happened here, real estate experts say.  However, in the Broadway situation, the official ownership rights of each party are yet to be determined.  For tax and other reasons, it's not always in the best interests of the controlling company to assume ownership.  Despite what many insist is the solid, long-term value of Broadway's properties, which industry sources estimate are worth several billion dollars, real estate people see the company's troubles as a cautionary tale about overreaching in the high-stakes world of Manhattan real estate.  They say Broadway is only one of a group of highly leveraged Manhattan developers that have spread themselves too thin in a rising market -- and are unprepared to wait out a downturn.  The recent events mark an unhappy turn in the fortunes of Joseph Neumann, a principal in Broadway Management, who bought into the expanding New York real estate market during the 1980s by buying older, well-located buildings that needed substantial work.  Many of them were in lower Manhattan's financial district.  Outbidding competitors, the developer paid top dollar for the properties, spent still more on improvements and borrowed money at high interest rates.  In a rising market, it looked as if he had a good, although risky, investment.  But, industry people say, Mr. Neumann bit off more than he could chew in 1987 when he paid an exceptionally high price of $350 million to acquire a 15-property portfolio.  Now, in a softer Manhattan commercial real estate market, Broadway has been unable to meet interest and other debt payments.  Berisford, with its deeper pockets, believes it can do better.  "We can go the long term," says Sholem Greenbaum, Berisford executive vice president.  He says his company is paying all capital expenditures, and managing and leasing the buildings, formerly Broadway's role as operating partner.  Industry people say the buildings include 111 Broadway, 115 Broadway and 15 Park Row in the Wall Street area, 270 and 280 Madison Avenue, and 500 Fifth Avenue on the corner of 42nd Street.  The 1.3 million-square-foot Blue Hill office complex in Rockland County, N.Y., is also reportedly part of the Berisford portfolio.  Mr. Neumann still holds other midtown and downtown properties not linked to Berisford, but industry people say he has little remaining equity in those buildings, which are now primarily owned by his lenders.  The financial district, where many of the Broadway buildings are located, has experienced a marked increase in office vacancies, putting pressure on landlords.  "There's no need and too much inventory -- the worst of all worlds," says Gil Robinov, vice chairman of Riverbank Realty Co., a New York real estate firm.  There is also a great deal of sublease space available, which drags down rental prices because anxious tenants subleasing space are often willing to make low-cost deals, Mr. Robinov says.  In addition, there's a mismatch between available tenants and the current supply of office space, explains Don Schnabel, vice chairman of Julien J. Studley Inc., a real estate brokerage and consulting firm.  Tenants seeking state-of-the-art office facilities will pay about twice as much for space in new towers with high ceilings, modern ventilation and electrical systems to accommodate heavy computer use, he says.  Even when an owner funds an extensive renovation, certain structural limitations can prevent an old building from becoming as good as new.  Two months after the international grain firm Ferruzzi Finanziaria S.p.A. was forced to liquidate its huge soybean futures positions in Chicago, two of the top officials on its international commodity trading desk in Paris are resigning.  Ferruzzi sparked an international trading controversy this summer when it refused Chicago Board of Trade requests to gradually sell off futures contracts calling for the delivery of 23 million bushels of soybeans.  In July the Board of Trade, fearing that other traders might default on their obligations to deliver soybeans to Ferruzzi, forced the Milan, Italy-based company to liquidate its massive holdings.  Ferruzzi has repeatedly denied that it was attempting to corner the soybean futures market and manipulate soybean futures and cash market prices upward.  Ferruzzi lost several million dollars as a result of the forced liquidation, according to futures traders.  And traders in Chicago and Europe also speculated that Ferruzzi's Paris trading desk had lost several more million dollars from trading reversals prior to the Board of Trade debacle.  Frank Gleeson, the top trader in Ferruzzi's Paris office, confirmed that he and Rolland Gagliardini, the head of the trading division, were both leaving the company within the next two months because of "differences over trading strategy."  The two men had both played an important role in Ferruzzi's aggressive trading of soybeans and other commodities, up to and including the battle with the Board of Trade.  Mr. Gleeson denied vehemently that either man had been fired.  He said that a third trader, Maurice Elbaz, had left the company two months ago for "totally unrelated" reasons.  In Milan, a Ferruzzi spokesman wouldn't comment directly on the resignations, saying only that "The Ferruzzi group has decided on a plan to reorganize its international trading activities in the agribusiness sector."  Mr. Gleeson declined to specify the policy differences that led him and Mr. Gagliardini to resign.  He indicated that Ferruzzi's future trading strategy might become "less confrontational" though he declined to elaborate.  "The owners and shareholders of a company have every right to decide on their strategy," he said.  "They leave us, the traders, no choice as to the strategy, and we had no choice but to leave when it became clear that we disagreed with it."  He added that he was leaving "very amicably.  We've been discussing this in a friendly way for the last few weeks."  New York investor Frank J.A. Cilluffo said he delivered consents from holders of 50.4% of Amdura Corp.'s stock that he said will allow him to oust Amdura's board and replace it with his own slate.  If the votes are verified by a Delaware agent, Mr. Cilluffo will have successfully elected seven of his nominees to Amdura's board, ending a bitter two-month fight for control of this hardware distributor and specialty manufacturer.  Mr. Cilluffo said he will bring in two general partners of his investment management firm, Cilluffo Associates L.P., to run Amdura without compensation until permanent new managers can be found.  He also said he will try to sell two specialty manufacturing units that generate about $160 million of Amdura's $700 million in annual sales, but that aren't part of Amdura's core business.  But Amdura called Mr. Cilluffo's move a "public relations gimmick," saying that the consents don't include revocations that Amdura has received.  In addition, Amdura said the company and Cilluffo Associates are involved in a dispute over the record date of the consent solicitation, and Amdura said some of the consents may be from holders who bought their shares after the initial record date.  Cilluffo began the solicitation in mid-August and then withdrew it and began again, with a record date of Aug. 29.  Amdura has challenged the later record date in Delaware Chancery Court.  Earlier this week, it also filed another lawsuit in Denver federal court, charging that Cilluffo violated securities laws.  Mr. Cilluffo has been critical of Amdura's management, saying it has been too slow to integrate acquisitions.  Mr. Cilluffo has taken positions in other companies before, but he said Amdura is the first proxy fight for his 10-year-old concern, which invests for individuals, companies and tax-exempt institutions.  Cilluffo Associates has a 17.5% stake in Amdura.  Inside its all-aluminum headquarters building, a small, shrine-like room pays homage to Reynolds Metals Co.'s most recent success.  Filled with colorful maps of its gold mines in Australia, textbooks on mining and a gold ingot encased in glass, the Gold Room seems out of place among all the silvery aluminum.  Yet the room may be the most fitting symbol of Reynolds's success today as the No. 2 domestic aluminum company cashes in on its diversification program and nears the end of its most profitable year.  "Reynolds has transformed itself to a greater degree than any other aluminum company," says aluminum analyst Peter W. Merner.  "It cut out the trash and nurtured the rest."  Because of a restructuring in 1985, the company believes it is better equipped to weather a projected industry downturn next year than any other.  "I can't tell you we'll have another record year in 1990, but I can tell you it's going to be awfully good," asserts William O. Bourke, chairman and chief executive officer.  So confident is the company that it increased its quarterly dividend to shareholders by five cents to 45 cents a share last month, bucking an industry trend calling for caution.  The increase, the second this year, was made "in light of our optimistic outlook for the future," Mr. Bourke said at the time.  The confidence that Reynolds exudes may be a bit overdone -- "They're always optimistic," comments Mr. Merner -- but it isn't unwarranted, industry experts say.  For the past two years, Reynolds and other aluminum companies have been riding an unprecedented wave of prosperity as aluminum prices skyrocketed.  Other aluminum makers also have pared staffs and budgets, but few transformed themselves as dramatically as Reynolds.  Unlike No. 1 Aluminum Company of America or Alumax Inc., Reynolds has delved head-first into consumer products and gold, hoping to protect itself against the industry's cyclical nature.  As a result, it's less prone to fluctuations in aluminum ingot prices -- which dipped to 80 cents a pound recently, down from a high of more than $1.25 last year but still well above the 1985 low of 48 cents.  "They're a nicely balanced company now," says Charles A. Bradford, analyst with Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  The moves have triggered some big restructuring costs.  In 1985, after it saw its results swing to a net loss of $297 million, Reynolds shut down four high-cost smelters and laid off one-third of its employees, writing off more than $600 million in the process.  "It was absolutely necessary to preserve the livelihood of other segments," says Mr. Bourke, who contends it was far better to make the cuts in one fell swoop than in five jerks.  "It's one hell of an ouch, but the pain's gone in a couple of minutes, instead of its hurting five times."  Indeed, in less than three years, Reynolds recovered handsomely, boosting revenue by 63% in 1988 to $5.56 billion.  And rebounding from red ink, net income increased to nearly $500 million, or $9.01 a share.  For the 1989 first half, it had net of $275.2 million, or $4.85 a share, on revenue of $3.13 billion.  A robust economy spurred the turnaround, and analysts say the real test will come next year with the expected softening in demand for aluminum.  Reynolds argues, however, that it is better prepared for an economic slowdown than it was in previous recessions.  It points to a 20%-to-25% reduction in primary-production costs, lower debt, a better product mix and its lowest-ever inventory levels.  "We're not in the same situation as the industry and the company was in the early 1980s," says Mr. Bourke.  Indeed, the company embarked on a five-year plan in 1985 that among other things is aimed at tearing down high-cost plants and expanding its consumer-products division, which used to be known primarily for its aluminum foils.  Today, the company boasts 85 products, from cooking wax papers to plastic food bags.  Sales of its color plastic wrap and plastic food bags, introduced this year, have exceeded expectations.  "We want to dominate that aisle of the grocery store," Mr. Bourke says.  By 1992, the company expects its consumer-products division to contribute more than $1 billion a year in sales.  Currently, the division is generating about $600 million, or 10% of revenue.  "Reynolds is trying to build an impression it's a consumer-products company," says R. Wayne Atwell with Goldman, Sachs & Co.  Reynolds is also hoping to complement its core aluminum business with highly profitable gold production.  More than 500,000 ounces of gold are expected to be produced from its stake in two Western Australian gold mines this year, nearly half of which is claimed by Reynolds.  Although the profit margins in that business haven't been as high as late last year when the price of gold hovered at around $430 an ounce, compared with about $360 today, it's still lucrative considering it costs Reynolds about $100 to mine an ounce of gold.  The company's biggest revenue generator, accounting for 40% of sales, is still aluminum cans and packaging materials.  Reynolds said it recently signed a contract with a major food company to supply a billion aluminum food cans, a breakthrough in an industry that is dominated by steel cans.  "These factors make us feel good about the future," Mr. Bourke says.  Quaker Oats Co. said it filed suit in Dallas federal court against Texas officials, charging that their attacks on its oatmeal and oat bran advertisements violate the company's constitutional free-speech rights.  Earlier this month, Texas sued Quaker in state court in Dallas County, charging that the company's ads for oatmeal and oat bran falsely claim that eating the cereal reduces cholesterol and the risk of heart attack.  The food company retaliated in its suit by naming Texas Attorney General Jim Mattox and Robert Bernstein, Texas commissioner of health.  "The lawsuit was brought to enjoin the attorney general's actions against Quaker on the grounds that our advertising for our oat products is truthful, is supported by scientific studies and has been found by the Federal Trade Commission to be accurate," Quaker said.  Quaker's ads say the company's oatmeal and oat bran can help lower cholesterol levels -- as part of a low-fat, low-cholesterol diet.  No court hearing date has been set in either suit.  Texas officials couldn't be reached to comment.  Liquidity problems at Campeau Corp.'s retailing operations prompted a major factoring company, Heller Financial Inc., to tell vendors to stop shipping merchandise to Campeau's department stores.  In an interview yesterday, George Svos, a Heller assistant vice president, confirmed rumors the company has told about two dozen manufacturers to stop doing business with retail chains owned by Campeau's Federated Department Stores and Allied Stores.  Another Heller executive said the company has suspended a $10 million credit line extended to the stores to purchase merchandise from those manufacturers.  One apparel maker, who asked not to be identified, said he received a message from Heller yesterday stating that "any shipments made after Sept. 13 will be made at your own risk."  Separately, Toronto-based Campeau reported its fiscal second-quarter loss widened to $124 million from $109 million a year earlier.  Campeau stock didn't trade yesterday on the Toronto Stock Exchange or over-the-counter in the U.S.  Campeau said it expected to make a statement by the opening of markets today regarding a financial restructuring that includes an agreement in principle to obtain a $250 million loan from Olympia & York Developments Ltd.  The loan could reduce Chairman Robert Campeau's interest to less than 50% of Campeau and boost O&Y's stake.  Factoring companies buy retail receivables from apparel makers and in many cases act as their credit managers.  As such, they exert considerable influence in the way they conduct their business.  Chicago-based Heller, owned by Japan's Fuji Bank Ltd., is one of the biggest factors in the retail business.  The Heller executive reporting the credit-line suspension said Federated officials have told him that payments due last Sunday have been mailed.  Still, the executive said, Heller moved to suspend its credit line because of concerns about Mr. Campeau's financial situation.  "He is choking on his own debt," the executive said.  Campeau executives couldn't be reached for comment.  While several large apparel companies said yesterday they plan to continue business as usual with Federated and Allied, industry executives are clearly nervous.  Campeau's financial problems come only weeks after the bankruptcy-law filing of L.J. Hooker Corp., owner of Bonwit Teller and B. Altman & Co.  "I'm doing a lot of praying," said the chairman of one apparel company.  "Everybody's doing the same thing.  Hooker cost me a lot of money."  In the past, it wasn't a problem if Federated or Allied were slightly late in making payments, said Tom Hochfelder, an executive vice president at Beldoch Industries, a knitwear maker in New York.  "But now we are going to set some limits," he said.  "Any delay now would trigger a fear that there is risk at hand."  Ivan Gordon, president of Gloray Knitting Mills Inc., said he had lunch yesterday with another apparel maker who had purchased an insurance policy against possible losses on his business with Campeau.  Mr. Gordon said his own company is continuing to fill orders to Federated and Allied, but he is also nervous and noted that B. Altman still owes him about $20,000.  "We are praying that everything is going to be okay, but all have the jitters," said Mr. Gordon.  Several major manufacturers, including Warnaco Inc., Bernard Chaus Inc., and VF Corp., said they so far haven't experienced any problems with Federated or Allied and plan to continue shipments.  "These retailers are major customers, and we'll do everything we can to support them through difficult times," said Robert E. Gregory, president of VF.  "They're taking steps to address cash-flow problems.  We wish them the best."  Campeau has said Federated and Allied need cash infusions to meet "liquidity needs."  They include working capital to buy inventory and funds to pay bond interest due today.  In other Campeau results reported yesterday, revenue for the second quarter ended July 31 rose only 2.2% to $2.26 billion from $2.21 billion a year earlier.  Although Campeau's six-month operating profit more than doubled to $425 million from $172 million a year earlier, cash and non-cash interest costs of $575 million on the company's $10 billion of debt outstripped its operating profit.  Interest costs in the year-earlier period were $340 million.  Campeau also said its "cash deficiency" as of July 31 rose to $914 million from $125 million in the year-earlier period.  Campeau's six-month loss of $191 million compared with a profit in the yearearlier period of $64 million.  The latest sixmonth loss includes an after-tax gain of $84 million on the sale of assets, while the profit for the year-earlier six-month period includes an after-tax gain of $318 million from the sale of assets.  Campeau said revenue for the first half of fiscal 1990 was $4.49 billion, compared with $2.95 billion in fiscal 1989, but last year's figures don't include first-quarter results from Federated.  Campeau reported hefty increases in six-month and second-quarter operating profit at its retailing and supermarket divisions, but operating profit from its U.S. and Canadian rental properties was relatively flat.  ---  Johnnie L. Roberts in New York contributed to this article.  A state-imposed limit on damages in medical-malpractice cases was upheld by the Louisiana Supreme Court.  The Louisiana law, which withstood attack on state constitutional grounds, sets a $100,000 limit on recoveries against doctors and hospitals.  Victims can recover as much as $400,000 more from a state-run insurance fund.  Designed to provide supplemental compensation for more seriously injured victims, the insurance fund is made up of surcharges the state collects on insurance premiums paid by doctors, hospitals and other health-care providers.  The Louisiana court ruled that the $400,000 cap on payments from the insurance fund is valid under the state constitution.  The initial $100,000 ceiling on awards wasn't at issue in the case.  The court rejected arguments that the limit on awards unfairly discriminates between less seriously injured victims, who can be fully compensated within the cap, and those for whom the limit is insufficient.  State legislatures in recent years have adopted various medical-malpractice caps in response to heavy lobbying by the medical and insurance industries.  The Louisiana decision noted that courts in four states -- Indiana, California, Nebraska and Virginia -- have upheld such laws.  Six states have declared them unconstitutional: Idaho, Illinois, Kansas, New Hampshire, North Dakota and Texas.  "This is indeed a vexing and difficult issue, as witness the disparate results reached in other states," the Louisiana court said.  Such cases have been decided under federal and state constitutions and usually turn on issues of equal protection and due process.  The U.S. Supreme Court so far has declined to review lower court decisions on malpractice caps, but many legal experts say the high court will have to rule on the question at some point.  "Because so many states are wrestling with this issue, the court eventually is going to have to consider it," says Michael E. Tigar, a University of Texas law professor.  ---  FINLEY, KUMBLE CREDITORS balk at trustee's legal bill.  The creditors committee in the bankruptcy case of the defunct law firm of Finley, Kumble, Wagner, Heine, Underberg, Manley, Myerson & Casey is grumbling over a $4 million bill from the lawyers handling the reorganization.  The bill, submitted by Milbank, Tweed, Hadley & McCloy for work performed between January and June of this year, came as a big surprise, said Albert Togut, counsel for the 11-member creditors committee and a partner at the New York law firm of Togut, Segal & Segal.  "Until now, the firm was paid about $1 million for three months' worth of work," he said.  Mr. Togut stressed that the group's objection to the bill doesn't reflect dissatisfaction with the work of the bankruptcy trustee, Francis Musselman, a Milbank Tweed partner.  However, the creditors are concerned that the trustee's efforts to collect receivables and liquidated assets in the January-to-June period resulted in a cash gain of only $1.6 million, after fees were subtracted.  So far the committee hasn't filed a formal objection with the bankruptcy court.  Mr. Musselman said that collections picked up in the past several weeks but that the rate of collections really shouldn't be the issue.  "It's bizarre for them to think that Milbank should work 33,000 or so hours and not get compensated for it," Mr. Musselman said.  ---  THE AMERICAN BAR ASSOCIATION expands its minority-counsel project.  The Minority Counsel Demonstration Program, designed to promote client relationships between minority-run law firms and large corporations, has added 28 minority firms to its roster of participants.  The program currently includes 49 minority law firms, 53 corporations and about 20 major corporate law firms.  When the project was launched in May 1988, 21 minority firms and 10 corporations were involved, as well as a handful of majority firms.  The program encourages large corporations to hire minority firms, which are typically smaller than the firms the companies usually retain.  "The goal is to demonstrate that minority firms are capable of handling sophisticated, complex legal matters," said an ABA spokeswoman.  She said the program also "encourages major firms to use minority lawyers in visible ways and give them client responsibility."  Corporations in the program include: Aetna Life & Casualty Co., Allstate Life Insurance Co., Bristol-Myers Co., Coca-Cola Company, Toyota Motor Sales USA Inc., Ford Motor Co., and Chrysler Corp.  According to the ABA spokeswoman, some corporations are following the example of General Motors Corp., which wrote to more than 900 law firms it uses requesting that minority lawyers be assigned to the company's work.  --- THE BANKRUPTCY GROUP at Willkie Farr & Gallagher, New York, added Barry Seidel, formerly of Levin & Weintraub & Crames, as a partner.  The group, headed by Myron Trepper, was formed less than three years ago and now has more than 15 lawyers.  "We think it's going to be a very large segment of Wall Street law-firm business, and we are building the group accordingly, and that's why we made this move," said Robert B. Hodes, the firm's co-chairman.  ---  THE ENVIRONMENTAL LAW FIRM of Beveridge & Diamond opened a San Francisco office to tap the big California market for environmental work on behalf of companies and local governments.  The Washington, D.C., firm, has 60 lawyers nationwide.  ---  PAUL A. BILZERIAN'S SENTENCING has been delayed for a second time because of scheduling difficulties.  Federal Judge Robert Ward moved the sentencing date for the corporate investor, scheduled for today, to Sept. 27.  Last June, Mr. Bilzerian, the former chairman of Singer Co., was convicted of nine counts of market-related crimes, including securities fraud, conspiracy to commit tax fraud, and filing false disclosure statements to the SEC.  Leo J. Niekerk, a former director of Sunbelt Savings Association, was charged with two fraud-related counts stemming from loans he obtained from the thrift, the Justice Department said.  Officials added that Mr. Niekerk waived indictment and agreed to cooperate with their investigations into criminal activities at Sunbelt and other financial institutions.  People familiar with the investigations characterized the agreement as a major advance for the government because of Mr. Niekerk's significant links to several of Texas's biggest problem thrifts.  In an information filed in federal court here, the government charged Mr. Niekerk with one count of "causing a false and material statement to be made for the purpose of influencing the actions of Sunbelt" by misdirecting the proceeds of a $7 million loan.  In a second count, the government accused Mr. Niekerk of conspiring to defraud the Internal Revenue Service by "creating an artificial loan" to one of his affiliates to avoid paying income taxes.  Mr. Niekerk, a real-estate developer, didn't return phone calls seeking comment.  A Curtiss-Wright Corp. unit agreed to pay the government nearly $1.4 million to settle claims that it overestimated labor costs in connection with manufacturing landing gear for Air Force planes, the Justice Department said.  The settlement resolved government claims that Curtiss-Wright Flight Systems Inc. in 1982 overestimated the time needed to manufacture landing gear for the Air Force's C-5A transport aircraft.  The company's failure to disclose certain information about labor hours on a $6.7 million contract with the Air Force "ran afoul" of the Truth in Negotiations Act, which obliges contractors to provide the government with complete and accurate cost and pricing data, the Justice Department said.  Curtiss-Wright currently holds $150 million in government prime contracts and subcontracts, the department said.  Company officials couldn't be reached for comment.  A shaky junk bond market and disappointing news on retail sales undercut stock prices.  Bond prices and the dollar managed to post modest gains.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 14.63 points to 2664.89.  The Dow Jones Transportation Average fared worse.  It dropped 25.96 to 1443.28 as junk bond worries deflated speculation about possible future airline takeovers or buy-outs.  Trading was light in Treasury bonds and currencies ahead of the deluge of economic reports due out this morning.  A report yesterday showed August retail sales rose less than most economists had predicted, suggesting the economy may be weaker than many investors had presumed.  A weaker economy combined with the problems plaguing heavily-leveraged Campeau Corp. and the junk bond market, which is essential to many proposed or rumored takeovers, cast a pall over stocks.  Today's blizzard of economic statistics includes the July balance of trade, and the producer price index and factory utilization data for August.  However, there's considerable doubt the reports will clarify whether the economy is strengthening or weakening.  For the stock market, moreover, today is the "triple witching hour" expiration of stock-index futures, options on those futures and on individual stocks.  That could prompt considerable volatility in stock prices as traders unwind positions.  Some estimate that more than 100 million shares of stock will change hands at the market opening today.  In major market activity:  Stock prices fell in moderate trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 149.3 million shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board swamped gainers 1,108 to 396.  Bond prices rose.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year bond gained a quarter of a point, or about $2.50 for each $1,000 of face amount.  The yield slipped to 8.11%.  The dollar strengthened slightly.  In late New York trading the U.S. currency was quoted at 1.9755 marks and 146.86 yen compared with 1.9705 marks and 146.33 yen Wednesday.  RTZ Corp., a British natural resource and industrial concern, said its first-half pretax profit spurted 71% on injection of receipts from newly acquired operations from British Petroleum PLC and returns from its base metals and minerals units.  Pretax profit rose to #644.6 million(US$1.06 billion), up from #377 million the year earlier.  RTZ, which acquired the bulk of BP's minerals operations for $4.6 billion in June, said profit after tax and extraordinary items, or net income attributable to shareholders, rose 48% from the 1988 period.  Net was #294.1 million, up from #199.1 million pounds.  Earnings per share rose 32% to 33.9 pence from 25.6 pence a year earlier.  RTZ reported an extraordinary gain of #13.8 million in the period, down sharply from the #245.1 million extraordinary gain in 1988 when the company divested itself of its oil interests.  The interim results were at the higher end of market expectations of between #240 million and #295 million of net income for the six-month period.  The Asian Development Bank board of governors elected Kimimasa Tarumizu president, succeeding Masao Fujioka, president for the past eight years.  Mr. Tarumizu, 59 years old, currently a senior adviser to Japan's Ministry of Finance, will take office Nov. 24.  Mr. Fujioka, 65, announced his resignation this year.  The bank said Mr. Tarumizu has worked in the Japanese Finance Ministry for 32 years.  After serving as financial attache in the Japanese Embassy in London, he was appointed senior deputy director of the ministry's investment division, foreign affairs bureau -- a post responsible for international development policy and multilateral development banks.  Mr. Tarumizu also held consular and financial minister posts in New York and Washington in 1970 and 1981, respectively.  During his Washington stint, the bank said, Mr. Tarumizu was credited with "contributing to improved handling of pressing financial and economic issues between the U.S. and Japan."  In 1983-84, he served as director-general of the Customs and Tariff Bureau and helped open the Japanese market through such steps as tariff reductions.  From 1984 to 1987, Mr. Tarumizu was executive director of the Japan Development Bank, after which he became vice chairman of the Investment Trust Association of Japan.  Greenwich Pharmaceuticals Inc.'s controversial drug, Therafectin, helped 41% of arthritis patients in a study that didn't try to show whether the drug worked better than commonly prescribed treatments.  The Fort Washington, Pa., company has attracted interest for several years because its experimental drug is chemically different from drugs typically prescribed for arthritis sufferers.  In a study involving 201 patients, researchers found that Therafectin relieved arthritis symptoms in 41% of test subjects.  However, 21% of those who received a placebo, or inactive substance, also experienced relief.  In the report of the test published in the Annals of Internal Medicine, researchers said that because of the study's design they were unable to assess the drug's long-term safety or effectiveness.  Indeed, the preliminary results suggest the drug isn't more effective than non-steroidal anti-inflammatory drugs, which doctors commonly use to treat arthritis.  Although public release of the study's results were embargoed until after stock markets closed yesterday, some investors may have received advanced information about the study's impending publication.  Greenwich Pharmaceuticals shares have jumped 50% in over-the-counter trading since last week, closing yesterday at $5.875 bid, up 12.5 cents.  Greenwich Pharmaceuticals, whose only product is Therafectin, has seen its shares gyrate over the years following reports about the drug's development.  The latest study is the largest test of the drug's effectiveness and safety.  In a summary accompanying the study, researchers wrote that Therafectin "has significant anti-inflammatory activity and a favorable safety profile."  But in a separate section of the report, the researchers also noted that the 12-week study was designed to detect a favorable response, and wasn't representative of the way arthritis medicines are used.  In the study, patients were taken off their usual medication, and given Therafectin, or the placebo, only after they experienced a flare-up of arthritis problems.  Because Therafectin is different from other arthritis drugs, there is hope that it won't produce the annoying and sometimes dangerous gastrointestinal side effects that force many patients off their medication.  But, in the study, 33% of those taking Therafectin, and 34% of those taking the placebo, reported gastrointestinal problems.  Such a finding made it difficult to assess the drug's long-term safety.  While there has been some hope among investors and arthritis sufferers that Therafectin would be approved for sale soon, the company late last year said the Food and Drug Administration wanted more studies from the company.  Recently, a company official said Greenwich Pharmaceuticals had yet to file an application seeking approval of the drug.  Neither officials at the company, nor the report's authors, were available for comment.  The report was written by Wayne Riskin of the University of Miami School of Medicine and John Scarlett, an official at Greenwich Pharmaceuticals.  Gordon J. Metz resigned as a junior adviser at Citicorp's mergers and acquisitions unit.  Mr. Metz will join Chase Manhattan Corp. as a senior associate in that bank's mergers and acquisitions unit.  He is the third adviser to leave Citicorp's mergers unit in recent months.  In June, the head of Citicorp's mergers unit, Robert Whitby, resigned citing organizational disagreements.  On Wednesday, Gordon F. Wolf, one of the unit's top advisers, said that he quit because Citicorp was unwilling to advise hostile bidders.  In an interview, Mr. Metz said, "In marketing mergers and acquisitions advice, the way that you get business is that you carry your checkbook with you.  They won't let us do that.  Typically, we have to go to other institutions to fund transactions.  It's self-defeating."  J. Robert Clement, who succeeded Mr. Whitby as head of the 45-person unit, wasn't available for comment yesterday on Mr. Metz's departure.  Citicorp chairman John S. Reed defended continued bank lending to heavily indebted countries, and cautioned against overzealous cutting back of bank debt and interest payments.  "The stress on Third World debt reduction, to the exclusion of any new lending, threatens the widely agreed goals of returning troubled, less-developing countries to economic health," Mr. Reed said.  Mr. Reed, who held a news conference here prior to addressing the Washington Economic Club last night, expressed fears about whether there would be sufficient new loans in the proposed debt package that Mexico and its bankers have just negotiated.  "The difficulty will be to keep enough new money in," he said, adding: "That could be a serious difficulty."  Burroughs Wellcome Co. officers stood shoulder to shoulder with federal officials at a Washington, D.C., press conference just three years ago, proudly announcing the first major breakthrough against acquired immune deficiency syndrome: Wellcome's life-prolonging drug AZT.  Yesterday, activists in San Francisco, London and New York staged demonstrations attacking Burroughs Wellcome and its parent, London-based Wellcome PLC, as corporate extortionists.  Five AIDS activists chained themselves to a balcony inside the New York Stock Exchange, sounding a horn to drown out the opening bell and unfurling a banner that read: "Sell Wellcome."  Protesters also invaded pharmacies, pasting other Wellcome products with stickers reading "AIDS Profiteer."  The company is accused by activists and some health-care providers of reaping unseemly profits from AIDS patients and federally funded Medicaid by keeping the price of AZT, or azidothymidine, at a level that makes it one of the most expensive drugs ever sold -- about $8,000 for a year's supply per patient.  Driven in part by AZT, Wellcome's profits have doubled in the three years ended Aug. 27, 1988, to $198 million in its most recent fiscal year, and a bigger bonanza is just around the corner.  As a result of a recent study confirming that AZT helps people who are infected with the lethal virus but not yet showing symptoms, the Food and Drug Administration is expected to authorize the compound for sale to hundreds of thousands, rather than just the tens of thousands who are sick with AIDS.  At the current price, Wellcome could generate $1.2 billion of AZT sales in 1992, with about half of that flowing to the bottom line as net profit.  When the medical study was announced Aug. 18, Wellcome's stock jumped 32% in London trading.  People familiar with the FDA approval process think it is almost inevitable that Wellcome will cut the price of AZT after it is allowed to sell to the wider market, though by how much is unclear.  But many AIDS patients and doctors believe Wellcome has already made too much money at the expense of the sick, pricing their drug so far out of the reach of some indigent and moderate-income people that the federal government has had to step in with hundreds of millions of dollars in subsidies -- money that further bolsters Wellcome's profits.  "Wellcome is involved in shameless profiteering," contends Curtis Morriss, administrator of the infectious-disease clinic at Atlanta's charity hospital, Grady Memorial.  "They ought to be ashamed."  Particularly galling to Wellcome's many critics is that the AZT profits are something of a windfall for the company.  Wellcome acquired AZT years ago.  But it didn't create the compound, it wasn't the first to discover its effectiveness against AIDS-type "retroviruses," it didn't uncover its effectiveness against AIDS itself and it didn't conduct the first human tests.  Much of that work was done by other scientists, some at the National Institutes of Health with federal financing.  It is also a curious irony that Wellcome is being vilified as an AIDS profiteer, for most of its dividends go to charity, and much of its retained profits to research and development.  It is 75%-owned by the Wellcome Trust, a charitable organization that has spent millions aiding pharmaceutical research and other causes.  The company pays out about 25% of its earnings in dividends, mostly to the trust, and spends heavily on research and development of experimental drugs for a wide range of diseases, including cancer, sickle cell anemia and multiple sclerosis.  Its drug acyclovir is a leading treatment of herpes.  Moreover, analysts believe that Wellcome's gross profit margins on AZT, while very high at 70% to 80%, are in line with what other companies get from major new drugs.  High returns are needed to finance research and development, and pay for "dry holes" -- the many drugs that never reach market.  Wellcome's main defense has been that it needs to recoup its upfront investment in AZT, which included paying for a major clinical trial, initially giving the drug free to as many as 5,000 AIDS patients and spending $80 million on a new plant and raw materials.  "There is a myth out there that we're robber barons, ripping people off," contends David Barry, vice president, research development and medical affairs of the Burroughs Wellcome unit, based in Atlanta.  "It would be theoretically possible for us to give away all our drug," Dr. Barry says.  "Everyone would get it for a while, and then we'd go bankrupt."  Demonstrations and talks with activists notwithstanding, he says there will be no "knee-jerk" concessions on AZT's price.  He cautions the potential bonanza may be offset by several recent studies suggesting the drug may be just as effective at half the dose, thus cutting the annual cost to the patient to $4,000 or less.  Wellcome also may be hurt by a forthcoming anti-AIDS competitor, Bristol-Myers Co.'s DDI, or dideoxyinosine, which is still being tested.  "If there were a decision to lower price," Dr. Barry says, "it would be on a rational, quantitative basis."  Nonetheless, what started out as a triumph for Wellcome has turned into a public-relations disaster, and sparked a raging debate that raises many troubling questions about medical ethics, government policy and the role of private enterprise in drug development.  Among other things, the flap promises to change the terms under which the government supports corporate drug research.  Wellcome isn't alone in its dilemma.  Dr. Barry is quick to point out that interferon therapy offered by companies like Hoffmann-La Roche Inc. for treatment of an AIDS-related tumor can run $9,800 a year per patient.  Moreover, Genentech Inc. made headlines when it priced its heart-attack drug, TPA, at $2,200 a dose.  But Wellcome has several unusual problems.  The gay communities heavily affected by the AIDS virus are highly organized and politically adroit, unlike most other patient populations.  Their target, Wellcome, is increasingly unable to mount a credible defense based on the argument that it needs to recoup its AZT investment.  It has already been greatly enriched by its role in treating the epidemic.  In the fiscal year ended in August, Wellcome logged AZT sales of about $220 million, and profit of about $100 million, analysts believe.  The profits for that single year would more than recoup all of Wellcome's initial investment in plant, equipment and materials for AZT.  By 1992 analysts suggest AZT's annual sales could quintuple to more than $1 billion a year.  Such blockbuster status is attained by few products.  Some critics say that while a high return may be justifiable for lower-cost drugs, it is less so when it puts out of reach a drug that helps an expanding number of sufferers of a lethal epidemic, an epidemic that by its nature also financially cripples those people.  Matthew Ward, a 38-year-old writer in New York, has been taking AZT for 2 1/2 years, and has exhausted his own and friends' funds to buy it.  "One of the most dispiriting things was to have to get together that amount of money -- $800 a month -- in the midst of being ill," he says.  Business-as-usual isn't good enough, argues Peter Staley, a member of AIDS Coalition to Unleash Power, or ACT UP. Mr. Staley, who was one of the five activists who chained themselves to the balcony of the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, says, "There's a difference between a $500 drug sold at 80% margins and an $8,000 drug sold at 80% margins," he says.  "We have a drug that could slow a world-wide epidemic, and it's being sold only to the people and the countries that can afford it.  Africa isn't getting AZT."  "Many patients still can't get AZT," adds Joseph Wilber, physician and medical director of the AIDS Program of the Georgia Department of Public Health.  "We have 18 patients in Savannah who doctors think should get AZT but there's no source.  We've used up all our federal money."  Moreover, because the FDA hasn't cleared AZT for use in children, the government hasn't set aside subsidies to buy the drug for this group.  Therefore, a poor parent might get subsidized AZT but his child might not.  Dr. Barry insists Wellcome has been a model of compassion, distributing AZT free prior to its initial marketing approval and launching a patient assistance program for the uninsured -- though activists charge the program is so cumbersome only 300 people have actually used it.  He points out that the company did cut AZT's price in December 1987, lowering the retail price to $8,000 from $10,000.  But Wellcome's moral position is undercut by the fact that much of the important work on AZT was done by others.  The creator of the drug was Jerome P. Horwitz, chemistry chairman of the Michigan Cancer Foundation, who in 1964 synthesized the compound through grants from the National Institutes of Health and the local United Way chapter.  AZT failed as a cancer therapy, and Mr. Horwitz's recipe was never patented, thus casting the compound into the public domain, where it remained for 20 years, a drug in search of a use.  Wellcome synthesized some AZT from the formula and began to explore its use, first as an antibacterial drug and later as an antiviral.  Others were looking at it too.  Far from Wellcome's labs and long before AIDS struck, a West German scientist made a prescient finding.  W. Ostertag and co-workers at the Max Planck Institute for Experimental Medicine in 1974 published a study showing AZT in the test tube could block Friend leukemia virus, a mouse virus which, like AIDS, belongs to the class of so-called retroviruses, which transfer their genetic infomation in a backward fashion from RNA to DNA.  A decade later, Wellcome confirmed his finding.  When the epidemic hit, few companies had labs equipped to handle live AIDS virus.  So the government took the lead.  At its National Cancer Institute, then-chief of clinical oncology Samuel Broder asked companies to send in candidate anti-AIDS compounds for screening.  Among many samples sent was AZT, under the code name "compound S."  In a screening system developed by NCI scientist Hiroaki Mitsuya, AZT wiped out the virus.  In July 1985, Dr. Broder and his colleague Robert Yarchoan administered the first dose to a human being.  Wellcome complains that the government's role has been overstated.  The company's 1988 annual report devotes a full page of text to clarifying this "misunderstanding" and defending its antiviral efforts and expertise.  Dr. Barry grants there was a good deal of "collegial collaboration," but insists, "This is our drug."  Wellcome performed toxicology, pharmacology and animal studies before AZT was given to the first human volunteer, he says, and financed the big, multi-center clinical trial in patients, as well as bankrolling a giveaway to 5,000 people prior to FDA approval.  But Wellcome still refuses to disclose its actual cost of development and production.  In early 1987, Dr. Barry said raw materials and a sophisticated new plant had cost $80 million, but today company officials say that figure was incomplete, and omits ongoing research.  Asked for a total, a spokeswoman, as a guide, simply repeats the industry average for any drug of $125 million.  "Why don't they release their numbers?" demands Larry Kramer, a playwright and founder of ACT UP.  "Do they expect us to believe them at face value?"  Disclosure would only engender "false and misleading calculations," Dr. Barry replies.  "Whatever number you give out, it'll be used to mislead."  Wellcome is now under pressure on many fronts to cut its price.  AIDS activists are considering litigation challenging the company's patent, and its biggest customer, the U.S. government, is distinctly restive.  Under Medicaid and other subsidy programs, the U.S. has already spent $320 million funding purchases of the drug. (An article in today's edition of the Journal of the American Medical Association estimates that total annual costs for early treatment of AIDS-infected people in the U.S. could run as high as $5 billion to $10 billion, mostly for AZT.)  Government attorneys are mulling over a wartime statute permitting the government to allow patent infringement by other companies when its own procurement of a product is threatened by the activities of a single supplier.  Also, activists could sue to revoke AZT's designation as an orphan drug, that is, a drug designed to treat a relatively small group of people.  Orphan-drug development is encouraged by tax breaks and guarantees of exclusive marketing rights for seven years.  A more likely tack is public jawboning.  Rep. Henry Waxman, a California Democrat who held hearings on AZT's price in early 1987, last week wrote the company, serving notice that Wellcome's original price rationale -- achieving a decent return on investment during a short product life -- no longer exists as the drug approaches its third anniversary and a burgeoning marketplace.  "The continued high price of the drug now appears to be an attempt to charge whatever patients, governments and insurers can scrape together because they are desperate and have no alternative," Rep. Waxman wrote to Burroughs Wellcome's president, T.E. Haigler.  He said that was inappropriate in light of all the government help Wellcome received, and warned that his subcommittee on health and the environment may reopen hearings into AZT's price.  The FDA may play the biggest role in bringing AZT's price down.  Drug analysts believe that Wellcome inevitably will cut its price -- conditioned on the FDA's expanding the approved use of AZT to people who are infected by the virus but haven't shown any symptoms.  "It isn't a quid pro quo, and you don't ever say it," says Samuel Isaly, a drug-company consultant.  "It's done with winks and nods."  But scientists and ethicists warn that singling out one drug company, or one disease, for special treatment could be counterproductive in the long run.  "I believe in letting companies have a reasonable return.  But where does one draw the line and say you've made enough profit, and now it's unseemly?" asks Peter Jensen, chief of infectious diseases of the San Francisco VA Hospital.  "Anytime you regulate, you risk killing the goose that laid the golden egg."  "Perhaps business as usual isn't good enough," adds Robert Levine, a Yale University ethicist and professor of medicine.  But he is troubled by the ad hoc "patchwork" of subsidies for AIDS that leaves deeper policy questions unsettled.  "Whether the epidemic should change ordinary business assumptions isn't something society has addressed very carefully.  We have many diseases as lethal as AIDS.  If you change expectations for AIDS, should we also change them for cancer?"  He warns against strangling creativity with over-regulation.  Many in Washington feel that perhaps the easiest way out of the dilemma is for the government to aggressively foster alternative drugs, letting the resulting competition drive down the cost rather than resorting to price controls.  But just in case, Dr. Broder, now the National Cancer Institute's director, also wrote a "reasonable price" clause into all future licensing agreements covering transfer of an NIH-invented compound to a company for development.  Bristol-Myers's DDI, licensed from the cancer institute, is covered by such a clause, and some analysts believe it will eventually be sold at a substantial discount to AZT as a result.  No one is certain how the "reasonable price" clause would be enforced.  However, an unduly high price could trigger a government order for a company to open its books.  Any company found in violation could be sued by the government for breach of contract.  "It puts a company on notice that care should be exercised in pricing," says Barney Lepovetsky, the National Cancer Institute's director of technology development.  "That moral position is established."  General Motors Corp. took a major step toward adjusting to its shrinking sales base by announcing the closing of its Lakewood, Ga., assembly plant, putting 3,200 people out of work.  When the Lakewood facility shuts its doors next spring, it will become the eighth U.S. assembly plant that the auto maker has closed since August 1987.  That equals -- by no coincidence -- the total number of Japanese assembly plants now open in the U.S.  "We're seeing a slow transfer of U.S. production power from Detroit's Big Three to overseas-based manufacturers," said John Casesa, auto analyst at Wertheim, Schroder & Co. in New York.  Like other analysts, Mr. Casesa figures that GM still must close three or four more assembly plants to fulfill its pledge of operating its North American factories at full capacity by 1992.  After the Lakewood closing, GM will have 29 car and truck assembly plants in the U.S.  The replacement of Big Three factories with Japanese "transplants" in the U.S. amounts to one of history's more striking shifts of industrial ownership and power.  Honda Motor Co. opened the first Japanese car-assembly plant in the U.S. in 1982, and other Japanese auto makers followed suit because of restrictions on the number of cars they could export to the U.S.  But protectionist measures have backfired on Detroit as Japanese auto production in the U.S. expands.  This year, for the first time, the Japanese as a group will build more than one million cars in the U.S., about 10% of total industry sales.  The number could easily double in a few years as the long-expected "overcapacity" in the auto industry becomes reality.  This fall two new Japanese assembly plants are opening -- one a Honda factory and the other a joint venture between Isuzu Motors Ltd. and Fuji Heavy Industries Ltd. -- and bringing the total in the U.S. to eight.  Several are joint-effort factories with Detroit's Big Three.  And the Japanese, particularly Honda, are starting to build engines, transmissions and other major components in their U.S. manufacturing complexes.  GM officially termed its action an indefinite idling, because its contract with the United Auto Workers union prohibits permanent factory closings.  But no one inside the company or in the UAW hierarchy believes that the Lakewood plant, which was built in 1928, has much chance of reopening.  "Who's kidding whom?" asked one UAW official, who asked not to be identified.  GM has the capacity to build almost one million more cars in North America than it can sell.  "There's a theological difference between idling and closing, because idling keeps the company within the letter of the law on its contract," said David Healy, automotive analyst at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  "I can't say that the move is a surprise."  Indeed, the Lakewood announcement had been expected to come sooner or later, because the factory wasn't assigned a new model to build after production of the Chevrolet Caprice sedan and the Buick Estate station wagon is completed around mid-March of 1990.  The Estate is being discontinued, while production of a restyled Caprice will move to GM factories in Arlington, Texas, and Willow Run, Mich.  GM traditionally has provided at least six months' notice before closing or idling a plant.  So the company appears to have timed its announcement so the actual closing can take place before talks on a new national contract get under way next summer.  Still, the union reacted angrily to the news.  "We are tired of the hypocrisy of congratulating workers for a job well done and rewarding them with layoffs," Stephen P. Yokich, who recently assumed leadership of the UAW's GM department, said in a statement.  GM said that the salaried and hourly workers who will lose their jobs at Lakewood are eligible for a variety of programs, including supplemental unemployment benefits.  The company promised that "a transition program will be developed for affected employees," providing them with information and counseling.  Of the plant's 3,200 workers, about 1,000 already are on indefinite layoff.  For GM, the Lakewood announcement marks another step in adjusting to a harsh reality.  The company garnered just 35.2% of the U.S. car market for the first eight months of this year, far below the roughly 45% market share it held early in the decade.  GM has gained market share in light trucks recently, but not nearly enough to offset its losses in the car market.  The company's underused manufacturing capacity has made its core North American auto operations barely profitable in recent years, even though overall net income hit a record $4.86 billion in 1988 thanks to earnings from overseas and diversified businesses.  So analysts welcomed yesterday's announcement as positive.  GM stock closed at $48.50, off 50 cents, in New York Stock Exchange composite trading.  Separately, U.S. auto makers plan to build 140,528 cars this week, up 29.4% from the 108,575 cars assembled last week, but down 3.3% from the 145,386 cars built a year earlier.  Ford Motor Co. plans to idle its Michigan truck plant in Wayne because a strike at a Borg-Warner Corp. plant in Indiana will create a shortage of parts.  Ford assembles its F-series pickups and Bronco trucks at the plant.  Chrysler Corp. said it has scheduled Saturday overtime at its Newark, Del., and St. Louis No. 2 assembly plants.  Chrysler builds the Dodge Spirit and Plymouth Acclaim compact cars at the Newark plant and extended-length minivans at the St. Louis plant.  ---  @ This Last Yr.  Ago, -Yr. to Date- %  @ Week-e Week-r Week 1989 1988 Chg.  @GM 67,355 51,893 72,643 2,241,520 2,342,314 - 4  @Ford 31,393 20,914 34,198 1,226,919 1,289,870 - 5  @Chrysler 18,600 16,388 22,691 659,860 732,229 -10  @Honda 6,560 5,872 7,818 266,327 263,032 + 1  @Nissan 2,521 2,100 2,900 84,076 78,535 + 7  @Nummi-f 3,100 2,410 512 141,967 115,436 +23  @Mazda 4,272 3,773 4,624 158,190 91,585 +73  @Toyota 3,760 2,990 0 89,359 0 d  @Diam.Star 2,967 2,235 0 49,415 0 d  @Industry 140,528 108,575 145,386 4,917,633 4,948,840x - 1  d-Percentage change is greater than 999%. e-Estimated. f-Includes Chevrolet Prizm and Toyota Corolla. r-Revised. x-Includes Volkswagen domestic production through July 1988.  Amid continued nervousness about the resolution of Campeau's financial troubles, the over-the-counter market suffered its biggest decline in more than three weeks.  The Nasdaq Composite Index dropped 3.05, or 0.65%, to 468.78.  It was the index's largest single-day decline since Aug. 21.  The Nasdaq 100 Index of non-financial stocks dropped about 1%, or 4.41, to 444.82.  The Nasdaq Financial Index lost 3.17, or 0.7%, to 464.77.  Traders said the declines were fueled by uncertainty about what's ahead for Campeau, whose shares are traded on the Toronto Stock Exchange as well as on Nasdaq.  The Campeau trading halt that was declared late Wednesday continued yesterday in both markets, pending still more news from the debt-ridden company regarding its agreement in principle with Olympia & York Developments, a company spokeswoman said.  Yesterday, the retailing conglomerate said it had a $124 million second-quarter loss, widened from a loss of $109 million a year earlier.  For the first six months, Toronto-based Campeau had a loss of $191 million.  In the 1988 first half, the company earned $64 million.  The trading suspension followed disclosures by Campeau that it faces mounting debt problems and may have to surrender control to real estate concern Olympia & York in exchange for a $250 million infusion.  "There was a lot of carry-over from the whole (Campeau) situation yesterday," said William Sulya, head of OTC trading at A.G. Edwards & Sons in St. Louis.  "The market never saw the light."  But Mr. Sulya also said the Campeau story was merely the excuse some already nervous investors needed.  "An awful lot of people were waiting for someone to shove them off the fence," he said, adding that many investors have sold stock ahead of today's spate of U.S. economic reports.  The nation's trade deficit for July and the August producer price index, among others, are due this morning.  Traders say investors are also skittish about today's "triple witching hour," in which stock options, index options and index futures contracts expire simultaneously.  The triple expiration can cause volatility in stock prices.  Volume on Nasdaq totaled 142 million shares yesterday, with trading in declining issues constituting 44% of that activity.  Of the 4,355 issues that changed hands, 1,183 fell and only 777 rose.  First Executive lost 5/8 to 10 5/8.  Analysts said the stock was pressured by a drop in the junk bond market related to the troubles at Campeau.  First Executive is a heavy investor in the bonds.  First Executive's rights, which began trading Tuesday, fell 30%, or 3/4, to 1 3/4.  Analysts linked the decline to news that I.C.H., which holds 20% of First Executive, will sell its rights.  While most stocks were down, Microsoft was up, jumping 1 1/2 to 63 3/4.  The software maker's board authorized the repurchase of as many as one million of its 54 million common shares outstanding.  The stock is approaching its 52-week high of 64 3/4, set in this year's first quarter.  Ryan's Family Steak Houses also rose, reaching a 52-week high of 8 5/8, up 1/4.  Volume of 2.2 million shares made it the most active OTC issue.  Standard & Poor's added the stock to its S&P 500-stock index to replace Cullinet Software, which was acquired.  Stocks usually rise when they are added to the index because the shares are bought to balance portfolios that are based on the index.  Advanta gained 1 3/8 to 10 1/2 on more than four times its average daily volume.  The company declared an initial dividend of 10 cents a share.  The seller of consumer financial products said it anticipates a third-quarter gain of about $1.9 million, or 20 cents a share, from the retirement of debt related to a debenture repurchase.  In the third quarter of 1988, the company had net income of $139,000, or two cents a share.  Pace Membership Warehouse rose 2 5/8 to 18 5/8 on 427,000 shares.  The operator of merchandise warehouses said a party it didn't identify has reviewed certain confidential information about it and expressed interest in a possible acquisition of Pace.  Officials of Pace said they haven't yet decided whether to sell the company.  Under terms of the confidentiality agreement, the suitor can't acquire any Pace shares for two years without the advance consent of Pace's board, the company said.  Live Entertainment fell 1/8 to 14 3/4.  The company said 1989 earnings may be below estimates of $1.70 to $1.75 a share.  In 1988, it earned $17.5 million, or $3.22 a share.  The distributor of audio and video entertainment also said it replaced the law firm it retained to investigate the murder of its chairman, Jose Menendez, after a Wall Street Journal report said the firm had a potential conflict of interest.  Live Entertainment said the law firm Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton & Garrison was being replaced on the investigation by the firm of Kaye, Scholer, Fierman, Hays & Handler.  Roger Smith, acting president and chief operating officer, said the change came largely because of the Journal article.  He said that although neither the company nor the Paul Weiss firm believes there actually is a conflict, the company wants to "remove anything that might be an appearance of a conflict."  NBC, which lost the broadcast rights to Major League Baseball to CBS as of the 1990 season, is getting back into the game -- sort of.  Major League Baseball awarded all non-North-American rights to an enterprise consisting of NBC International, a unit of the National Broadcasting Co., Major League Baseball and Pascoe Nally Inc., a British sports-marketing firm.  Financial details of the agreement weren't disclosed.  CBS Inc. recently outbid NBC for the domestic broadcast rights for Major League Baseball games, paying $1.2 billion for a package including the post-season games, All-Star games and World Series.  NBC, a unit of General Electric Co., had the broadcast rights for approximately 40 years.  The newly formed group will also be involved in product licensing, publishing, sponsorship, amateur-baseball telecast rights and, according to NBC, "overall baseball development outside the United States."  Included in the rights are broadcast and cable rights in Mexico and cable rights in Canada.  Among other bidders was said to be EPSN, the all-sports cable network 80%-owned by Capital Cities/ABC Inc. ESPN declined comment.  NBC said that under the accord, the three companies will benefit from proceeds derived from the venture's marketing and promotional activities after operating expenses are accounted for.  Rockwell International Corp. said it plans a major expansion of its automotive products business in Europe, including addition of at least four new production facilities and expansion of product lines.  Analysts said the expansion is part of Rockwell's effort to increase its automotive business overseas.  Europe, where the company has 5,500 employees, is Rockwell's largest market outside the U.S. for auto products.  Automotive operations accounted for about $2.15 billion, or 18%, of total sales of $11.95 billion for the fiscal year ended Sept. 30, 1988.  The company, which also has interests in aerospace, electronics and graphics, valued the investment in the new plants at $60 million over two years.  The new European facilities will include a West German assembly plant to supply modular sunroof systems under a new contract with Volkswagenwerke A.G. for the 1992 Golf model.  It also said it has a letter of intent to supply sunroof systems for two Mazda models.  The company also plans a Cassino, Italy, assembly plant to make door system modules.  The plant will supply modules for a European auto maker Rockwell didn't identify.  In addition, Rockwell has recently signed a contract with a third European auto maker, also not identified, for door system modules.  Rockwell said it plans to establish an automotive plastics parts and systems plant in Europe "in the near future," and to enter the automotive suspension market through joint ventures with European manufacturers.  In an 11th-hour about-face, Samuel Pierce, the Reagan administration's housing secretary, canceled his long-scheduled appearance before a House subcommittee investigating mismanagement and political favoritism in the awarding of federal funds.  Mr. Pierce's cancellation drew an immediate and angry rebuke from the panel's chairman, Rep. Tom Lantos (D., Calif.), who charged the action was "deceitful, misleading and a betrayal of the good faith with which this subcommittee has dealt with him."  Mr. Lantos said that the panel will meet this morning, as scheduled, and that if Mr. Pierce didn't show up, "future appearances by Mr. Pierce will be compelled under subpoena."  Mr. Pierce, who hasn't generally been available for comment throughout the long-running scandal involving the Department of Housing and Urban Development, announced his decision in a prepared statement.  He said he wouldn't "voluntarily appear" because his lawyers need additional time to review testimony and documents "to prepare me properly for my testimony."  Mr. Pierce hired his lawyers just last week, although his appearance before Mr. Lantos's Government Operations Employment and Housing Subcommittee had been scheduled for many weeks.  Mr. Pierce has been under heavy congressional criticism for his alleged failure to properly manage HUD during his eight years as secretary.  The panel has developed evidence showing that numerous politically connected consultants were paid large fees for helping clients win valuable HUD subsidies.  In addition, the Justice Department has opened many investigations around the country into allegations of theft and fraud involving HUD funds.  Mr. Pierce testified before the lawmakers in May and denied he had ever ordered aides to fund any rent-subsidy projects under a program for rehabilitating low-income housing.  But a former top aide later contradicted Mr. Pierce.  Lawmakers also wanted to question Mr. Pierce about his decision to lift restrictions on a HUD co-insurance lender represented by former HUD Secretary Carla Hills, now the U.S. trade representative.  Mr. Pierce's lawyers, Paul Perito and Robert Plotkin, said in a letter to Rep. Lantos that the panel's probing of alleged "inconsistencies" between the testimony of Mr. Pierce and that of others appeared to be inviting "potential charges of perjury."  In a statement, Mr. Lantos said Mr. Pierce's lawyers didn't inform him until 5 p.m. EDT yesterday that their client wouldn't testify.  Mr. Lantos said his panel had been very accommodating to Mr. Pierce and had given him several postponements.  But Mr. Pierce insisted that he had cooperated "fully and completely" with lawmakers.  He said he had asked for a two-week postponement but was rebuffed by the subcommittee.  Mr. Pierce also said he hadn't sought a lawyer in the past because "I believed the investigation was being conducted in a nonadversarial manner that did not require counsel.  After it became apparent that this situation had changed, I undertook extensive efforts to locate experienced counsel with whom I was satisfied."  Mary K. Bush, until recent days a top official at the Federal National Mortgage Association, is expected to be nominated as chairwoman of the new agency that will oversee the Federal Home Loan Bank System, administration sources said.  Housing and Urban Development Secretary Jack Kemp will appoint her to head the Federal Housing Finance Board in the next few days, the sources said.  HUD is currently running the FHFB, which will later become an independent agency.  After review by the White House personnel office, President Bush is expected to nominate her with Secretary Kemp's recommendation.  If confirmed by the Senate to head the quasi-public agency, Ms. Bush would be one of the highest-ranking women in the nation's financial system.  She would also be among the few blacks named to high positions by the administration.  A spokesman at Fannie Mae said Ms. Bush had recently resigned her position as vice president for international finance, which she had held since February 1988.  Before joining Fannie Mae, Ms. Bush was the U.S.'s alternate representative to the International Monetary Fund.  She also worked at the Treasury Department from 1982 to 1984, and before that, at Bankers Trust Co.  The FHFB was created in the massive savings-and-loan bailout legislation as one of the successors to the Federal Home Loan Bank Board.  The supervisory and examination functions of the Bank Board were given to the new Office of Thrift Supervision in the Treasury Department, while control of the 12 home loan banks was given to the FHFB.  For institutions that focus on home lending, the home loan banks, which have nearly $200 billion in assets, have the same function that the Federal Reserve System has for commercial banks.  The quasi-public district banks have a role in regulation and are important lenders to thrifts and other financial institutions that qualify for membership.  Oversight of the home loan banks could be a difficult task in the next few years because Congress saddled the banks with new responsibilities to set up low-income housing programs.  Also, much of the banks' profits will be used to help pay for the thrift bailout.  Ms. Bush was at her office at Fannie Mae yesterday, but referred phone calls to HUD.  A HUD spokeswoman didn't immediately return calls.  The FHFB will have five directors, including the chairman.  One seat will be held by the Secretary Kemp.  Nominees to the other posts haven't been named.  ---  Joe Davidson contributed to this article.  Cadbury Schweppes PLC said it conditionally agreed to acquire Trebor Group Ltd., a closely held U.K. confectioner.  The British soft drink and chocolate group will pay #92.3 million ($144 million) for Trebor, and will assume Trebor's debt of #36.6 million.  The deal will be financed by a share issue that will raise #128.9 million, offering the new shares at 360 pence each on the basis of three new Cadbury shares for every 52 existing Cadbury shares.  In late trading yesterday on London's Stock Exchange, Cadbury was off five pence at 389 pence.  Cadbury's chairman, Sir Dominic Cadbury, said Trebor brings with it a strong portfolio of brands to join the existing group of well-known Cadbury products.  In 1988, Trebor had sales of #117.8 million on trading profit of #7.1 million.  Operating assets amounted to #55.2 million.  Dayton Hudson Corp. said its 60-year-old president, Bruce G. Allbright, will retire Feb. 1, and named the head of its department store unit, Stephen E. Watson, 44, as his heir apparent.  The announcement marks the second time in two years that the Minneapolis-based retailer has lost a president.  In 1987, when the company was fending off a hostile $6 billion takeover offer from the Haft family of Washington, D.C., its then 50-year-old president, Boake A. Sells, jumped ship to take the helm at Twinsburg, Ohio-based Revco D.S. Inc.  Mr. Allbright, who will turn 61 in November, said in an interview that his decision doesn't signal any turmoil in top management at Dayton Hudson.  Mr. Sells couldn't be reached for comment.  Instead, Mr. Allbright said he had been planning for some time to retire at around age 60.  He said he wants to study Spanish and German and travel extensively.  This summer, in fact, he and his wife took one of their grandchildren on a photo safari in Africa.  Mr. Allbright said that when he succeeded Mr. Sells as president, he made a commitment to keep the job for only a "couple of years."  He added: "From the beginning, I came in for a limited tenure."  Mr. Watson, who is chairman and chief executive of the department store unit, was named to the new post of executive vice president, effective immediately.  Kenneth A. Macke, the company's chairman and chief executive officer, said through a spokeswoman that Mr. Watson's promotion makes him "the logical successor" to Mr. Allbright.  The spokeswoman said that Mr. Watson will retain the titles of chairman and chief executive of the department store unit "for the time being."  The boyish-looking Mr. Watson is credited with improving customer service at the department stores and producing better financial results.  He put more sales people on commissions than had been the company's usual practice and he started encouraging employees to go out of their way to satisfy shoppers by doing such things as delivering merchandise to people's homes.  "He has done an extremely good job with the department stores," said Edward Weller, an analyst at Montgomery Securities in San Francisco.  "He changed their culture and made a very service-oriented sales staff from what had become a group of people who were more like clerks.  Chelsea Industries Inc., Boston, said shareholders approved the previously announced $29.50-a-share acquisition of Chelsea by a management group led by Chairman Ronald G. Casty.  Not including the 30% stake that the management group already holds, the transaction is valued at about $43 million.  As reported, holders will receive a payment of 10 cents a share upon redemption of rights issued in connection with Chelsea's shareholder rights plan and a pro-rata portion of Chelsea's quarterly dividend of 18 cents a share.  Chelsea, which makes plastic products and distributes electronic parts, said it expects the acquisition to be completed late next week.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, Chelsea closed yesterday at $29.125 a share, down 12.5 cents.  Foster Wheeler Power Systems Inc. said it received a $142 million contract from Morris County, N.J., for a 1,340 ton-a-day waste-to-energy plant in Roxbury Township.  Under the contract, the plant will be designed, built and operated by an affiliate, Foster Wheeler Morris County Inc.  The plant will generate about 40 megawatts of electricity, to be distributed to New Jersey utilities, and is planned for completion in 1993.  Foster Wheeler Power Systems is a subsidiary of Foster Wheeler Corp., a Clinton, N.J., engineering and construction company.  Foster Wheeler Power is a designer, builder and operator of waste-to-energy and cogeneration plants.  Unisys Corp., Blue Bell, Pa., said it awarded a $100 million contract to American Telephone & Telegraph Co. to upgrade Unisys's internal telecommunications network.  Under the five-year contract, AT&T will improve and expand Unisys's digital network to provide additional voice and data transmission services.  Unisys said it expects the improved network will result in annual savings of about $12 million.  AT&T competed with other major long-distance telecommunications companies for the contract, the companies said yesterday.  Unisys, a major computer manufacturer, has about 500 offices world-wide.  AT&T is based in New York.  Pirelli Tyre Holding N.V. said net income after minority interests grew 7.6% to $48.1 million in the first half, while pretax profit rose 21% to $84.9 million.  The Netherlands holding company for the tire division of Italy's Pirelli Group didn't provide year-earlier figures, and 1988 results were on a pro-forma basis as the company was established earlier that year.  Pirelli Tyre said sales increased 9.3% to $1.58 billion.  Almost half of the growth reflects the consolidation of Pirelli Armstrong Tire Corp. in 1988, Pirelli said.  Pirelli Tyre expects to achieve "a satisfactory increase" in sales and net income in 1989, based on current operating conditions and barring significant changes in exchange rates.  The company didn't specify a figure for the predicted increase.  Pirelli Tyre said capital investments totaled $105 million in the first half.  The sell-off in the nervous U.S. junk bond market continued yesterday, hitting a panic in issues of troubled Campeau Corp.  Fearing massive redemptions from small investors, a number of junk mutual fund managers sold a variety of issues to raise cash.  That resulted in significant flight-to-quality buying of short-term Treasury securities.  Junk debt of two Campeau Corp. units -- Allied Stores Corp. and Federated Department Stores Inc. -- were among the hardest hit in the sell-off.  Campeau, a large Canadian real-estate concern, is in desperate negotiations to raise funds.  Allied's 11 1/2% bonds maturing 1997, a $700 million issue, fell another eight points, or $80 for each $1,000 face amount, to 28 to yield an astounding 46.5%.  Federated's 16% bonds maturing 2000, a $500 million issue, fell about 20 points to 50 to yield 33%.  "This market is not trading on fundamentals.  It is a panic," said a head trader at a large New York investment bank.  "Mutual funds have sold in heavy volume in anticipation of redemptions," the trader said.  Other junk bond fund managers continued to scrutinize their portfolios for risky bonds and to shift into "quality" junk.  "We are extremely selective," said Paul Suckow, director of fixed income at Oppenheimer Management Corp.  "I don't think some issues are going to make it," he said.  Even cautious managers such as Mr. Suckow are seeing the impact of the Campeau debacle.  He said his firm owns "a small amount" of the Federated senior debt.  Although the bonds are secured by bank credits, they have also fallen in price recently.  Generally, the junk market declined about one point.  Macy's 14 1/2 bonds maturing 2001 were bid at 99 to 100 compared with a bid of 100 to 101 Wednesday.  And Kroger Co.'s 12 7/8% bonds maturing 1999 were bid at 103 to 104 late in the day compared with a bid of 104 to 105 Wednesday.  However, traders noted that Kroger, considered by many to be "quality" junk, fell as many as two points in some trades despite an announcement yesterday that several Kroger assets would be sold to raise about $260 million for the company.  In Washington, the nominee for chairman of the Securities and Exchange Commission, Richard Breeden, told the Senate Banking Committee that the junk bond market is "worth the careful attention of the commission," but he added "there isn't any particular problem" with the market currently.  Elsewhere in the corporate market, seasoned high-grade issues closed about 4/32 lower.  Treasury, Agency Securities  Meanwhile, short-term Treasury securities continued to be well-bought, even though the Federal Reserve damped expectations of rate reductions by removing some reserves from the banking system yesterday.  The Fed's move hurt three-month T-bills, which rose .07 of one percent to a rate of 7.58 to yield 7.814.  But investor demand for safe, liquid investments pushed up Treasurys in the two-year to five-year sector by about as much as 1/4 point, or $2.50 for each $1,000 face amount.  The 8.25% two-year note rose 5/32 to 100 9/32, while the 8.25% five-year notes rose 8/32 to 100 26/32.  The 8 1/8 30-year bond rose 7/32 to 99 31/32.  The Treasury market was also helped by yesterday's retail-sales report that showed a moderate rate of consumption in the U.S.  Traders will scrutinize today's bevy of economic statistics for further signs of economic weakness that might cause the Federal Reserve to ease interest rates.  In the agency market, the focus was upon the World Bank's plans to sell an innovative, $1.5 billion bond issue next week designed to be actively traded around the world.  The issue, which will carry either a five-, seven- or 10-year maturity, also will help the World Bank consolidate its dollar-denominated borrowings of $4 billion a year.  If the offering is successful, the World Bank plans to offer two global, dollar-denominated issues each year, rather than a host of smaller offerings targeted to either the U.S. market or the Euromarket, according to Kenneth Lay, the World Bank's managing financial officer for U.S. dollar borrowings.  The deal will be made simultaneously in the U.S. domestic market and Euromarket through an international, 14-member underwriting group led by Deutsche Bank Capital Markets Ltd. and Salomon Brothers Inc.  The issue will essentially mark the World Bank's debut in the U.S. federal "agency" debt market.  Foreign Bonds  Most European bond markets finished slightly lower in quiet trading.  West German government bonds finished at unchanged to slightly lower.  Swiss franc bonds fell about 1/2 point as shortterm Swiss rates continued to rise.  British gilts shrugged off potentially bearish labor market data to close slightly lower.  In Japan, government bond prices also fell slightly on investor profit-taking.  Mortgage-Backed Securities  Mortgage securities gained 5/32 to 6/32 helped by the second straight day of heavy issuance of derivative mortgage securities.  The Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. issued a $500 million real estate mortgage investment conduit backed by 9 1/2% securities through Prudential-Bache Securities Inc., and the Federal National Mortgage Association issued a $475 million Remic backed by 9 1/2% securities.  The nearly $1 billion of agency Remics followed the $1.1 billion that the agencies issued Wednesday.  Dealers noted that the recent shift in the shape of the Treasury yield curve, with short-dated issues outperforming sevenyear and 10-year securities, has made it easier to structure new Remic offerings.  The mortgage market continued to be helped by a "flight to quality" from corporate bonds because of concerns spurred by Campeau Corp.'s financial troubles.  Government National Mortgage Association 9% securities for September delivery ended at 97 25/32, up 6/32; and Freddie Mac 9% securities ended at 96 25/32, up 5/32.  Also, in a recent report, analysts at Salomon Brothers Inc. said they expect supply to continue to build in the mortgage-securities market as thrifts consolidate or shrink.  This will widen mortgage-backed security spreads further, Salomon said.  However, the selling could meet demand in the form of commercial-bank buying.  New capital guidelines for banks favor their investment in mortgage-backed securities.  Municipals  The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey topped the competitive municipal calendar yesterday with two $100 million offerings.  New issues remained in the tax-exempt market spotlight.  Municipal dollar bonds were little changed in late going, with some issues 1/8 point below session highs in tandem with receding Treasurys.  Although issuance has been heavy this week, the activity hasn't to any great degree spilled over into the secondary market, traders said.  Santa Fe Railway said in Chicago that it reached an agreement in which General Electric Co. will maintain its entire fleet of GE locomotives by the end of 1990.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The Santa Fe Pacific Corp. unit also said it has acquired 40 GE locomotives and will acquire an additional 60 in 1990.  Santa Fe already has 157 GE locomotives in its fleet.  Under the agreement, GE will guarantee performance and reliability of the 257 locomotives, and Santa Fe will pay a fee based on mileage operated.  Santa Fe said it has agreed to operate each locomotive a minimum of nearly three million miles over a 15-year period.  The company said the arrangement should result in "significant savings" compared with the costs the railroad incurs to maintain its own locomotives.  Santa Fe said it is considering similar arrangements with other companies that manufacture the locomotives in its fleet.  The Postal Service awarded Westing house Electric Corp. a $33 million contract for bar-code sorters.  The contract calls for the Pittsburgh company's Westinghouse Electronic Systems Group to produce 211 sorters, to be delivered from September 1990 through October 1991.  The pact was the first hardware contract awarded to Westinghouse, the agency said.  The machines will separate as many as 40,000 letters an hour, sorting them by electronically scanning a bar-code representation of the ZIP code on the face of the envelope.  Sorters separate mail, previously bar coded by business mailers, into 96 channels, according to ZIP code areas.  The stock market may have found a new four-letter word.  Junk.  For most of 1989, stocks have risen on a tide of takeovers -- both actual and rumored.  These takeovers have been financed by high-yield, or junk, bonds.  And even though the junk-bond market has been weakening for several months, the stock market has soared ever higher.  But now many investors are saying, in effect, that the stock market can't have it both ways.  They argue that if junk-bond prices fall -- and in recent days they have fallen fast -- a great many stocks will follow.  "You have this dichotomy between the junk-bond market and the value of equities, and it can't persist," says Kyle Krueger, senior vice president of Eagle Asset Management.  "A lot of what has driven the stock market is takeovers.  Inasmuch as that music stops because it's harder to do financings, it makes us cautious, at best, on equities."  Mr. Krueger has raised the cash portion of his $3 billion portfolio to 25%, the highest level since the 1987 crash.  "As the junk market weakens, values will come down not only on actual takeovers but also on stocks that are subject to rumors," adds Wolfgang Armbruster, a special-situation analyst at PaineWebber.  "The effect on stocks could be enormous, depending on where the junk market settles."  Although junk-bond prices have been weak for months, they got a jolt this week when cash problems deepened at Campeau Corp.'s retail empire, a house that was built, leveraged brick by leveraged brick, with junk bonds.  At times this week, bidding has just about dried up for some of the weaker junk bonds.  The gap by which the interest rates on a Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette junk-bond index exceeded those on seven-year Treasury bonds has widened to 6.1 percentage points, its highest ever.  This so-called spread is a measure of the perceived risk of owning junk.  In the past two days, as the depth of Campeau's problems have become apparent, takeover stocks have taken a pounding.  "We're in a minipanic," one takeover speculator says.  Yesterday alone, UAL lost 2 3/4 to finish at 280 1/2 and American Medical International was down 1 to 23 3/8.  Stocks flying on merely the talk of takeovers fared no better; Goodrich fell 2 to 55 3/4, McGraw-Hill was down 1 1/2 to 73 1/2, and AMR slipped 4 1/8 to 77 5/8.  Since the start of 1986, junk bonds have financed $59.9 billion of takeovers, according to Securities Data Co., based in Newark, N.J. (These bonds also have financed billions of dollars in corporate recapitalizations.)  If that pace slows down, analysts say, Wall Street could return to its traditional method of valuing stocks according to earnings.  Recently, "valuations have tended to gravitate away from earnings to so-called private-market values," Mr. Krueger notes.  But he says that trend is changing.  Michael Metz, an analyst at Oppenheimer who specializes in leveraged buy-out candidates, agrees.  "The day of the great acquisition motivated by financial considerations is over," he says.  "It will be replaced by strategic acquisitions."  In other words, corporations will replace "LBO types" as buyers, and they will tend to pay lower prices.  Buyers, he says, will have to rely on their own credit.  The game of promising to pay off debt by selling assets to someone else -- Campeau's failed strategy -- may be winding down.  "Asset values become suspect," says Robert Raiff, co-head of research at C.J. Lawrence, Morgan Grenfell.  "You can own a $1 million house and still go bankrupt owing $10,000.  "If you can't liquefy assets, it raises questions about what the value is.  You can be asset-rich and cash-poor."  Shares of Hilton Hotels, one rumored target, could lose 25% of their value without the prospect of a takeover, Mr. Krueger says.  One measure of the "takeover premium" built into stocks is that companies acquired this year have generally been sold at 30% to 50% more than stock prices prevailing a month before a bid was announced, according to IDD Information Services.  Not everyone agrees that stocks are headed for trouble.  "I think the junk-bond market is but a fraction of the stock market.  What's important {to stocks} is the direction of the economy," says Michael Steinhardt, a New York investment manager.  Raymond Minella, co-head of Merrill Lynch's merchant-banking department, which includes its high-yield, junk-bond division, says the thesis that stocks will sneeze when junk catches cold "makes sense in itself.  However, P-E multiples as opposed to late '87 are a lot lower.  So it would seem that there is more margin for error."  Also, Mr. Minella says, the M&A business isn't going away.  But, he adds, deals will be more conservatively capitalized.  James Caywood, a principal in Caywood Christian Capital Management, a junk-bond investor and manager, says buyers are likely to demand that junk issuers put in "more of their own dough" and reject funny-money junk of the zero-coupon, non-cash variety.  Stocks will still be bought out -- but perhaps not as frequently, and probably at lower prices.  Some investors expect that higher-quality junk issues will rebound.  Mr. Raiff says "the greatest opportunity in the market today is distressed bonds."  Michael Price, president of Mutual Shares Corp., says "there's no way stocks will stay where they are with the whole junk market dropping.  Something has to give."  But although he believes stocks are vulnerable to a fall, some junk bonds could be poised to go the other way.  "Some of these bonds have moved down incredibly," he says.  "We're starting to become buyers."  However, even if junk bonds make a partial recovery, buy-out artists may have trouble funding fresh deals.  In just about any industry, investors can buy old bonds at fractions of their original price.  "You have to wonder, why would anyone finance a new deal at par when there are hundreds of deals which are trading at a discount?" a takeover speculator says.  Also, investment bankers may be less eager to advance temporary "bridge loans" if a later refinancing from junk isn't a sure thing.  First Boston, for instance, is stuck with an investment in Ohio Mattress -- whose junk bonds were spurned by investors -- and in the Federated department-store unit of struggling Campeau.  "In the short term, it's likely that investment bankers will re-examine their commitments to do bridge loans," PaineWebber's Mr. Armbruster says.  Buy-outs financed by banks -- such as the one proposed for UAL -- should fare better than junk-financed deals.  But he says the general caution is likely to spill over to bank-financed deals as well.  Compaq Computer Corp., Houston, said it bought an idled manufacturing plant in Stirling, Scotland, from cash-strapped Wang Laboratories Inc.  Terms weren't disclosed, but an industry source estimated the price at less than $20 million.  Wang, Lowell, Mass., has been shedding assets in an effort to return to financial health.  In contrast, Compaq has been expanding, particularly in Europe, where personal computer sales are growing faster than in the U.S.  Compaq recently said it would spend $37.5 million to expand its Erskine, Scotland, manufacturing facility to 490,000 square feet from 230,000 to meet demand in Europe.  Compaq's European sales accounted for about 44% of its $1.4 billion in revenue for 1989's first six months.  In 1988, European sales accounted for about 39% of its $2.07 billion in revenue.  The computer maker said it will move service and repair operations to the old Wang facility, which has about 135,000 square feet and is about 35 miles from the Erskine plant.  MAGAZINE: David Sendler, editor of TV Guide's national feature section and the highest-ranking editorial staff member on the masthead, resigned after 13 years with the magazine, part of Rupert Murdoch's News Corp.  He said, "We have had some differences, but I have the highest respect for the professionalism of the Murdoch Magazines people."  He said he will remain as consulting editor to the magazine.  WHO'S NEWS: Capital Cities/ABC named Gary Ingersoll president of Chilton Co., a unit of this media company's publishing division.  He was president of Word Inc., another ABC publishing company.  Palladium futures prices surged for the second consecutive day on rumors that the Soviet Union might cut back sales of the metal.  The rally temporarily boosted prices of platinum, gold and silver, but by the end of the session all had fallen back, with only palladium retaining a significant advance.  December delivery palladium ended with a gain of $3.55 an ounce at $142.65, after trading as high as $145.00.  October platinum had the greatest drop from its peak of the day, $483.50 an ounce, to its settling price of $472, a loss for the day of $2.90.  December gold rose 50 cents an ounce to $365.50, and December silver dropped 1.5 cents an ounce to settle at $5.1570.  A softer dollar early in the day also helped gold and silver prices to rise, but the dollar's later rally had a depressing effect that more than offset the supporting influence of palladium, an analyst said.  There was also some uncertainty among traders prior to the issuance today of the trade deficit and producer price index data that might have caused some of the selling, he said.  Palladium is principally used in the electronic and dental industries, which account for about 80% of its consumption.  The Soviet Union is the major producer; in 1988, it exported 1.73 million ounces, or 53%, of non-Communist world supplies of 3.2 million ounces, according to Neil Carson, marketing manager for Johnson Matthey Inc., Philadelphia.  Over the past year, palladium's price has twice risen sharply.  The first time was last December following an announcement by Ford Motor Co. that it had developed an automotive catalytic converter which wouldn't use platinum.  It was presumed that palladium would replace the platinum, even though Ford didn't say as much, according to Nina Lipton, research manager for the Platinum Guild International, an industry group.  Early this year, reports that cold fusion had been achieved with the use of palladium and platinum also pushed prices higher.  "Although other researchers couldn't duplicate the original experiments in Utah, they do feel that something happened, but they don't know exactly what.  It's a question that hasn't been resolved yet," Ms. Lipton said.  The cold-fusion experiments helped push the palladium price to an April 14 high of $180.65 for the June futures contract on the New York Mercantile Exchange, Ms. Lipton noted.  Palladium's all-time high was on March 6, 1980, when it traded at $356 an ounce.  Johnson Matthey's Mr. Carson said that at the beginning of this week, palladium in the cash market traded between $134 and $135 an ounce.  "European buying subsequently developed that pushed the price up to $136 to $137 {an ounce}," Mr. Carson said.  "The demand came from banks on the Continent, but it wasn't known for whom they were buying."  Yesterday, Mr. Carson said there was strong buying by U.S. dealers and industrial users of the metal.  That pushed the cash market price up to as high as $143 before it fell back to $141, he said.  "Through most of this year, the Soviet Union has become increasingly reluctant to sell palladium to the Free World," Mr. Carson said.  "It is thought that they might want to use more of it themselves.  It isn't known whether it has actually sold less or whether it has just been less willing to sell," he said.  South Africa is the second-largest supplier, accounting for about 34% of supplies, with the remainder coming from Canada and one mine in the U.S., he said.  Jeffrey Nichols, managing director of APMA (Canada) Ltd., of Toronto, said that while the Soviet Union over the past year has been very sensitive to market action and price movements in palladium, the metal isn't a major source of foreign exchange, as is gold.  "As a result, it can make sales in keeping with market conditions without having a significant effect on its economy," Mr. Nichols said.  "Last year, it's estimated the Soviet Union made between $220 million and $230 million from sales of palladium.  It made billions on gold."  In other commodity markets yesterday:  COPPER: Futures prices rose on concern over tightening supplies for immediate delivery.  The September contract, which will soon expire, advanced 4.90 cents a pound to $1.3730, while December gained 1.50 cents to $1.2870.  Ben Hanauer, a metals trader at Rudolf Wolff & Co., New York metals brokers, observed that the shrinking inventories and strong demand for physical copper were creating a greater premium for the September contract over December.  Since Aug. 31, the first day that delivery notices were issued against the September contract, he said, the price spread between the two months "has been widening every day."  As a result of yesterday's closes, September's premium over December increased by 3.4 cents a pound to 8.6 cents, Mr. Hanauer said.  Commodity Exchange warehouse supplies are expected to continue to decline, he said.  Last week's rise in London Metal Exchange inventories of copper came about because a single shipment of copper that couldn't be sold was put into the exchange's warehouses, Mr. Hanauer said.  The more than two-week-long strike at the El Salvador mine in Chile came to an end, an analyst said.  But it had little effect on the market because it had been expected, especially after the recent very close vote to return to work, he said.  El Salvador produces about 100,000 tons of refined copper annually, he said.  In Canada, Highland Valley management is expected to respond to proposals made by the union on wages, pensions and the contracting out of work by the company, the analyst said.  SUGAR: Futures prices declined because of quiet conditions in the world cash market for the sweetener.  The October contract fell 0.41 cent a pound to 13.66 cents.  For the third time in recent weeks, India canceled its tender to buy 200,000 tons of refined sugar, Judith Ganes, analyst for Shearson Lehman Hutton noted.  India didn't reschedule when it would buy again, Ms. Ganes said, "but it's widely expected that it will buy sugar when the price is right to make up for its current shortfall" of supplies to demand.  Another analyst said that with the present lack of buying interest in the world market, India has become the focal point, particularly because of its repeated cancellation of scheduled purchases.  "Although it isn't unusual for India to behave this way, there are some who think that India may not be a buyer in the near future, after all, even though it has a supply shortfall," he said.  GRAINS And SOYBEANS: Wheat futures prices edged lower following Wednesday's sharp selloff, while corn and soybean futures prices gained slightly.  Analysts said the Agriculture Department's announcement Wednesday night that the acreage of harvested wheat will be allowed to increase slightly to 69.6 million acres from an estimated 67.5 million acres eased many traders' fears of a sharp acreage increase that could depress prices.  In commenting on the acreage increase, Agriculture Secretary Clayton Yeutter said it "does not suggest that we expect another year of less-than-average wheat yields, nor will it boost stocks significantly.  But it will help restore stocks to safer levels."  Analysts also said it appeared the Soviet Union would import a certain amount of grain before the end of the year, in contrast to uncertainty regarding the Soviet Union's grain import plans that rocked the market Wednesday.  Wheat futures contracts for delivery next July on the Chicago Board of Trade dropped 0.75 cent to $3.4625 a bushel.  Soybean futures for November delivery gained 1.25 cents to settle at $5.7625 a bushel and corn futures for delivery in December gained 2.5 cents to end at $2.32 a bushel.  Property Trust of America, facing a hostile tender offer, postponed distribution of its shareholder purchase rights, delaying the effect of the anti-takeover move.  The real estate investment trust, based in El Paso, Texas, said it postponed the distribution of the rights until Sept. 30.  Sizeler Property Investors Inc., a Kenner, La., real estate investment trust, began an $11-a-share tender offer for 45% of Property Trust's shares Sept. 1, allowing Property Trust to distribute the rights, which are intended to make a hostile acquisition prohibitively expensive.  Property Trust has rejected Sizeler's tender offer.  Property Trust also said that doesn't intend to redeem the shareholder rights, but that delaying distribution will give the trust "more flexibility to respond to future developments."  Under Property Trust's poison pill, the rights can be distributed once a hostile acquirer begins a tender offer for more than 20% of the trust's shares.  If Sizeler's tender offer is successful, Sizeler would own more than 50% of Property Trust.  The stock market's love affair with takeover candidates turned sour, and widespread selling of those issues proved to be the catalyst for a broadbased decline.  Nervousness about the prospects for junk bonds in light of a cash squeeze at Campeau, a major issuer of high-yield debt, led market players to unload stocks of actual and rumored acquisition targets.  Blue-chip issues fared considerably better than the broad market, as the takeover-related selling had a relatively mild impact on those stocks.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average fell 14.63 to 2664.89.  By contrast, the number of New York Stock Exchange issues that declined in price reached a four-week high, and losers outnumbered gainers on the Big Board by nearly 3-1, as 1,108 issues fell while only 396 advanced.  Along with the takeover worries, traders cited uncertainty about today's release of several sets of U.S. economic data and the "triple witching hour" expiration of September stock-index futures and options.  "Most institutions have made up their minds that they were going to be out of the market this week, because it was just too volatile and there were too many things going on," said Jack Baker, head of the equity block trading desk at Shearson Lehman Hutton.  Volume slowed to 149,250,000 shares on the Big Board from 175,330,000 the day before, largely because of a drop in futures-related program trading ahead of the September expirations.  Rounds of buy programs related to stock-index arbitrage hit the market twice in the afternoon, but their impact was short-lived.  Among broader averages, the Standard & Poor's 500-Stock Index dropped 2.30 to 343.16, the Dow Jones Equity Market Index skidded 2.35 to 322.38, and the Big Board's Composite Index went down 1.34 to 190.95.  Although market activity has been light all week, traders predict that as many as 100 million shares will change hands on the Big Board at the opening as today's "triple witching" session begins.  The heavy trading is generally expected to put additional pressure on prices, but traders and analysts say the economic data are likely to influence the extent of the selling.  Figures on August producer prices and the July trade deficit, along with three reports on the state of the industrial economy, are due today.  If they should prove better than expected, Mr. Baker said, buyers will "take up a lot of the slack."  But Michael Metz, a market strategist at Oppenheimer & Co., said the troubles faced by Campeau and others who have used junk bonds to finance acquisitions will continue to undercut the speculative interest that has boosted many stocks in recent months.  "The whole takeover game will never be the same again.  A lot of traders and speculators are really having their heads handed to them," he said.  "It's going to put a virtual end to the intensity of the speculation."  Toronto-based Campeau Wednesday announced widening losses at its Federated Department Stores and Allied Stores units and disclosed further details of its difficulties in meeting debt payments.  But market players yesterday didn't distinguish among takeover stocks, as shares involved in already-arranged deals that don't require junk-bond financing fell along with those that are only rumored candidates.  Woolworth, recently named as a possible target for investor Meshulam Riklis, tumbled 3 1/4 to 64 3/4 in active trading.  Other rumor stocks finishing high on the active list included Eastman Kodak, which went down 5/8 to 48 1/8 as 1.3 million shares changed hands in composite trading; Upjohn, down 5/8 to 36 3/4; and Valero Energy, down 1 1/2 to 17 1/4.  Circle K, the most active Big Board issue, fell 3/8 to 7 3/8 on 2.2 million shares after suspending its dividend and halting efforts to find a buyer.  Warner Communications, which has agreed to be acquired by Time Warner for cash and preferred stock, declined 5/8 to 63 1/4 on 1.4 million shares.  Oil stocks viewed as potential targets retreated after the chief executive officer of British Petroleum's exploration unit denied speculation that BP plans an offer for a U.S. oil company soon.  Phillips Petroleum fell 7/8 to 26 5/8 on 1.3 million shares, Unocal lost 1 5/8 to 54 1/2, Burlington Resources was unchanged at 47 1/2, Kerr McGee slipped 1 to 48 3/8, and Amerada Hess slid 1 1/4 to 41 3/4.  Oryx Energy, which agreed to acquire certain oil and gas properties from BP for $1.35 billion, retreated 2 1/4 to 38 7/8.  BP fell 1/2 to 60 1/2 after climbing 1 1/8 Wednesday on anticipation of the sale, part of a restructuring of its exploration operations.  Takeover-related losses were especially evident in the airline and hotel groups, both of which had rallied recently on news of acquisitions and asset sales and on expectations that the activity would continue.  The Dow Jones Transportation Average fell 25.96 to 1443.28, its sixth loss in the past seven sessions.  UAL, the owner of United Airlines, fell 2 3/4 to 280 1/2; United's machinists union called for rejection of a $300-a-share offer from a group that includes management, the airline's pilots union and British Airways.  AMR, the owner of American Airlines, plunged 4 1/8 to 77 5/8; Delta Air Lines skidded 2 7/8 to 71 5/8; USAir Group dropped 1 3/8 to 46 5/8; and Southwest Airlines eased 1 1/8 to 26 3/4.  As for hotel and casino issues, Hilton Hotels dropped 2 3/8 to 102 5/8, Holiday fell 1 5/8 to 80, Marriott slipped 3/8 to 38 3/8, Caesars World skidded 1 3/4 to 35, and Ramada lost 3/8 to 14 3/8.  Stocks of major banks and brokerage firms also fell victim to nervousness about the takeover and junk-bond markets.  In the banking sector, Citicorp went down 1 1/4 to 30 5/8 on 1.3 million shares, and Bankers Trust New York fell 1 5/8 to 51 7/8; among brokerage issues, Merrill Lynch retreated 3/4 to 32 1/8, Morgan Stanley Group lost 1 1/2 to 76 3/4, and Salomon slid 5/8 to 25 3/4.  Bank of New York dropped 2 1/8 to 50 amid rumors that the company holds a large portfolio of Campeau bonds.  The company denied owning any of the bonds but acknowledged having a working-capital loan outstanding to one of Campeau's department-store units.  Precious-metals stocks, a traditional haven for investors in times of uncertainty, outgained all other Dow Jones industry groups.  Battle Mountain Gold advanced 1/8 to 14 3/8, Homestake Mining rose 1/4 to 15, and ASA climbed 5/8 to 42.  Other metals stocks that avoided being caught in the market's retreat included Phelps Dodge, which closed unchanged at 67; Asarco, which rose 1/2 to 34 7/8; and Magma Copper, which gained 1/4 to 7 in American Stock Exchange trading.  Drexel Burnham Lambert began coverage of the copper producers with buy recommendations, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Stocks of generic-drug makers, which some analysts are telling investors to hold onto despite the industry's recent regulatory problems, posted gains.  On the Big Board, Par Pharmaceutical went up 1/4 to 5 7/8 and Biocraft Laboratories added 7/8 to 19 1/4; Bolar Pharmaceutical gained 1 5/8 to 19 7/8 and Halsey Drug rose 3/8 to 6 1/8 on the Amex.  Monsanto fell 4 3/4 to 113 3/4.  Analysts at a number of firms, including Morgan Stanley, Prudential-Bache Securities and Mabon Nugent, lowered their earnings estimates after the company advised them of a slowdown in sales of its Roundup herbicide.  Hexcel dropped 1 7/8 to 24 7/8.  Drexel lowered its estimates of the company's 1989 and 1990 earnings, citing a downbeat presentation at an aerospace conference that the firm sponsored.  AMRE was an exception to the rule among takeover stocks as it advanced 1 1/2 to 9 1/4 after news that three top executives are holding talks about a possible management buy-out.  The American Stock Exchange Index dropped 2.83 to 380.94, its steepest decline since late June.  Volume totaled 12,510,000 shares, compared with 15,110,000 Wednesday.  There were 184 issues advancing in price, 396 declining and 273 unchanged.  Unicorp American went down 3/4 to 3 3/8.  Unicorp Canada withdrew an offer to reorganize the company, which said it plans a liquidation of its real estate portfolio and the suspension of its quarterly dividend.  The nation's stockbrokers, rebuffed by investors last year, are renewing their assault on the huge $150 billion motherlode of bank certificates of deposit coming due next month.  The brokers lost the battle last October, when banks persuaded most CD investors to simply roll over the mountain of money they had pulled out of stocks and bonds in the wake of the 1987 crash.  Consider a recent internal message to brokers at Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc. "Investors Are Awash With Cash," barks a boldfaced headline on the front page of the firm's "Hotline" publication.  "You Can Have It."  What brokers are chasing is a pile of dollars that dwarfs the $30 billion to $50 billion of CDs maturing in a typical month, brokerage officials say.  About 98% of certificates usually are rolled over into new CDs.  But this October the brokers think they have a better chance to breach the banks' defenses.  With the stock market near record levels -- and CD rates sharply down from six months and a year ago -- securities firms are prodding their brokers to snatch the money back.  "This represents a dramatic opportunity for Smith Barney account executives to capture additional assets," gushes an internal notice to brokers at Smith Barney, Harris Upham & Co.  "We can make the case" that most CD investors are "dramatically underinvested."  Americans hold $1.13 trillion in CDs of banks and savings and loans.  October was a big rollover month even before the crash, largely because a flood of CD money was invested when short-term CDs were fully deregulated in October 1983. (Many small investors in CDs prefer the relatively short six-month and one-year types.)  Much of the money sunk into CDs since the crash comes from more-aggressive investors who previously had been in stocks and bonds.  Since October 1987, the total amount of CD investments outstanding has surged by more than $240 billion, or about 27%, according to Federal Reserve statistics.  Smith Barney -- which says much of that post-crash money consists of two-year CDs maturing now, and one-year CDs coming due for the second time -- privately estimates that nearly $150 billion is maturing in October.  That gold mine marks the best chance in two years for asset-starved securities firms to grab back investors spooked by Black Monday.  "Given the positive performance of the capital markets since the crash, many investors may be amenable to looking at longer-term fixed-income securities, equities, or packaged products as an alternative to CDs," says the internal Smith Barney notice.  Shearson Lehman has compiled a list of ideas to peddle to safety-conscious investors looking for yields of more than 9%.  Its alternatives: high-risk, high-yield junk bonds such as Adelphia Communications Corp. and convertible securities such as Perry Drug Stores Inc.  The internal Shearson publication has another option for "clients with idle assets": the SLH High Yield Fund, which boasts monthly distributions higher than that of either CDs or money-market funds.  Junk-bond funds do carry considerable risk, as their shares will plummet if junk-bond prices do.  Other firms have taken different tacks.  PaineWebber Inc. recently mailed shareholders a special "Investment Dispatch" pamphlet entitled "How To Keep Earning High Yields After Your CDs Mature."  Some suggestions: Consider alternatives from mortgage-backed securities to junk bonds.  "For a portion of your portfolio, you may choose to lock in higher rates long-term, ladder your invested assets or try something completely new," the dispatch says.  Merrill Lynch & Co. -- which last year predicted the "dawn of a new bull market" in bonds -- says those who simply roll over six-month and one-year CDs will be "unpleasantly surprised."  Randy Gretz, a Merrill Lynch group vice president, says investors "are already surprised at what they're seeing now {in rates} compared with a year ago."  Merrill continues to urge CD investors to go into, among other things, Treasury securities and longer-term CDs sold through brokers, Mr. Gretz says.  Of course, there's an added incentive for brokers to steer their clients out of CDs: hefty commissions.  Brokers can make $500 selling a mutual fund with a 5% load on a $10,000 investment -- 10 times what they'd make selling the same amount of a one-year CD.  "What brokers try to do starting out is to use CDs as a capture plan," says a broker for a large Wall Street firm who asked not to be identified.  "At first, they're conservative, and roll it over -- then they hit {investors} up for a stock idea down the road."  Banks, for their part, face an uphill struggle in keeping their CD stash.  Although some banks in competitive areas such as California and New England still offer yields of about 9%, rates on most CDs now are far lower than they were in the spring.  Translation: far fewer opportunities to advertise alluring rates.  "There's no way any bank can offer the sexy, double-digit yields of the second quarter," says Robert Hutchinson, senior vice president at Manufacturers Hanover Bank, New York.  But the banks aren't playing dead.  Manufacturers Hanover this week started a new series of ads that push "Power Savings" -- a souped-up savings account for people to park their money in until they can lock in higher CD rates later.  Small rural institutions are trying special promotions.  Mid Kansas Federal Savings & Loan Association, Wichita, will launch a program starting Oct. 1 offering plaid "stadium blankets" to help peddle its CDs.  Other October offerings include hot apple cider.  The CD money coming due next month "is going to be heavy," notes Skip Brasted, Mid Kansas Federal's marketing director.  "We just felt we needed an added incentive to keep people's money with us."  (See related story: "Your Money Matters: Pros Tell Investors to Play It Safe" -- WSJ Sept. 15, 1989)  John A. Mendelson, a stock market analyst whose comments once rocked Wall Street, resigned from Dean Witter Reynolds Inc. along with a senior assistant, Donald Kimsey.  The resignations of the two analysts reflect an industrywide policy shift that is being felt particularly at Dean Witter, a unit of Sears, Roebuck & Co.  According to Dean Witter brokers who were briefed, the resignations grew partly out of Dean Witter's desire to tie Messrs.  Mendelson's and Kimsey's pay to the amount of money-generating ideas they produced for Dean Witter brokers.  Mr. Mendelson has been stubbornly bearish in recent years, and brokers have complained he hasn't helped them sell stocks during this year's rally.  Increasingly competitive and cost-conscious securities firms have sought to squeeze more profits from their research staffs by paying analysts and researchers based on how well their work actually helps sell stocks and bonds.  In the past, such high-profile analysts enjoyed straight salaries that didn't always reflect how valuable their advice actually was to brokers.  Mr. Mendelson, 49 years old, made periodic market comments to Dean Witter brokers and to institutional clients, although Dean Witter analyst John D. Connolly has lately had the highest profile at the firm.  Mr. Kimsey provided a daily options commentary and an update on blue-chips stocks.  Mr. Mendelson, reached at home, said he left Dean Witter to become a professional trader, manage some money and write a market letter for institutions.  "I leave with no bad feelings about the firm," he said.  Mr. Kimsey didn't return phone calls.  Dean Witter announced the resignations to brokers on its internal speaker system, without providing details.  The company declined to comment further.  Mr. Mendelson was for years one of Wall Street's best-known market gurus.  But he lost some of his clout in the past three years by being bearish no matter what, causing investors who followed his advice to miss out on the stock market's dizzying gains in 1986 and early 1987.  Mr. Mendelson's last big splash was July 7, 1986, when he issued a "sell" signal that helped spark a 61.87-point decline, then a one-day record, in the Dow Jones Industrial Average.  It was one of the biggest declines ever sparked by a market guru.  Unfortunately, Mr. Mendelson stayed bearish for the ensuing year while the market roared ahead 883 points, or 48%.  Mr. Mendelson gained his reputation by correctly predicting big advances in 1982 and 1984, and a retreat in 1983.  But Dean Witter brokers say they've been disenchanted he has remained bearish despite the market's more than 20% gain this year.  Dean Witter hired Mr. Mendelson in January 1984 from Morgan Stanley & Co., when he was known in some investment circles as the "new Moses."  Even then he had his critics, but he responded to such sniping by quoting Baron Rothschild's famous remark about how he made money in the market: "I always sold too soon."  Mr. Mendelson has studied Chinese history and once worked for the Central Intelligence Agency.  He explained in a 1984 interview that at the CIA he "learned two skills that are very useful in the market: hand-to-hand combat and escape and evasion."  Investors with certificates of deposit coming due next month should play it safe.  That's the advice from financial professionals, who say the risks now are just too great for CD investors to suddenly jump into stocks.  Instead, these advisers say, CD holders should put most of their rollover money into low-risk investments.  CDs and Treasury bills are the favored investments for people who may need their money within six months to a year and those who depend on reliable interest payments, the advisers say.  While yields on money-market mutual funds are still quite attractive, those yields will decline in the months ahead if interest rates tumble.  For people who want higher returns than they can get on CDs, and who can live with a little more risk and uncertainty, the advisers' investments of choice are intermediate-term bond funds, intermediate-term Treasury securities and so-called asset-allocation mutual funds, which shift investors' money among stocks, bonds and cash.  The stock market may be fine for some portion of the CD rollover money, several financial advisers say, but only if an investor is willing to take some chances.  Even then, the advisers urge investors to be conservative.  "I'd stick to blue chips and do it through mutual funds," says Donald Sherman, a Walnut Creek, Calif., financial planner.  Hank Madden, a planner with IDS Financial Services in Jacksonville, Fla., suggests that investors who want to buy stocks buy a high-grade municipal bond fund and use the income from that fund to buy shares in an equity mutual fund.  It's generally considered prudent for investors to have some of their money in stocks as part of a balanced portfolio.  And the stock market could be especially tempting for CD investors who've missed out on the handsome returns over the past year.  While people who put their money in CDs a year ago have had to be content with an average return of about 8%, those who went into stocks have enjoyed a total return of more than 30%.  But for investors who've been out of the market, the advisers say the current risks are just too great to start putting substantial funds into it now.  "For the market to rise 25% to 30% a year is very unusual and we've already achieved that in the first eight months," says Mr. Madden.  "There's no reason not to expect a correction."  Investors who do put some of their rollover money into stocks or stock mutual funds should be prepared to think long term.  "Unless someone has dollars they can really kiss goodbye for a few years, I tell them to stay away from the market," says Timothy Chase, a financial planner with the firm of Walpert, Smullian & Blumenthal in Baltimore.  Because of the stock market's ups and downs, an investor who suddenly needs money could be forced to sell at a loss.  "The chances of losing money in the stock market in a year are about 30%," says Ken Gregory, a San Francisco investment manager.  "Over five years the risk drops dramatically, and over 10 years it's practically nil."  If CD investors want to stick with the safety of insured CDs, they "have to become accustomed to the fact that this is a lower rate environment," says Mr. Gregory.  CD yields have dropped substantially since April, when many of the CDs coming due next month were purchased.  Major banks are currently offering an average of 8% on a six-month CD of less than $55,000, according to Banxquote Money Markets, a New York information service.  That's down from 9.10% in late April.  Yields on money-market mutual funds, which aren't federally insured but are considered relatively risk-free, liquid investments, also have fallen.  According to Donoghue's Money Fund Report, a newsletter based in Holliston, Mass., the latest average seven-day compound yield on taxable money funds was 8.61%, compared with 9.62% in April.  Treasury bills are down, too, with the six-month T-bill sold at Monday's auction yielding 8.06%.  It was 9.25% on April 24.  These lower yields may not be as bad as they look, however.  On a $20,000 investment, for example, a full percentage point decline means a difference of just $200 a year.  And Treasury bills are also exempt from state taxes, which at current rates would boost the yield on a six-month T-bill to the equivalent of 8.71% for someone paying 7.5% in state taxes.  Still, there are ways to increase returns without greatly increasing risk.  Edward D. McCarthy, a Providence, R.I., financial planner, says "hybrid" mutual funds that invest in both money-market securities and bonds "may provide a fairly stable investment with higher yields."  Kurt Brouwer, a San Francisco investment adviser, prefers bonds that mature in two to five years or bond funds.  The price fluctuations are moderate, he says, and "you know you can hold out that long."  Long-term bonds probably aren't for the typical CD investor, several advisers say.  "The kind of person who's been in a bank can't stand the heat of long-term bonds," Mr. Brouwer says.  If interest rates rise just 1%, the value of a 30-year bond drops 8% to 10%, he notes.  Mr. Madden, the IDS financial planner in Jacksonville, suggests that people who are determined to put some of their CD rollover money in stocks buy a high-grade municipal-bond fund and use the income from that fund to buy shares in an equity mutual fund.  ---  Jill Bettner contributed to this article.  (See related story: "Firms Train Guns on Maturing CDs" -- WSJ Sept. 15, 1989)  After months of wrangling, the House Ways and Means Committee approved a reduction in the tax on capital gains.  The 19-17 vote was a big victory for President Bush and a defeat for the committee's chairman, Illinois Democrat Dan Rostenkowski.  As part of the same legislation, the committee also voted to limit tax refunds for corporations involved in leveraged buyouts and to repeal a tax law that compelled companies to offer comparable health fringe benefits to both top executives and rank-and-file workers.  The provisions are part of a much larger piece of legislation the panel approved last night, also by a vote of 19-17.  The measure includes tax increases, tax reductions and other law changes meant to cut the federal deficit in line with congressional budget directives.  It is intended to reduce the projected deficit for fiscal 1990, which begins Oct. 1, by $8 billion.  The tax changes, on balance, would add about $6 billion to U.S. coffers in fiscal 1990.  The capital-gains measure, authored by Rep. Ed Jenkins (D., Ga.), is opposed by the Democratic leadership in Congress.  Still, it has a good chance of passing the House because it is backed by a solid phalanx of Republicans and a minority of Democrats.  In the Senate, it will be competing with a proposal by Sen. Lloyd Bentsen (D., Texas) to expand the deduction for individual retirement accounts, which would benefit many more people.  Still, Sen. Bentsen said yesterday that the House committee's action will make it "more difficult" to gain approval of the IRA provision in the Senate Finance Committee, which he heads.  Although administration officials had been trying to find some compromise that both Republicans and Rep. Rostenkowski could support, they nonetheless were pleased by the committee vote.  Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady called it "a major step forward in providing incentives for long-term investment in the U.S."  But Rep. Rostenkowski said the vote "is a disappointment to me, and it is going to be a financial disaster for this country."  For most of this year, the chances of a capital-gains tax cut seemed minuscule.  But in the spring, at the behest of the president, Rep Rostenkowski floated the idea of a temporary cut as a way to raise revenue for deficit reduction.  After that, the genie was out of the bottle.  Though Rep. Rostenkowski later backed off at the urging of many fellow Democrats, Rep. Jenkins was able to quietly knit together a coalition of six Democrats and all 13 of the committee's Republicans in support of the capital-gains measure that passed yesterday.  The result will be a partisan conflagration, though chances are strong that the proposal will succeed, at least in its next step in the legislative process -- the House floor.  A leading challenge is Sen. Bentsen's proposal to extend deductible IRAs to all taxpayers instead of reducing the capital-gains tax.  He said yesterday that his plan to expand IRAs probably wouldn't take effect until 1991.  House Majority Leader Richard Gephardt (D., Mo.,), speaking for the Democratic leadership, derided the vote on capital gains.  He said a cut in the capital-gains rate would benefit only the wealthiest Americans and that middle-income and lower-income taxpayers will end up paying for the revenue-losing measure.  "The question is who pays for this folly," Mr. Gephardt said.  "The answer is clear."  Mr. Gephardt also disputed the contention that the cut would stimulate economic growth.  "There is no evidence that a cut in capital gains will invigorate the economy," he said.  But Rep. Bill Archer (R., Texas), a cosponsor of the proposal, said, "This is a big win for the country.  What we're doing is ensuring the creation of jobs and more investment."  He said the fight on the House floor will be bruising, but Republicans and enough Democrats support the measure for it to win.  Mr. Gephardt said several Democratic alternatives are being drafted in preparation for the floor battle, although three of those were rejected by the panel yesterday: the expanded IRA, an increase in the top nominal tax rate on the richest taxpayers to 33% from the current 28%, and targeting the benefit of the capital-gains tax cut to middle-income taxpayers.  In line with the wishes of Rep. Rostenkowski, the panel decided to repeal the fringe benefit law, known as Section 89.  The law was vigorously opposed by business and labor lobbyists as overly complicated.  Rep. Rostenkowski had tried to simplify it, but was overwhelmed and bowed to pressure for repeal, saving only minor parts.  In addition, the plan would give a temporary extension, through Dec. 31, 1991, to the 25% deduction that self-employed individuals can take for the purchase of health insurance.  This is in line with a bill proposed by Rep. Byron Dorgan (D., N.D.).  But to pay for the provision, the panel accepted a proposal of Sen. Bentsen that would limit federal tax refunds for corporate leveraged buy-outs.  The provision would reduce the amount of losses that can be carried back for tax purposes by corporations that replace equity with debt.  In leveraged buy-outs and certain corporate restructurings, companies often take on large amounts of debt to buy back stock.  In the early years after these transactions, interest on the debt sometimes wipes out profit.  Under the Bentsen bill, companies that have enough losses because of this kind of debt to claim refunds of taxes paid on previous years' profit would be prevented from claiming those refunds.  Instead, they would have to deduct the losses against profit in future years.  The legislation would raise $200 million in fiscal 1990, which begins Oct. 1, and $1.8 billion over five years.  Separately, Rep. Robert Matsui (D., Calif.) backed off on a plan to offer an amendment to force utility companies to refund to ratepayers billions of dollars in taxes they collected but didn't have to pay because of tax rate reductions in 1986.  The Matsui bill faced near-certain defeat, and representatives of utilities were eager to get it voted down.  Instead, Mr. Matsui extracted a promise from the chairman that hearings would be held on the issue and vowed to fight on.  Capital Gains  Initially the Jenkins plan would allow individuals to exclude from income 30% of any gain from the sale or exchange of capital assets held for more than one year.  Eligible assets would include such things as securities, depreciable real estate and timber but not collectibles, such as artworks or antiques.  The exclusion, which amounts to a 19.6% top rate, would apply to assets sold beginning yesterday and ending Dec. 31, 1991.  Individuals who sell eligible assets after Dec. 31, 1991, would be permitted to exclude from taxation any gain attributable to inflation after that date.  The maximum effective tax rate on that gain would be 28% under the plan.  According to congressional estimates, the Jenkins capital-gains tax reduction would actually raise $2.9 billion in the fiscal year ending Sept. 30, 1990, and would raise $3.8 billion in fiscal 1991 and $2.7 billion in fiscal 1992.  That's because the lower rate is expected to increase the turnover of assets.  But starting in fiscal 1993, the plan would lose revenue, compared with current law.  In fiscal 1993 it would cost the Treasury $5.7 billion and in fiscal 1994 $5.2 billion.  Over the five years, the Jenkins capital-gains reduction would cost the government $1.5 billion.  Treasury estimates are similar, but Treasury analysts project the plan will yield $2.4 billion in revenue in fiscal 1990, $500 million less than the congressional figure.  The Treasury estimate will be used by the White House budget office to decide whether Congress has done enough to avoid automatic spending cuts this fall.  Over five years, the Treasury said, the Ways and Means panel plan would cost the government $2 billion.  Tax Reductions  The short-term revenue increases would finance the extension of several popular tax credits that are scheduled to expire at year end.  The Jenkins plan would extend for two years, through Dec. 31, 1991, the credit that helps employers hire low-income workers, the credits that encourage solar and geothermal energy projects by businesses, and the tax exemptions that subsidize bonds used to raise money to help small manufacturers and middle-income families obtain mortgages.  It also would restore through Dec. 31, 1991, the exclusion from income of as much as $5,250 of educational assistance to workers provided by employers.  The exclusion would be restored retroactively to the date it expired at the end of 1988.  Permanent extensions would be granted to a few, select tax breaks that are due to expire at year end.  These include modified versions of the credits that assist the construction of low-income housing and that provide incentives for increases in corporate expenditures for research and development.  The bill also would simplify the corporate minimum tax and provide some limited tax relief for heavy industrial companies that would be burdened.  Part of the tax package is a sizable increase in the earned income tax credit, which provides tax refunds to low-income working families.  Over five years, the expansion would cost $13.5 billion.  The provision also would increase by $1.75 billion over five years the funding for child care provided under an existing block grant program.  The package competes with an alternative approved by the House Education and Labor Committee that would authorize $1.78 billion in fiscal 1990 for a variety of child-care functions including: a new program to help so-called latch-key children who are left at home while their parents work; an expansion of the Head Start program; and a new grant program for child care services.  The competing proposals will battle it out on the House floor, but the Ways and Means Committee's plan is believed to have the upper hand.  The committee action is designed to make about $8 billion in reductions in the projected budget deficit for fiscal 1990.  Part of the measure is a reduction in projected spending of $2.7 billion.  The tax-increase portion of the large bill is slated to be $5.3 billion.  Tax Increases  The committee agreed to a long list of revenue-increase measures.  These would:  -- Close a loophole in the tax law regarding employee stock ownership plans, effective July 10, 1989, that has been exploited by investment bankers in corporate takeovers.  The measure repeals a 50% exclusion on the interest on bank loans used to acquire securities for an ESOP.  -- End a tax subsidy to big banks that encourages them to lend to developing nations.  -- Curb junk bonds by ending tax benefits for certain securities that postpone cash interest payments until the bonds mature.  -- Raise nearly $1 billion by forestalling an automatic reduction in airport and airway taxes.  -- Speed up collection of the 3% tax on long-distance telephone calls and extend the tax permanently.  It is scheduled to expire at the end of next year.  -- Speed up collection of the 3% tax on long-distance telephone calls and extend the tax permanently.  It is scheduled to expire at the end of next year.  -- Speed up the collection of the tax on airline tickets, and, effective in 1994, speed up the collection of the payroll tax from large companies.  -- Impose a tax on ozone-depleting chemicals, such as those used in air conditioners and in styrofoam, beginning at $1.25 a pound starting next year.  -- Repeal special tax breaks created for troubled financial institutions that will get more direct aid from the savings and loan bailout legislation.  -- Require professional corporations, known as "S" corporations, to make advance payments of their estimated taxes, a proposal already approved by Senate tax writers.  -- Withhold income taxes from the paychecks of certain farm workers currently exempt from withholding.  -- Include certain deferred compensation in the calculation of how much individuals and corporations pay in federal unemployment taxes.  This plan gains revenue in the short term but loses money over the long haul.  -- Repeal the completed-contract method of accounting, which is used by military contractors to reduce their tax burden.  -- Permit corporations to use excess pension funds to pay health benefits for current retirees.  Using the pension excess would increase a company's taxable income.  Currently companies deduct as business expenses the money they use to pay for retirees' health benefits.  -- Collect gasoline excise taxes when gasoline is received at the terminal effective Oct. 1.  -- Restrict the ability of real-estate owners to escape taxes by swapping one piece of property for another instead of selling it for cash.  Swaps of properties with similar uses would continue to avoid taxes, but the swap of dissimilar properties, such as land for a building, would be disallowed.  -- Include certain deferred compensation in the calculation of how much individuals and corporations pay in federal Social Security taxes.  This plan gains revenue in the short run but loses money over the long haul.  -- Impose a tax of three cents a barrel on domestic crude oil, effective Oct. 1, to pay for a fund that finances oil-spill cleanups.  -- Make it harder to write off cellular telephones.  Beginning next year, a cellular phone would have to be used at least 50% of the time for business before any writeoff is permitted.  Penalties  The bill also seeks to simplify the nation's civil tax penalty system.  The measure, which often would mean smaller fines for violators, would:  -- Eliminate the so-called stacking of penalties by coordinating sanctions so only one penalty could be imposed on an underpayment of tax.  -- Change the current penalty for underpayment through negligence to 20% of the portion of the underpayment directly attributable to negligence, rather than 20% of the entire underpayment.  -- Tie the fees imposed for late filing of information returns to how late they are.  A taxpayer who filed an information return two weeks late would pay a smaller fine than someone who filed six months late.  -- Reduce the penalty for substantially understating tax liability to 20% of the understatement from 25%.  Medicare  In non-tax actions, the panel agreed to a variety of changes in Medicare that are extremely controversial with doctors.  The most hotly debated provision would impose a limit on the total amount Medicare will pay physicians.  The bill generally reduces Medicare reimbursements of physicians, and the limit is intended to prevent doctors from maintaining their incomes by simply increasing the number of patients or the services to them.  In addition, the committee agreed to impose a revised payment structure for physicians based on a new scale of the relative value of medical procedures.  The structure would reduce payments for some procedures, mostly done by surgeons, and boost those used mostly by internists and other primary-care doctors.  The new structure would take effect in October 1991.  The package also contains a third element, designed to hold down the amount patients have to pay doctors beyond the Medicare reimbursement.  The fee plan isn't designed to save money for the federal government initially.  But over the long haul, it is meant to slow the rapid rise in physician reimbursements.  The federal health care insurance program is for people aged 65 and over and the disabled.  For the next two years, cuts are proposed in a variety of physicians' services, especially for procedures the government determines are overpriced.  The legislation also would reduce spending by extending a rule that requires Medicare premiums to cover one-quarter of the costs of Part B of Medicare, which pays 80% of physician and other outpatient bills.  Another hotly debated provision would prohibit a physician from referring a patient for a Medicare-covered service to a medical provider if the physician owned part of that provider or was paid by the provider for the referral.  Hospitals are exempted from the prohibition.  The bill also contains modifications of the controversial catastrophic-illness insurance program, as previously approved by the committee.  The provisions would reduce the Medicare surtax and benefits and increase a flat monthly premium meant to finance the program.  Efforts will be made on the House floor to repeal the entire program.  Repeal would cost the government more than $5 billion because it began collecting the tax before it started paying the benefits.  ---  @ Capital-Gains Tax: Present and Proposed  A married couple's capital-gains tax when buying $100,000 of stock and selling it for $110,000 one year and one day later  @1989 Taxable Under Under Ways &  @Income Current Law Means Proposal  @Under $30,949 $1,500 $1,050  @Above $30,950 $2,800 $1,960  ---  @ Who Benefits from the Cut  @ In the Capital-Gains Tax?  Percentage of tax benefit that would go to each income class under the Ways and Means Committee's proposed cut in capital-gains tax:  @Income Group Share of Cut  @Less than $10,000* ........................... 0.0%  @$10,000-$19,999 .............................. 0.5  @$20,000-$29,999 .............................. 1.3  @$30,000-$39,000 .............................. 2.6  @$40,000-$49,000 .............................. 3.6  @$50,000-$74,999 .............................. 6.7  @$75,000-$99,000 .............................. 5.3  @$100,000-$199,000 ............................ 19.8  @$200,000 or more ............................. 60.2  @*Modified adjusted gross income for projected 1990 income levels  @Source: Congressional Joint Committee on Taxation  The Fox Film Corp. unit said it named Margery Simkin, an independent casting director, to the new post of senior vice president, production.  The Senate approved a permanent smoking ban on all domestic airline flights in the U.S. as part of a $26.4 billion transportation bill providing a 15% increase for drug interdiction operations by the Coast Guard in fiscal 1990.  The smoking restriction, which would take effect 90 days after enactment of the legislation, is a major defeat for tobacco interests and significantly expands the current ban covering flights of two hours or less.  The debate dramatized deep divisions even in tobacco's old Southern base, and from Alabama to Virginia, the industry lost support in the face of increased public concern about the negative health impact of cigarettes.  The action came as the Democratic-controlled chamber gave final congressional approval to an $18.5 billion energy and water bill, and the Senate Appropriations Committee approved back-to-back bills allocating more than $300 billion for the military and foreign aid budgets for the fiscal year beginning Oct. 1.  Economic assistance for Eastern Europe would be significantly expanded beyond the requests by the Bush administration.  But the committee cut from the Pentagon's Strategic Defense Initiative and adopted new restrictions that would have the effect of delaying early deployment of SDI.  The energy and water bill, including major increases for the cleanup of nuclear wastes at weapon plants, is the first of the 13 annual spending measures to clear Congress.  Though the Senate committee has now completed action on all but one bill, the entire process is threatened by divisions over how to finance new demands for spending on anti-drug programs.  The stalemate prevented final passage of the transportation bill carrying the smoking ban last night, but the size of the voting margins yesterday indicate advocates of the smoking restrictions are in a strong position to ultimately prevail.  Within the House, there is already movement toward the same objective, and on two tests of strength yesterday, Senate proponents won easily on roll calls of 77-21 and 65-34.  The cut in SDI by the Senate committee came as part of an estimated $279.6 billion Pentagon bill, and would hold funding at $3.7 billion, or about $600 million less than the Senate has authorized.  House leaders welcomed the move as a step toward their own position.  The Senate committee further adopted new language seeking to ensure that any cut wouldn't reduce current expenditures for directed energy, or laser-type weapons.  This is the same weaponry that the Bush administration appears to be moving away from in the near term, and the 16-11 vote yesterday is significant as a bid to delay early deployment of a revised SDI that emphasizes kinetic energy weapons, or small interceptor rockets.  Among other major weapon systems, the Senate appropriations bill conforms with many of the Pentagon requests.  But all procurement funds are denied for the Navy's troubled Trident D-5 missile.  In a number of cases, such as the C-17 transport plane, cuts are made below the Senate-authorized level and, to stay within budget, the panel was forced to take money from operations and maintenance accounts, which have been favored by the House.  All funding is denied for the national aerospace plane, and the bill also cuts $50 million added by the House for research into high-definition television technology.  Both issues are sure to be factors in conference meetings between the chambers.  In the case of HDTV, $10 million remains in the Senate bill, and an equal sum has been set aside for a related advanced technology program funded in a pending Commerce Department appropriations bill.  Foreign aid funding would be effectively frozen at current levels under the $14.5 billion measure approved by the committee, and while expanding aid for Eastern Europe, budget pressures forced the committee to rely on a mix of cash and guarantees.  The final $100 million package for Poland goes well beyond the administration's request, but an estimated $40 million of the total takes the form of guarantees by the Overseas Private Investment Corp., which would be authorized to back U.S. business investments in both Poland and Hungary.  In the face of strong pressure from the Greek-American lobby, the committee backed away from a plan to stretch available military aid by giving the State Department the option of cutting from unobligated funds for Turkey and Greece.  Greece, which has failed to use more than $660 million in aid approved prior to the current fiscal year, is the more vulnerable of the two rival nations.  And while the same funds are needed elsewhere, senators quickly bowed to the powerful lobby.  On a narrow 15-12 roll call, the committee signaled a reversal of past policy and approved $15 million for family planning accounts for the United Nations fund for population activities.  Beginning under the Reagan administration, anti-abortionists have long blocked money for the U.N. fund.  Though the measure yesterday prohibits any money being used in China, the amendment was seen as a victory for family planning and pro-choice advocates.  President Bush is expected to sign the energy and water bill that cleared Congress yesterday, but the measure makes down-payments on a range of new projects that will compound budget problems in the future.  The first construction funds are provided for the superconducting supercollider.  Funds are also provided for 32 Army Corps of Engineers water projects at a level that is three times the White House's request.  Special-interest provisions run from a road project near the home of former House Speaker Carl Albert in the Oklahoma hamlet of Bug Tussle to a $15 million payment to a group of influential Utah water users as compensation for giving up land to which the U.S. already has title.  BUSH ANNOUNCED a doubling of U.S. food assistance to Poland next year.  The president, prodded by congressional leaders to do more for Warsaw's new Solidarity-led government, said the White House would send $100 million in food aid in the year beginning Oct. 1.  Bush, citing high prices and food shortages in Poland, said the move is part of a continuing U.S. effort "to support the process of change" in that nation.  Foods to be sent come from existing surpluses, and include beef, pork, corn, butter, cotton and rice.  The aid follows an $8.4 million emergency package sent this year.  Solidarity founder Walesa said he intends to tour Poland in an effort to persuade Poles to give the government a chance to improve the economy.  ---  DE KLERK WAS ELECTED president of South Africa amid rightist criticism.  A day after Pretoria permitted a protest march in Cape Town that drew about 20,000 people, the ruling National Party leader was elected to a five-year term and vowed to ensure that the country's voteless black majority "becomes part of the decision-making process."  Right-wing opponents faulted de Klerk, who has been acting president since Aug. 15, for allowing the demonstration.  In Namibia, black nationalist leader Sam Nujoma arrived in Windhoek, ending three decades in exile.  Nujoma, Swapo's president, is expected to participate in November elections as part of a U.N. plan for Namibia's independence from South Africa.  ---  The Senate approved a permanent smoking ban on all domestic airline flights as part of a $26.4 billion transportation bill providing a 15% increase for Coast Guard antidrug operations.  The smoking restriction, which expands the current ban on flights of two hours or less, is considered a defeat for tobacco interests.  ---  Former HUD Secretary Pierce canceled plans to testify before a House panel investigating the housing agency for mismanagement and political favoritism in the awarding of federal funds.  In a statement, Pierce claimed he hasn't had enough time to prepare his testimony.  ---  Gorbachev met with leaders of Estonia, Latvia and Lithuania in an apparent attempt to ease tension over mounting nationalism.  The Soviet leader reportedly expressed support for the Baltic republics' moves toward greater autonomy at the Wednesday meeting, held ahead of next week's Central Committee session.  ---  East German refugees dashed across the Hungarian-Austrian border, apparently prompted by fears that the Iron Curtain's hole to the West might be closed soon.  But as about 100 refugees an hour streamed across the frontier, authorities said Budapest hadn't any plans to halt the exodus.  ---  The U.S. ordered immigration authorities to re-evaluate all refugee applications of Soviet emigres in Rome.  The move to reconsider the status of 4,000 Soviets whose applications were denied came amid mounting pressure to increase Soviet immigration.  ---  A man with an assault rifle killed seven people and wounded 12 before taking his own life at a printing plant in Louisville, Ky.  Police described the gunman, Joseph T. Wesbecker, 47, as a disgruntled employee who was being treated for mental disorders.  He was on a long-term disability leave.  ---  El Salvador's government argued with the country's leftist rebels about the pace of peace talks aimed at ending a 10-year-old civil war, with President Cristiani's regime saying procedural matters should be settled first.  The guerrillas have offered a ceasefire.  The dispute came during the second day of negotiations in Mexico City.  ---  The Navy is scheduled to launch the nation's newest warship tomorrow.  The $1.2 billion destroyer, the DDG-51, is 18 months behind schedule, snarled by millions of dollars of cost overruns.  ---  Salvagers began recovering gold bars and coins from a paddle-wheel steamship, the SS Central America, that sank in a hurricane off the coast of South Carolina 132 years ago.  A spokesman said the booty was valued at as much as $1 billion.  ---  The White House said Bush would assure Shevardnadze that the U.S. wants to move speedily on nuclear-arms talks.  The president, who is to meet in Washington next Thursday with the Soviet foreign minister, also is to reiterate administration support for Gorbachev's restructuring plans.  ---  State Department officials said a high-level meeting between U.S. and Nicaraguan officials last weekend wasn't a prelude to a resumption of a direct dialogue between the two nations.  The meeting in Managua involved President Ortega and a U.S. delegation consisting of members of Congress and an assistant secretary of state.  ---  Israel is considering bypassing elections in the occupied lands and holding peace talks with Palestinians nominated by Egypt, an official in Jerusalem said.  He said Israel, the U.S. and Egypt were working on plans to form an Arab delegation to negotiate selfrule in the West Bank and Gaza Strip.  ---  Ethiopia and Eritrean rebels neared agreement on details for arranging full-scale peace talks to end their 28-year-old civil war.  The accord is expected to be announced today in Atlanta, where ex-President Carter is hosting the negotiations.  ---  Greek legislators accused Papandreou of accepting bribes in a $210 million banking scandal and recommended that he appear before a special court.  A separate parliamentary panel has urged that the former prime minister be tried over allegations of phone tapping by his administration.  In April, the People's Bank of China canceled a meeting with Chinese reporters after first-quarter economic statistics showed the central bank overshot its targets on inflation, money supply and lending.  "What would we have told reporters if they asked us whether we could bring money supply and inflation under control this year?" a bank official asks.  "The truth is, we don't know."  Today, Beijing is redoubling efforts to fight inflation.  It renewed its commitment to tight money, a key part of the austerity program Premier Li Peng imposed late last year, after the democracy movement was quashed in June and economic conservatives consolidated their power.  But the restrictive policy has so far had mixed and potentially devastating results, and economists, both Chinese and foreign, doubt it will improve matters.  Rural enterprises have been finding ways around the credit squeeze, mainly by keeping cash outside the banking system.  Many economists believe the central bank will be forced to print money to prop up ailing state concerns, thereby preventing an increase in unemployment -- and in worker unrest.  The likely upshot of all this: continued high inflation.  Foreign economists estimate that 30% to 40% of China's money supply is cash.  Inflation, by official measures, grew at an annual rate of 26% in the first half, up from 18.5% for all of 1988 but slower than a 27% pace in 1989's first four months.  But the modest deceleration sparks little optimism among economists, who expect inflation to remain above 20% through 1990.  "The central bank is losing its grip on monetary policy," says Li Kehua, an economist with the Chinese Academy of Social Sciences.  The central bank governor, Li Guixian, said in an address to a conference of Chinese bank presidents in July that "we're still facing a perilous period.  There is no room for optimism."  The central bank finds itself in a monetary limbo, caught between heavy-handed regulation and half-hearted liberalization.  It imposed a host of regulations late last year to curb cash withdrawals, hoping to discourage expansion and big bonus payments at rural enterprises and to reduce their consumption of energy and raw materials.  But the enterprises, established by local governments, households and individuals and thus less subject to central-government authority, managed to evade the restrictions.  They and their employees also have balked at putting cash into bank deposits, which the state had hoped to channel to priority industries such as steel and fertilizers, where shortages are acute.  "With so much money circulating outside the banking system, it isn't surprising that the central bank policy isn't working," says Mr. Li, the economist.  Some of that cash has been used for bonus payments.  Wages and bonuses rose 19% in the first half, a rate that far outpaced economic growth and exerted upward pressure on prices.  China's economy grew at an annual rate of 5.7% in the first six months, roughly half the average annual rate in the past decade.  One example of how rural enterprises thwart Beijing's tight-credit directives is Yuhua Bedsheet Factory, a collectively owned cotton mill in the suburbs of Nanjing.  Director Yu Zhiwei says his bank refused to increase his credit this year.  With prices of raw materials rising, the plant was facing serious cash-flow problems.  Mr. Yu called an emergency meeting of the factory's 1,100 workers to plead for financial help -- and raised 600,000 yuan ($161,000).  "I was tapping money our workers keep under their mattresses," says Mr. Yu, who expects sales to grow 27% this year to 28 million yuan.  Nationwide, industrial output for rural enterprises grew about 20% in the first half, more than the state's target of 10% but down from growth of 30% to 40% in the year-earlier period.  Overall, industrial output grew 11% in the first half, compared with 17% a year earlier.  But contrary to the goals of retrenchment, much of that slowdown came from the state-controlled sector that deals in the kind of raw materials whose production the state has vowed to protect.  State-owned factories lack the flexibility of the rural enterprises to raise money from employees or even suspend their pay in an emergency.  At the same time, they are much more reliant on bank loans for working capital.  Such constraints can stifle expansion plans.  State-owned Nanjing Iron & Steel Plant, for example, this year ordered $8 million of machinery from Italy as part of a program to double annual steel capacity to 1.2 million metric tons over five years.  But retrenchment caught up with the plant, freezing total lending to its 1988 level.  With half the equipment on its way, Li Qianxu, the mill's boss, suddenly had to scramble to get loans to put up the building that would house it.  The delays cost his company six months of production time, Mr. Li complains.  As the credit squeeze slows production, supply shortages for major raw materials become more acute, fueling inflation.  Deteriorating results at state-owned factories are cutting into the treasury's tax receipts and forcing the government to increase subsidies to ailing factories.  In the end, economists say, the central bank will be compelled to print money to support the state budget.  The government will also require a huge amount of cash to pay farmers for their fall harvest.  "It's only a matter of time before we ease credits," says a central bank official.  "Mass company failures and unemployment are unacceptable."  Finning Ltd. agreed to acquire closely held R. Angus Alberta Ltd., which distributes Caterpillar Inc. equipment in Alberta, for 220 million Canadian dollars (US$185.8 million), including assumed debt.  Finning, a Vancouver, British Columbia, distributor of tractors and other equipment made by Caterpillar, said the purchase is expected to close by year end.  The acquisition would increase Finning's annual sales to about C$1.1 billion, from about C$796.5 million last year.  A Finning spokesman said the company would finance the purchase through a combination of debt and equity.  Officials with Angus Alberta, an Edmonton company with 900 employees, couldn't immediately be reached.  Separately, Finning said it adopted a shareholder-rights plan under which holders would be entitled to acquire additional new shares at a 50% discount to market prices, subject to certain conditions.  The spokesman said the plan wasn't adopted in response to any specific approach or expression of interest in the company.  The dollar finished slightly stronger, as a sustained bout of short-covering pulled the currency back from a hasty fall.  Reports of intervention by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York and the Bank of Japan helped churn dollar trading, foreign-exchange traders said.  They said the impetus for the U.S. currency's volatility arose mostly from a last-minute urge to adjust positions ahead of five U.S. economic indicators due today.  The prospect of interpreting the variety of indicators, let alone their collective significance, is enough to make most participants jumpy about holding exposed positions, traders said.  "It's going to be a complicated day {today}, I think," said Michael Penzer, vice president and senior economist at Bank of America in San Francisco.  "The market might have a case of schizophrenia and want to check itself into a mental hospital."  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9755 marks, up from 1.9705 marks late Wednesday, and at 146.86 yen, up from 146.33 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5535, down from $1.5600.  The U.S. currency was well above its lows of 1.9590 marks and 145.47 yen, hit in early Tokyo dealings, but was off its peaks of the day, set in New York at 1.9783 marks and 146.90 yen.  Dollar sales by the Bank of Japan and independent major Asian institutions provoked an early round of selling when the dollar was at a technical weak point in Tokyo dealings, traders said.  The dollar hit its intraday lows but had recovered partially when European trading began.  Then, a rumor of an imminent Bundesbank interest rate increase, which had circulated Wednesday, again unnerved participants, and the dollar slipped.  But the central bank's denial of the rumor sparked a widespread short-covering rally that was interrupted only briefly by news that U.S. retail sales in August rose 0.7%, less than the expected 1.0%.  The retail sales figures implied that economic activity may not have been as strong as recently suggested.  But with the indicators due today overshadowing the market, short-covering resumed until Fed intervention at the dollar's peaks stemmed the rise.  Compared with today's other data, the trade figure is the hardest to estimate, giving it a fair chance to catch the market off guard, Mr. Penzer said.  Estimates of the July deficit have ranged from $7.5 billion to about $10 billion.  Participants also will watch the August producer price index for signs inflation has picked up, suggesting the Fed might need to raise interest rates, which in turn would attract more money to the dollar.  A drop in the index would give the Fed room to ease credit, if needed, potentially hurting the U.S. currency.  The index is expected to be unchanged from July, after falling 0.4% from June.  The data on August industrial output and capacity and July business inventories will give some idea of whether indications of a recent perk in economic activity are broad-based and substantial.  That could, in turn, suggest a rebound in foreign investment in the U.S., aiding the dollar.  Trading between non-dollar currencies picked up yesterday, contributing to the jostling of the dollar, dealers said.  The mark gained ground against the yen, bolstered by the perception an interest rate increase by the Bundesbank would come much earlier than any similar move by the Bank of Japan.  When the mark consolidated over a resistance level around 74.20 yen, technically motivated buying of the mark lofted it to a peak near 74.50 yen in late Asian trading.  At the New York finish, the mark was fetching 74.35 yen, up from 74.22 yen late in New York on Wednesday.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery rose 60 cents to $360.50 an ounce.  Estimated volume was 3.1 million ounces.  Markets in Japan and Hong Kong are closed Friday for holidays.  Standard & Poor's Corp. raised its rating on this city's unenhanced $7.8 million outstanding general obligations to Triple-B-Plus from Triple-B.  S&P said the upgrade reflects "substantial" progress in economic base development and the likelihood for continued progress in the residential, commercial and service sectors.  The ratings firm said financial operations continue to be "satisfactory" and general fund financial operations have benefited from higher payments from the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey properties in Newark.  S&P also assigned a rating of Single-A to $33.6 million of new general improvement and water bonds to be offered Wednesday.  ---  HAYWARD,CALIF. -- Bio-Response Inc.'s convertible subordinated debentures, due 2001, were downgraded by Moody's Investors Service Inc. to Ca from Caa.  About $22 million is affected.  The rating service said the downgrade reflects the company's Chapter 11 bankruptcy-law filing earlier this week.  The company, which specializes in culturing mammalian cells and producing cellular proteins, declined to comment on the downgrade.  Less than two years ago, foreign investors ranked South Korea high among Asian nations as a place where their money would be well-spent.  Now, however, the country has come to resemble an obstacle course that fewer and fewer deem worth the struggle.  Explaining their change of heart, foreign investors cite the won's fluctuations against the U.S. dollar, rising wages, increasingly violent labor unrest, anti-foreign sentiment, a scarcity of capital and the government's ambivalence.  "I have the feeling that the bloom is off the rose, especially for large-scale investment in the near future," says Richard Lieber, an official with the American Chamber of Commerce in Korea and vice president and representative director of Samsung Petrochemical Co., a joint venture of Samsung Corp., Amoco Chemical Co. of the U.S. and Mitsui Petrochemicals Co. of Japan.  The Ministry of Finance recently reported that in the first seven months of this year, applications for new or additional foreign investment totaled $505.5 million, down 36% from a year earlier.  This reflects a change in investment attitudes from only 18 months ago, when a survey of 406 foreign business executives by the Federation of Korean Industries, a business organization, rated Korea as an attractive investment site.  Wiltron Co. of the U.S. found it took three months longer to get licenses to make and sell telecommunications-testing equipment in Korea than in five other countries where it has opened plants in the past year.  Marriott Inflight Service Co. spent a year hacking through red tape before it got permission to build an airline-catering plant in Seoul.  But both companies insist that things are getting better for foreign investors in Korea.  Other executives and analysts note that Korea's appetite for foreign investment has been waning as the country gains a measure of self-sufficiency in some areas, allowing Seoul to be more selective about investment targets.  "They want {foreign investment}, but they don't want it," says Robert Milligan, Korean manager of Britain's ICI (Export) Ltd.  "They want it in the areas where they need it -- high-tech -- but are not so excited about those which are low-tech or will compete with domestic industries."  The government seems largely unconcerned about such complaints, or about the drop in new foreign investment applications.  Some officials, in fact, welcome the decline.  They argue that Korea over the years has become too dependent on foreigners.  In addition, since mid-1987, foreign investors have had to reckon with domestic economic and political developments that have severely affected the business environment.  At that time, public pressure forced the government to enact social legislation that set off labor unrest, sharp wage increases, high inflation and tighter credit.  Seoul has added to foreign investors' frustrations by adding new hurdles.  Earlier this year, for instance, the government established a regulation requiring most new joint-venture companies to go public within three years of their launch.  Potential new foreign investors object to that because they worry that any dilution of their joint-venture stake will reduce their influence in management.  Last week, the Ministry of Finance announced that, starting in 1991, most of the 1,529 foreign companies operating in Korea, as well as newcomers, no longer will be eligible for tax reductions and exemptions that have been in effect since 1962.  The tax incentives will remain only for investors coming into the high-tech industries that the government wants to foster.  And for Japanese investors, there are special disincentives.  In June, Seoul announced a ban on imports of Japanese cars and investments in the domestic auto industry until 1994, because Korea's five auto makers fear the competition.  To ease Seoul's chronic trade deficit with Tokyo, the government also restricts other Japanese imports that Japanese investors in Korea say they need for manufacturing.  Many of the restrictions come in response to pressure from the Federation of Korean Industries, which says it wants the government to "protect our infant businesses from open competition from foreign invaders."  All the new restrictions tend to dim the luster of Korea's market-opening moves.  In May, bowing to pressure from Washington, Seoul agreed to open six manufacturing industries and several service fields to 100% foreign ownership or joint-venture arrangements.  Among the sectors liberalized were autos, fertilizers, pharmaceuticals, advertising and travel agencies.  In addition, a revision of the Guidelines for Foreign Investment has been announced.  Foreign-investment applications now must be approved or rejected within 60 days.  The government also has abolished many of its previous requirements for foreign investors.  Some investors, like National Semiconductor Co., Tandy Corp. and Pico Products Corp., all of the U.S., have pulled out of Korea in the past year because the investment climate was no longer conducive to their labor-intensive, low-cost electronics industries.  "Costs here have climbed higher than in other plants," says Tim Thorsteinson, National Semiconductor's director of human resources.  "Our Korean plant wasn't contributing its share to corporate profitability."  Korean workers have staged slowdowns, strikes and violent disruptions to press their demands for better treatment.  Often they have targeted foreign companies, claiming that they exploit workers.  Meanwhile, Korean wages, once the most attractive feature for investors in light manufacturing industries such as textiles, electronics and footwear, have risen an average 30% in the past two years.  Partly to combat the inflationary pressures resulting from higher wages, and partly to force companies to find new sources of funding, the government maintains a strict ceiling on bank loans to business.  But that, foreign executives say, further discourages investment.  "Some big companies, like mine, would like to increase their investment but can't," says John Reed, who until recently was president of the American Chamber of Commerce in Korea and a representative for Honeywell Inc. of the U.S.  "We can't bring in new capital, can't get long-term loans, and short-term loans are now more expensive."  In addition, they complain, a government-mandated debt-reduction program for Korea's biggest business groups is squeezing foreign investors.  "It's not aimed at us," Samsung Petrochemical's Mr. Lieber says, "but many of us are joint-venture partners with the big groups, so what hurts them hurts us too."  His conclusion?  "You're not going to find the major foreign companies in highly capital-intensive industries like auto manufacturing or petrochemicals pulling out.  But I think you're going to see a slowdown or halt in new investment and expansions until the government's monetary policy loosens up."  Paramount Communications Inc., moving to gain a foothold in the broadcasting business, said it exercised its option to purchase a 79% stake in TVX Broadcast Group Inc. from Salomon Inc. in a transaction valued at $140 million.  Paramount, which operates one of Hollywood's most successful movie and TV studios, paid $10 million earlier this year for a four-year option to buy the TVX stake.  Yesterday, however, Paramount said it decided to accelerate the process, calling it "a significant step in our strategic development as an expanding communications company."  Analysts greeted the announcement as a signal that Paramount may be poised to make further moves to expand in the television business, possibly attempting to put together a limited broadcast network similar to that started by News Corp.'s Fox Broadcasting Co.  Since failing in its $14 billion bid for Time Inc. over the summer, Paramount has said it has been looking at a number of other options to expand in the entertainment business.  Paramount is said to be most keenly interested in Chicago-based Tribune Co., which also owns TV stations in major markets and produces television programming.  Because close to 40% of Tribune is controlled by managers, directors and employees, any transaction would have to be a friendly one.  But Wall Street analysts generally view the two companies as an attractive fit.  "By making a deal with Tribune, and throwing in TVX, Paramount could get a network, and create a hell of a great marriage," said Paul Kagan, who heads research and investment concern Paul Kagan Associates.  Paramount declined to comment on the speculation about its plans, other than to say "the {TVX} acquisition will enable us to participate in another level of the television industry."  A Tribune spokeswoman also said the company doesn't comment on speculation.  Under the terms of its agreement with Salomon, Paramount will pay $110 million for the TVX holdings, which consist primarily of convertible preferred stock.  Paramount will also purchase about $30 million in TVX debt obligations owned by Salomon.  TVX owns seven independent television stations, two of which have been designated for sale.  The proceeds of the sale will be used by Paramount to retire the debt.  TVX will retain stations WTXF in Philadephia; WDCA in Washington, D.C.; KTXH in Houston; KTXA in Dallas; and WLFL in Raleigh/Durham, N.C.  The Paramount purchase finally gets Salomon out of an embarrassing and costly debacle that started in 1987 when the investment bank made a $275 million temporary, or "bridge," loan to TVX to buy five stations from Taft Broadcasting Co. for $240 million.  Salomon planned to sell high-yield, high-risk bonds on behalf of TVX so it could use the proceeds to repay the loan.  But the October 1987 stock market crash and the general problems in the TV station business undermined Salomon's attempts to sell the junk bonds and left TVX unable to make a $200 million payment on the loan.  After twice extending the loan and pouring in another $10 million to keep TVX afloat, Salomon in March abandoned attempts to sell the junk bonds.  In November, Salomon completed a $340 million recapitalization plan that replaced the bridge loan with permanent financing and made it a 79% owner of TVX. Salomon said earlier this year that $200 million of the TVX debt had been repaid with a combination of proceeds from the refinancing and station sales, leaving Salomon with a $140 million equity investment, the exact amount of yesterday's transaction with Paramount.  Mr. Kagan noted that there have been considerable inprovements in the market for independent stations, which had been plagued with huge programming costs in a depressed advertising market.  "I assume Paramount saw the independent station turnaround, and decided to exercise their option now," Mr. Kagan said, noting that Paramount might have had to pay a higher price later.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, TVX shares closed at $3.25, up 12.5 cents, while Paramount shares fell 62.5 cents to $54.375 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Pace Membership Warehouse Inc., Aurora, Colo., said a potential suitor has reviewed the retailer's confidential financial information with an eye toward making an offer to acquire the company.  Pace said that it hasn't made a decision to sell the company and that the suitor only has "expressed a possible interest" in the company.  Under a confidentiality agreement, the potential suitor can't acquire Pace shares for two years without the Pace board's approval.  Pace stock jumped $2.625 on the news to close at $18.625 in over-the-counter trading; the stock had risen $1 Wednesday on heavy volume.  On that basis, an acquisition would be valued at about $247.6 million.  Wednesday, a Pace spokesman told Professional Investor Report, a newswire service, that there wasn't any corporate news to account for the jump in price and the large trading activity.  The news wire attributed the gains to a PaineWebber recommendation on the stock.  Theodore B. Bean, senior vice president, finance, declined to comment on the newswire report.  Thursday, September 14, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9% high, 8 7/8% low, 8 7/8% near closing bid, 8 15/16% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserve Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.70% 19 to 44 days; 8.60% 45 to 59 days; 8.575% 60 to 89 days; 8.375% 90 to 119 days; 8.25% 120 to 149 days; 8.125% 150 to 179 days; 7.75% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.80% 30 days; 8.70% 60 days; 8.625% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.28% one month; 8.31% two months; 8.30% three months; 8.25% six months; 8.26% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.80% one month; 8.75% three months; 8.75% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.72% 30 days; 8.60% 60 days; 8.50% 90 days; 8.45% 120 days; 8.33% 150 days; 8.25% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% one month; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% two months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% three months; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% four months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% five months; 8 13/16% to 8 11/16% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 15/16% one month; 8 7/8% three months; 8 7/8% six months; 8 13/16% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, September 14, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.64% 13 weeks; 7.64% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.97%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.25%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.92%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.80%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 8.19%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  Herbert S. Amster and William J. Bowers were elected directors of this maker of magnetic tape peripherals and optical disk drives, filling two vacancies.  Mr. Amster was chairman and chief executive officer of Irwin Magnetics Systems Inc. until Cipher acquired it in April.  Mr. Bowers was chairman of MSI Data Corp. until its purchase by Symbol Technologies Inc. in June.  Hana Biologics Inc., Alameda, Calif., said it completed the $14.4 million sale of its diagnostic and cell-biology product lines to a unit of Japan's Nippon Mining Ltd.  As part of the sale agreement, Hana will continue to manufacture the products during the next 18 months for Nippon's Irvine Scientific Sales Co. unit in Santa Ana, Calif.  The diagnostic products detect prenatal genetic abnormalities and identify micro-organisms in respiratory and urinary infections.  The cell-biology products are solutions used to grow cells.  Hana has said that it was selling the lines because further development of them would have pulled the company away from its strategic focus -- cell-transplant research and development programs.  As a result of the sale, the company said it is in its strongest position ever with $23 million in cash on hand.  In the year ended June 30, Hana had a net loss of $6.9 million on revenue of $5.7 million.  Albert Holgerson Jr. was expected to resign as chairman and chief executive officer of Home Owners Savings Bank, a formerly fast-growing thrift whose fortunes recently have fallen.  Mitchel Ross, executive vice president and general counsel, will succeed Mr. Holgerson as chief executive, Home Owners said.  Jay Fialkow, an outside director and partner in a Boston law firm, will assume the chairmanship.  Martin Heck will remain president and chief operating officer.  The management changes were subject to final agreement on the terms of Mr. Holgerson's resignation and on approval by the board, which was to meet last night, Mr. Ross said in a telephone interview.  Mr. Holgerson couldn't be reached to comment.  But Mr. Ross said Mr. Holgerson was stepping down "primarily because the rules of the business have changed" as a result of the new federal savings and loan legislation.  Mr. Holgerson's "innovative" and "aggressive" management style "did not fit with the the new business or with the regulators," Mr. Ross said.  Under Mr. Holgerson, Home Owners' assets rocketed to more than $4 billion, from $547 million in 1984, as the company acquired mortgage-banking and thrift institutions nationwide.  But Home Owners's stock came under a barrage of short-selling, beginning in late 1987, partly reflecting critics' charges that certain of the company's accounting practices masked underlying financial weaknesses.  For the nine months ended June 30, Home Owners had a loss of $7.4 million, compared with a profit of $20.1 million in the year-earlier period.  In addition, the company's stock price has continued to slide.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, Home Owners closed at $4.25 a share, down 25 cents.  The price has tumbled from $10.50 in January and from $18.50 in April 1988.  Mr. Ross attributed the nine-month loss to weakening of the national mortgage-lending market and said the loss wasn't a reason for Mr. Holgerson's departure.  Mr. Ross also said the company wouldn't alter its accounting practices but will "stress a returning to roots" in its operating and strategic policies.  Specifically, the company will focus on retail lending in its traditional New England market, while curtailing retail mortgage-lending in other parts of the country.  While he declined to elaborate upon Mr. Holgerson's differences with federal regulators, Mr. Ross said the more restrictive environment ushered in by the recent legislation makes expertise in legal issues more important in running thrift institutions.  In the next few years, the industry will "not move with the speed {of the mid-1980s}, nor require the talents of a man like Al Holgerson," Mr. Ross said.  Tokyo stocks rebounded in the afternoon as the yen's relative strength against the dollar in late foreign exchange dealings encouraged buying.  London share prices closed lower amid worries over losses on Wall Street.  At Tokyo, the U.S. currency momentarily slipped to around 145.50 yen at midmorning and remained around 146 yen the rest of the day.  The Nikkei index of 225 selected issues finished 114.94 points higher at 34401.88.  The index lost 45.94 points Wednesday.  Volume on the First Section was estimated at 550 million shares, down from 638 million Wednesday.  Advancing issues outnumbered declining issues by 587 to 332, while 196 remained unchanged.  The Nikkei Index rose partly on a moderate inflow of cash from investment trust funds that wended its way into domestic-demand-related issues, traders said.  Many institutional investors are also preparing for mid-year book closings, the majority of which fall next Wednesday.  Because Thursday was the last trading day to conduct transactions under the schedule -- which normally takes four trading days -- some institutional investors carried out last-minute bargain hunting, traders said.  Shigeru Akiba, head of equity trading at UBS & Drew International, said these investors mostly hunted for domestic-demand-related issues such as steels and shipbuildings, which are thought to have touched bottom.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index (Topix) of all issues listed in the First Section, which gained 3.31 points Wednesday, was up 19.27 points, or 0.74%, at 2618.43.  The Second Section index, which gained 5.01 points Wednesday, was up 9.27 points, or 0.27%, to close at 3393.81.  Volume in the second section was estimated at 19 million shares, in line with 19.6 million Wednesday.  Other than bargain hunting, institutional investors remained on the sidelines, traders said.  The Nikkei index has been gradually rising after falling below the 34000 resistance level Monday in intraday dealings.  Traders said subsequent gains made this week were partly helped by index-linked arbitrage buying.  To this extent, they said the market continued to lack real energy.  Fund managers said institutional investors also avoided making major moves ahead of approaching book closings and a series of major U.S. economic indicators.  One trader at Daiichi Securities said the market reacted favorably to the dollar's brief drop to the 145.50-yen level Thursday compared with its surge to the 148-yen level earlier this week.  The sharp swing, however, also signified currency volatility and discouraged investors from committing themselves to specific sectors.  As has been the case recently, this week's dealings were characterized by erratic price changes in a variety of issues during a relatively short period.  Steels and shipbuildings were bought early this week after investors decided they had touched bottom.  But the sectors fell into a lull for the rest of the week.  High-priced issues also surged, attracting buy orders whenever prices dipped.  They were then sold off just as quickly on profit-taking.  Thursday's winners included shipbuilding issues, where gains were sparked by buy orders from major brokerage houses, traders said.  Kawasaki Heavy Industries was up 20 yen (13.6 cents) to 1,070 yen ($7.31).  Mitsubishi Heavy Industries gained 10 yen to 1,150.  Housing counters were also pushed up by dealers trading for their own accounts.  Daiwa House was up 40 to close at 2,630.  Misawa Homes added 10 to 2,940.  Sekisui House advanced 40 to 2,460.  Other gaining issues included construction and steel shares.  Shimizu gained 90 to 2,170 and Taisei was up 50 to 1,600.  NKK, Nippon Steel and Sumitomo Metal were firmer.  At London, the share price drop was attributed to severe early losses on Wall Street, which fueled fears of a further correction on both sides of the Atlantic.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100-share index closed at 2382.0, down 19.5, the intraday low and the market's lowest settlement since Aug. 30, when the index closed at 2381.3.  Dealers said the end of the current two-week U.K. trading account, some lessthan-exciting U.K. interim earnings reports and fears over prospects for sharper declines Friday ahead of Wall Street's expiration of stock futures, index futures and options also haunted the day's action.  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index closed at 1965.8, down 14.3.  Volume was 515.5 million shares, down from 641 million a day earlier.  Some dealers said the market fears put further upward pressure on the U.K.'s major base interest rate, which currently stands at 14%.  Also, the FT-SE 100's drop below the psychologically important 2400-level, along with the Dow Jones Industrial Average's fall below 2700, sharply refocused visions of further corrections.  Composite insurers benefited from further takeover speculation, an important component of the recent gains in London.  Commercial Union Assurance closed at 461 pence ($7.19), up 16 pence (25 cents), on talk of a possible takeover or merger.  The talk over Commercial Union spilled into other composite insurers, dealers said, and was underscored by the recent takeover in France of Groupe Victoire.  Royal Insurance, which was linked to talk of a possible merger with Commercial Union, rose 2 to 479.  General Accident closed 15 higher at #11 ($17.16), Sun Alliance added 7 to 322 and Guardian Royal advanced 4 to 242 on talk of their interest in takeover or merger activity.  Rolls-Royce reported a 60% gain in interim pretax profit, thanks to its recent acquisition of NEI and a strong order book.  Its shares closed at 196 1/2, up 3 1/2.  Elsewhere, stock prices closed higher in Brussels, Copenhagen, Frankfurt, Helsinki, Milan and Oslo, and lower in Amsterdam, Madrid, Paris, Stockholm and Zurich.  South African gold stocks closed slightly higher.  Share prices closed higher in Hong Kong, were lower in Singapore and Wellington and little changed in Sydney and Manila.  Markets were closed in Seoul and Taipei.Markets in Japan and Hong Kong are closed Friday for holidays.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Sep 13 Sep 12 Year  @ U.S. ...................... 317.9 321.0 + 24.1  @ Britain ................... 718.9 718.8 + 31.6  @ Canada .................... 426.8 428.4 + 16.3  @ Japan ..................... 1520.7 1521.0 + 7.1  @ France..................... 549.0 549.0 + 24.0  @ Germany.................... 254.9 258.3 + 22.6  @ Hong Kong.................. 1948.1 1964.2 - 4.0  @ Switzerland................ 230.0 232.3 + 33.0  @ Australia.................. 345.2 346.5 + 18.9  @ World index................ 526.7 528.3 + 6.5  Don't panic.  Despite the debacle in the junk bond market, the resounding advice for individual investors from professional money managers and bond market analysts is to hold tight.  Unless investors have more than 5% of their assets either directly in junk bonds or in so-called high-yield bond mutual funds, investment experts say it's just not worth selling out at current fire-sale prices.  The junk bond market has been thrown into turmoil by the deepening financial woes of retailing giant Campeau Corp., whose units have issued billions of dollars of junk bonds.  But while prices of some junk bonds have dropped so low that the bonds are yielding 45%, not all junk bond issuers are in such dire straits.  "All these {bonds} aren't bad, it's just guilt by association," says Michael Ross, senior fixed-income analyst of Blunt, Ellis & Loewi Inc., a Chicago brokerage firm.  "If this thing turns around, you really could come out of it whole."  Most individuals who own junk do so through the 100 or so junk bond mutual funds, which hold more than $35 billion in assets.  Individuals have been selling out of these funds for weeks, portfolio managers report, but that pace has accelerated slightly in the past two days.  Andrew Graves, an analyst at Mutual Fund Values, says that although he "wouldn't buy a high-yield fund right now, I wouldn't sell it either."  The prices of many junk funds have declined in recent days, but they haven't dropped as much as prices in the junk bond market, Mr. Graves notes.  That's because many fund managers have been ridding their portfolios of weaker credits throughout the year, he says.  Many funds also hold such a wide range of junk bonds that hits in a few bonds don't rock the entire fund.  Moreover, some big funds have been raising their cash levels recently.  That would allow them to meet increased redemptions, or cash-outs by investors, without having to sell bonds in a declining market.  For example, Vanguard High Yield Bond Portfolio has 17% of its portfolio in cash and Treasury bills, up from about 12% earlier this year.  Yesterday, other funds dumped junk bonds to meet expected redemption requests.  As for selling individual lots of junk bonds, Robert S. Dow, chief investment officer of fixed-income for the New York brokerage firm Lord, Abbet & Co., says investors who bail out are letting their worries about the market blind them to the fundamentals of "the company they've invested in, and what is the future of that company."  Prices for the small lots of bonds generally held by individuals have also eroded so sharply, investment experts say, that the money an investor might get isn't much more than the return in the worst-case scenario of a bond default.  Some contrarians are viewing the recent slump as a buying opportunity, with junk bonds selling at bargain prices.  But others worry about the liquidity of the market, the ability of investors to unload their bonds in a hurry.  Charles Fish, chairman of Fish & Lederer Investment Counsel, an Orange, Calif., money-management firm, warns: "If you were buying a stock, and you found out the market was going to be closed for the next three years, would you still do it?  That's the situation in the junk market."  Enserch Corp. said it began an exchange offer of one unit of its 87.4%-owned Enserch Exploration Partners Ltd. division for one-half share of Enserch Corp. common and $1 cash.  The offer expires at midnight EDT on Oct. 16.  Enserch Exploration has about 102.5 million units outstanding, of which Enserch Corp. owns about 89.6 million units.  Enserch Corp., an energy concern, has about 58.4 million shares outstanding.  A federal grand jury in San Antonio, Texas, accused an aide to a former Nevada senator, and two others of hatching a bizarre plot to pressure government agencies to help them buy sick thrifts and, among other things, corner the spice market in Grenada.  Glen N. Mauldin, who was administrative assistant to former Sen. Chic Hecht, was charged with 19 counts ranging from conspiracy to bribery for his alleged role in the scheme, which assertedly included setting up meetings with Federal Home Loan Bank Board Chairman M. Danny Wall.  Also charged with multiple felonies was Darrell A. Tomblin, a Houston businessman, and Vincent P. Lachelli, a Washington lobbyist.  In a related indictment, New Orleans financial consultant William Murray Abroms was charged with five counts of perjury for allegedly lying to the grand jury investigating the matter.  As outlined in the main indictment, the plot began in 1987 when Mr. Tomblin and others "devised a plan to acquire approximately 10 savings-and-loan institutions located throughout the U.S."  According to the indictment, Mr. Tomblin and others who weren't identified persuaded Mr. Mauldin to accept a secret, 10% interest in the thrifts in exchange for using his influence to help them.  Specifically, the group wanted to acquire thrifts "in poor economic condition without having competition or to submit competitive bids," according to the charges.  One alleged target was Suburban Savings & Loan of San Antonio.  According to the indictment, the defendants attempted to pressure federal regulators to allow two San Antonio businessmen to acquire the thrift.  As part of the pressure, the defendents allegedly sent a letter on Mr. Hecht's official Senate stationery to the Bank Board endorsing the businessmen's effort.  Mr. Maudlin also allegedly contacted Bank Board staffers "to monitor and influence the decision-making" and arranged a meeting between Mr. Wall, the defendants, and others.  Mr. Wall couldn't be reached for comment, but a federal official involved in the investigation emphasized that he isn't suspected of wrongdoing; nor was Mr. Hecht, recently appointed U.S. ambassador to the Bahamas, accused of breaking the law.  Helen Eversberg, the U.S. attorney for the western district of Texas, said in a news conference that Mr. Hecht "cooperated fully" with the investigation.  Mr. Hecht couldn't be reached for comment.  David Botsford, an attorney for Mr. Tomblin, said he hasn't yet seen the indictment, but added: "There's no question in my mind that Darrell Tomblin didn't knowingly or intentionally violate the law."  An attorney for Mr. Lachelli declined to comment.  Mr. Mauldin, who also served as Mr. Hecht's campaign treasurer, couldn't be reached for comment.  A prosecutor said he was being held in a Washington jail overnight.  According to the indictment, the conspiracy didn't stop with sick thrifts.  The defendants also endeavored to set up business operations in the tiny Caribbean island of Grenada, the indictment alleges, including "the acquisition, installation, and operation of an oil refinery; the monopolization of commercial fishing operations, and the monopolization of trade in the spices grown in Grenada."  The indictment alleges that Mr. Mauldin was to have received a 10% stake in those activities, too, in exchange for using his influence over Grenadian and U.S. officials to clear the way.  Among other things, Mr. Mauldin is accused of attempting to obtain federal grants from the U.S. Agriculture Department for the venture; trying to get the U.S. Navy to commit to buy oil from the business, and using Mr. Hecht's office to try to get $35 million from the U.S. Agency for International Development.  A prosecutor involved in the case said there isn't any evidence that any of these efforts, including those related to thrifts, bore fruit.  But he added that the defendants were optimistic at first.  A year-long investigation into the alleged conspiracy was dubbed "Operation Dundeal," the prosecutor said, because the defendants frequently reassured each other in wiretapped telephone conversations that the scheme was a "done deal."  Your Aug. 8 Reporter's Notebook from Iran contained a wonderful morsel.  After "selecting the village at random and visiting without government escort," your reporter met a farmer who told her how much better things were now than under the shah.  He said, "The shah's policies were destroying farming in this region. . . .  Imports of cheap American flour meant we couldn't compete."  This poor Iranian farmer, probably illiterate, shows a far greater understanding of basic economics than the "experts" who plan and execute our aid programs.  When a natural disaster destroys a crop in a particular country, all of the people there can benefit if we rush in subsidized or even free food.  However, this is not true when we supply cheap or free food to a poor country on a long-term basis.  All that such a program accomplishes is to buy peace from the urban population.  Since most of this population lives in the capital city and is the one most able to overthrow the government if aroused, the government usually favors such programs.  But the cost of this temporary urban peace is the destruction of the nation's agriculture.  This doubly ensures that the peace bought is only temporary.  On the one hand, without a healthy agriculture it is unlikely that the country will ever be able to achieve a healthy, growing economy to supply employment to the urban population.  On the other hand, the ruined farmers will move to the cities, or more likely to the capital city, increasing unemployment and straining the resources there.  It's a shame people such as this farmer don't have any say in our aid programs.  Jeffrey L. Perrin  San Antonio, Texas  Kerr-McGee Corp., Oklahoma City, Okla., said it created an employee stock ownership plan to be funded by a $125 million loan guaranteed by the company.  Based on yesterday's closing stock price of $48.375 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading, the new ESOP would be able to purchase about 2.5 million Kerr-McGee shares, equal to about 5% of the 48.3 million shares outstanding.  It wasn't clear whether the move is intended as a defensive measure.  The company has long been rumored as an attractive takeover candidate.  But the new ESOP won't hold an unusually large number of shares.  According to Kerr-McGee's May proxy statement, officers and directors own only 4.4% of the company, so the combined ownership of management and the ESOP still would be less than 10%.  Kerr-McGee couldn't be reached for comment on the plan, which was disclosed late yesterday.  The company said that beginning Jan. 1, it would match employee contributions to the ESOP instead of to the Savings Investment Plan.  The leading accountants group has quietly buried a controversial proposal that would have let accountants, without signing their names, issue quarterly financial statements for their clients.  The proposal had split the profession down the middle and generated a lot of violent arguments for and against such "plain paper" statements.  But a key committee of the 286,000-member American Institute of Certified Public Accountants dropped the proposal last Friday after holding an all-day hearing the day before, at which the "plain paper" approach was supported and vilified.  "Frankly, I had mixed emotions about the proposal, because some clients may need it, but the committee felt it wasn't worth the potential of compromising professional standards and quality," said Kenneth Huffman, a member of the institute's seven-member accounting and review services committee.  The committee dropped the proposal by a 6-0 vote with one member not present.  Robert Israeloff, a strong supporter of the proposal, said that of 1,200 small business clients at Israeloff, Trattner & Co., where he is executive partner, about 500 would like to have the option for "plain paper" statements.  "With computers spitting out monthly and quarterly statements, it could save companies up to 20% in costs for accountants to keep their names off the financial statments," Mr. Israeloff said.  Under the proposal, these "plain paper" quarterly or monthly statements wouldn't have included the CPA firm's name, logo or watermark, and each page would have noted the statements don't adhere to generally accepted accounting principles, or GAAP.  Such "plain paper" statements couldn't have been issued for annual financial statements, which under securities laws must be audited and signed by the outside auditor.  Accountants note that financial statements that don't adhere to GAAP, which comprises the body of professional standards, are much less expensive to produce and can be useful for internal purposes for small, closely held companies that can't afford a full-scale audit.  But during the hearings on the "plain paper" statements, many accountants expressed fear that disassociating the accountant's name from the financial statement could lead to many abuses and could worsen the liability problems of the accountants.  In a letter to the institute, Carlon Preate, a partner of Parente, Randolph, Orlando, Carey & Associates, an accounting firm in Scranton, Pa., was strongly opposed to the proposal.  Mr. Preate said, "This new service represents a step backward to the days of 'internal use only' financial statements that always found their way into the hands of bankers, creditors and other outside parties who would place reliance on such data."  It would also "subject CPAs to increased litigation as well as increase the competition from those accountants who don't provide quality service, but who are only interest in 'low balling' their fees to obtain work," Mr. Preate said.  Mr. Israeloff, who also heads the executive committee of the institute's private-companies practice section, which has been pushing the proposal, strongly disagrees.  "If the 'plain paper' statement is prepared with due professional care and is only for the client's use, it serves a need for small business that won't go away," he said.  "Don't be surprised to see this proposal surface again."  Accountants have long prepared financial statements for their clients that don't require a full audit; such statements are less expensive.  But these compilations of financial data or limited reviews of such data have always required the accountant's signature, even though they aren't audits.  At the hearing last week, one accountant said that some accounting firms, worried about their liability exposure in issuing certain sales and earnings forecasts called prospective financial statements, are putting the data into a computer but asking the client to press the "print" button.  Some accountants say that in this way, the CPA firm can shed the responsibility for the statement if it proves faulty and hopefully avoid a lawsuit by disgruntled investors, suppliers or vendors.  Ultimate Corp. said a group of shareholders sued the company, claiming its delay in disclosing a separate lawsuit involving a loan default by its former chairman hurt the value of their shares.  The maker of integrated computer systems said holders who bought shares from May 25, 1988, to July 17, 1989, are asking for unspecified damages.  The suit was filed in New York federal court, Ultimate said.  Also named in the suit are current and former officers and directors.  According to the company, the holders contend that Ultimate failed to disclose that Theodore M. Sabarese, then chairman, personally and on the company's behalf guaranteed loans for an airplane-leasing venture and provided use commitments to the lender.  The lender, Bank One Leasing, sued Mr. Sabarese and Ultimate a year ago after the loans defaulted, said Jay Sturm, Ultimate general counsel.  The shareholders claim Ultimate waited many months to disclose the lender's suit.  Ultimate, however, waited until June to disclose the suit, Mr. Sturm said, because the company's "potential exposure was not material."  The company liability ranges as high as $1.5 million, he said.  Mr. Sturm said the holders contend the company's liability is about $25 million.  "I think the lawsuit is really without any merit whatsoever," Mr. Sturm said.  The nominee for chairman of the Securities and Exchange Commission offered a mild vote of confidence for the junk bond market in the wake of disclosure that one of the market's larger users is in financial trouble.  Richard Breeden, the 39-year-old nominee, said at a Senate Banking Committee hearing on his confirmation that while the junk bond market should be "worth the careful attention of the commission," there isn't "any particular problem."  Mr. Breeden contended that junk bond liquidity is stronger than it was several years ago, as the market has moved away from control by one firm, Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc., to broader participation by many houses.  Liquidity has long been an issue in the junk bond market because a lack of liquidity can prevent investors from selling their securities when they want.  But Mr. Breeden indicated that he won't take a hands-off attitude in many matters, and urged better coordination between regulators to make U.S. financial markets stronger and more competitive.  Citing the "1930s structure" of the U.S. financial markets, he said, "we have to modernize our statutes."  On prodding by senators about the threat of takeovers, Mr. Breeden later said that "the {overall} level of leverage in the economy is something government should be aware of and sometimes concerned about."  The remarks came the day after Campeau Corp., a large Canadian retailer that owns Bloomingdale's, Jordan Marsh and Abraham & Straus, disclosed that it was having severe cash problems.  That news sent the junk bond market tumbling.  Mr. Breeden is expected to be approved handily by the committee, possibly as early as next week after he answers about 40 written questions from senators who didn't have a chance to question him.  Most of the committee members, including Chairman Donald Riegle (D., Mich.), expressed support.  Mr. Breeden also spoke out for continued strong enforcement by the agency against such problems as insider trading.  "I do consider myself to be a strong believer in free markets.  The market is the best allocator of goods and services," he said.  "At the same time, that doesn't need to connote a tolerance of criminality and fraud."  He added that "one of the most important elements of any free market is the perception and the reality that it is market forces that are driving results, not fraud and collusion."  One of Mr. Breeden's first big decisions after confirmation by the Senate would be filling the post of enforcement director, which has been vacant since Gary Lynch resigned several months ago.  William McLucas and John Sturc, both associate directors in the enforcement division, are top candidates for the post.  In one unusual suggestion about how to improve coordination between financial regulators, Mr. Breeden went so far as to suggest that the SEC and the Commodity Futures Trading Commission swap senior-level staff members.  That suggestion isn't likely to be popular with either agency's staffers.  But SEC staffers may be assuaged by the prospect of pay increases that appear to be strongly supported by both Mr. Breeden and many senators on the committee.  Mr. Breeden, who called a pay increase the most important issue facing the commission, said that all regulatory agencies except the SEC and CFTC have the ability to go above government pay caps.  Several senators expressed concern that individual investors aren't getting a fair shot at the market and that institutional control, takeovers and program trading are keeping them away.  Mr. Breeden wouldn't denounce any of those factors, but said, "I do think this whole area is one which . . . the commission has to keep a careful eye on."  And he promised to use the SEC staff's expertise to try to anticipate problems with new financial instruments such as portfolio insurance, which has been blamed for fueling the 1987 crash.  "One of the things I would like to see the commission bring to this committee and administration is a very strong understanding of risk," he said.  "You can't do regulatory planning from the basis of optimistic planning.  You have to ask what's the worst that can happen."  General Electric Co. scientists said they have developed ways to accelerate the process of neutralizing highly toxic polychlorinated biphenyls with bacteria.  GE, which has been blamed for having discharged PCBs into New York's Hudson River, identified the bacteria last year.  The company said it now has found that by feeding the bacteria nitrogen, phosphorus and trace metals the microbes can be forced to reduce PCBs twice as fast.  An outside construction management audit found that Philadelphia Electric Co. could have avoided nearly $300 million in costs to build its Limerick No. 2 nuclear plant.  The findings of this audit, if adopted by Pennsylvania's Public Utilities Commission, could reduce a pending rate request by $41 million, according to calculations by the commission's staff.  Last month, the Philadelphia-based utility submitted a request for a $548.6 million annual rate increase to recover the cost of building Limerick No. 2.  The plant, which cost $2.9 billion to build, is expected to begin full commercial operation in early 1990.  Analysts said it was too early to say what impact these findings might have on the proposed rate increase.  Yet some analysts believe the utility needs substantially all of the requested rate increase to maintain its current $2.20 annual common stock dividend.  The audit, conducted by the Chicago-based consulting firm of Robert Metzler & Associates, found that construction delays accounted for $245 million to $265 million of Limerick No. 2's costs.  The consultants also noted that construction of this unit, started in 1974 along with its twin, should have been completed four years earlier than it was.  The auditors also found that deficient inventory management controls and the company's failure to deal promptly with a design problem also added to the costs of the plant.  Work on Limerick 2 was halted in 1982 after the commission concluded that it wasn't feasible for Philadelphia Electric to construct the two Limerick units at the same time.  Work was resumed in 1986.  Joseph Paquette, Philadelphia Electric's chairman and chief executive officer, disagreed with the audit's findings, noting that saving costs by resuming construction on Limerick No.2 in 1984 or 1985 "would have been impossible because we were prohibited by the PUC from resuming construction until 1986."  He added that the company did finish the unit $300 million under the commission's cost cap.  New Headphones Cut  Just Unwanted Noises  SOME 50 YEARS ago, scientists concluded that unwanted noise can be canceled by creating an opposite sound wave.  But only now have engineers begun to develop products using the theory.  Bose, a Framingham, Mass., maker of speakers, is introducing a $965 headset for private airplane pilots that it says reduces noise by more than 93%, compared with regular headphones.  Britain's Plessey and Racal Electronics both started selling similar headsets to British tank crews last year.  Noise cancellation eliminates particular sounds by producing a pressure that is the opposite of the undesired noise.  In the Bose system, for example, if a loud sound creates pressure on the ear, a diaphragm in the earcup simultaneously decreases pressure, eliminating the sound.  The cancellation device can be set to eliminate only unwanted sounds such as an airplane's drone.  Peter Wheeler, Racal's marketing director, thinks the sets are too expensive for consumer or industrial use.  But, Dean Kamen, president of Enstrom Helicopter, Menominee, Mich., says Bose headsets will be standard gear on his company's executive helicopters.  "They are the largest single improvement to pilot comfort and safety I've seen," he says.  Some airline passengers may discover the comfort of noise-cancellation devices in an entertainment system Plessey is marketing to commercial airlines.  The system will let passengers rent videos, make phone calls, order products from catalogs for delivery on the ground, and listen to music through headsets that eliminate airplane sounds.  British researchers are working to develop four-speaker systems that could cancel the noise inside an entire turboprop plane, Racal's Mr. Wheeler says.  They also have studied the possibility of devices on truck tailpipes to augment muffler systems.  Omar Bose started his firm's noise cancellation research project because he was disappointed by the poor quality of music in airline headsets.  Today, Mr. Bose uses one of his company's headsets when he flies.  He reports that less exposure to unpleasant noises even reduces fatigue and jet lag.  Guess Which Company  Is Most Computerized  PREDICTABLY enough, International Business Machines uses more personal computers than any other company, some 200,000, or one for almost all of its 223,000 workers, according to a Personal Computing Magazine survey.  Outside the computer industry, General Electric is the biggest corporate user with 45,000 systems, or one for every 6.7 workers.  That ratio was about average among the 100 biggest users, the magazine says.  Computer ownership patterns proved unpredictable.  Ford Motor was the second-biggest computer owner with 42,000 systems.  The magazine calculated that Ford had one PC for every 8.5 workers, while General Motors had one for every 24 workers and Chrysler had one for every 18 workers.  Microsoft, the biggest PC software developer, has more than two personal computers for every worker, while Apple Computer has more than one for each employee.  Price Waterhouse was the only other company with a computer for each employee.  New Disk Dictionaries  Seek a Bigger Market  COMPUTERIZED spelling checkers and thesauruses are standard additions to many word processors.  But complete dictionaries have been slow sellers because of their size.  Now, with capacious hard disks more common and compression techniques still improving, disk dictionaries are seeking to supplant desk dictionaries.  Franklin Computer, Mt. Holly, N.J., is expanding the marketing of a $99 personal-computer version of Merriam-Webster's Concise Dictionary.  Thomas Yianalos, general manager of a Franklin subsidiary, says "a spellchecker, most everyone wants.  The dictionary market is limited to people who really care about what they write."  This month, Houghton-Mifflin started licensing for resale three different electronic versions of its American Heritage dictionary.  The biggest, filling six megabytes on a hard disk, will contain the entire American Heritage dictionary including etymology, sample sentences and usage notes.  Franklin's handheld $400 Language Master, which recently went on sale after production delays, not only provides definitions of 80,000 words, but it also pronounces them in a nasal, generally comprehensible voice.  Some words, however, such as ankle and angle are indistinguishable.  Michael Weiner, president of Microlytics, Pittsford, N.Y., and SelecTronics, Minneapolis, which make electronic spelling checkers and Bibles, plans to bring out an electronic version of the one-volume Random House encyclopedia next year.  It will have a feature called "word-nerd" that can find a word a user can't remember just by knowing the definition.  But no matter what their advantages, the cost of these products and the disk space they need will probably prevent them from cutting into paper dictionary and encyclopedia sales for many years.  Odds and Ends  LET NO MINUTES go unbilled.  WordTech Systems, Orinda, Calif., introduces a personal-computer product that sets the clock ticking the moment a lawyer or accountant dials a client.  The $299 product also automatically recalls notes taken during previous calls to the same number. . . .  Wisdom Simulators, Cambridge, Mass., calls a computerized management-training program on how to handle eager, but inexperienced young employees its "Dan Quayle simulation."  Exxon Corp. said it formally ends its Alaskan oil spill cleanup today as planned, and will maintain only a small wintertime staff there to do research and watch for problems that might require emergency attention.  Despite protests from state officials and environmentalists, the New York oil company has long insisted work would stop Sept. 15 on the grounds that unpredictable weather after today makes continued operations hazardous.  In anticipation of that self-imposed deadline, Exxon began laying off workers and packing up equipment early this month.  The company said its final tally shows it worked on 1,089 miles of shoreline in Prince William Sound and the Gulf of Alaska that were fouled after the tanker Exxon Valdez ran aground in March.  The company said its chairman, Lawrence Rawl, visited cleanup areas this week and, with President Lee Raymond, reviewed results with Alaska Gov. Steve Cowper and other state officials.  Mr. Rawl declared hundreds of miles of shoreline "are certainly what most people would consider clean."  He said some areas still have oil residue but are safe for fish and wildlife.  "This is a remarkable change from conditions I saw during my visit in early April," he said.  Exxon reiterated that it will keep 300 people in the state, primarily studying the cleanup's effectiveness with an eye toward what work, if any, is needed in the spring.  They will also be available to keep oil from environmentally sensitive areas.  Exxon said 250 contract personnel and boats, helicopters, aircraft and equipment are on standby, as well.  Separately, a Cambridge, Mass., consulting firm disclosed a study that concludes that despite the public attention generated by the Exxon Valdez disaster, the number of oil tanker spills in U.S. waters isn't rising.  Since 1978, the number of major spills has averaged six to seven a year, with a high of 16 in 1979 and a low of two in 1982, according to World Information Systems.  The study defines a spill of at least 10,000 gallons as major.  The Valdez spilled more than 10 million gallons of crude.  "Although massive spills can cause extensive environmental and economic damage, they remain low-probability events," said Richard Golob, the firm's president.  Of the 78 major tanker spills since 1978, seven involved a loss of one million gallons or more, the study found.  Meanwhile, a report by the attorney general of Washington state concluded that the Exxon Valdez oil spill didn't cause the rapid rise in gasoline prices after the spill.  Other factors -- such as a surge in crude oil prices, West Coast refinery shutdowns and increased demand -- were responsible, the report said.  The DDG-51, the nation's newest warship, is 18 months behind schedule and snarled by millions of dollars of cost overruns.  It is scheduled to be launched tomorrow, but Rep. John D. Dingell (D., Mich.), chairman of the House Energy and Commerce Committee, already has christened it "a procurement nightmare."  In a letter to Navy Secretary H. Lawrence Garrett II, Rep. Dingell says the General Accounting Office soon will ask the Navy to stop buying the destroyers -- eight currently are under order -- "until the program is under control."  Ironically, the $1.2 billion destroyer originally was designed by the Reagan administration as part of a program to end delays, cost overruns and expensive design changes.  But according to Rep. Dingell, there have been 760 design changes that have caused the builder of the ship, Bath Iron Works Corp. of Bath, Maine, to ask the Navy for "an $85 million bailout."  William E. Haggett, chairman and chief executive officer of the shipbuilding company, calls Rep. Dingell's remarks "a great distortion."  While conceding the ship is behind schedule, he says there have been only about 350 serious design changes.  He says that "is not an unusual number" for a new ship.  Bath is pressing the Navy for $35 million in price increases, Mr. Haggett says.  He insists Bath isn't asking for a bailout and says it may still make a "marginal profit" on the first ship, if it gets the increases.  Bath is a subsidiary of Gibbons, Green van Amerongen Ltd., a closely held New York investment company.  The DDG-51, to be named after the World War II Navy hero Arleigh Burke, was born in the wake of the 1982 British assault on the Falkland Islands, in which several aluminum-hulled British ships were destroyed by Argentine missiles.  Pentagon planners subsequently sat down to design a sleek, steel-hulled destroyer that incorporated many of the features of the partly aluminum Aegis cruisers.  John F. Lehman Jr., then secretary of the Navy, personally headed the effort.  He imposed a novel cost-control system.  Contracts for the ships were to be let at fixed prices.  No design changes were permitted unless personally signed by Mr. Lehman or the chief of naval operations.  The system was abandoned in the spring of 1987, shortly after Mr. Lehman left office.  "This ship was not begun until after I left," said Mr. Lehman, currently an executive for a Wall Street investment company.  "I wouldn't be able to comment on any change orders or the management of the building of the ship."  A spokesman for the Navy said that the delays in the ship project were caused by a 1985 strike at Bath, problems with computer-aided designs and delays in testing installed equipment.  "The Navy considers the program well under control in both cost and schedule," he says.  Delivery, originally scheduled for next month, is now slated for early 1991.  A CAPITAL-GAINS TAX CUT was passed by the Ways and Means Committee and has a good chance of being approved by the entire House.  The panel also voted to limit tax refunds for corporations involved in leveraged buy-outs and to repeal a tax law that compelled companies to offer comparable health benefits to top executives and rank-and-file workers.  ---  UAL's board accepted a $6.75 billion takeover bid from a group led by United Air's pilots union and Chairman Stephen Wolf.  The buy-out would make UAL the nation's largest employee-owned firm.  Still, the board left the door open to higher bids.  ---  Junk-bond prices plunged again as the market became caught in its worst shakeout ever.  Buying has temporarily dried up for hundreds of issues, particularly Campeau's.  Stock prices fell further, hurt by the turmoil in junk bonds.  The Dow Jones industrials fell 14.63, to 2664.89.  Bonds and the dollar gained.  ---  General Motors plans to shut an assembly plant in Georgia next year, a major step toward adjusting its vehicle output to shrinking sales.  The closing will idle 3,200 people.  ---  Campeau's cash crunch prompted a major factoring company to tell vendors to stop shipping merchandise to Campeau department stores.  Also, the Toronto-based company posted a second-quarter loss of $124 million.  ---  Michael Milken is seeking a court order barring what his attorneys say are illegal government leaks of confidential data about the investigation of Drexel's former junk-bond chief.  ---  Retail sales rose 0.7% in August, mainly due to a 2.6% surge in auto buying that is expected to stall this month.  July sales rose 0.5% rather than 0.9% reported initially.  ---  British Petroleum launched a major shake-up of its global exploration business, cutting 1,700 jobs and agreeing to sell $1.31 billion of oil and gas assets to Oryx Energy of the U.S.  --- MGM/UA directors apparently let a bid by Murdoch's News Corp. expire without making any announcement.  ---  Bell Atlantic plans to consolidate phone operations and is hoping to cut 1,200 jobs.  The moves will result in an estimated $300 million charge, likely wiping out fourth-quarter profit.  ---  Ashland Oil's ex-chairman, Orin Atkins, pleaded guilty to conspiracy and wire-fraud charges in a scheme to sell company documents to Iran.  ---  IBM has decided to postpone a long-awaited new entry in the booming computer workstation market, giving competitors a clear field for the rest of the year, sources said.  ---  Dean Witter's John Mendelson resigned along with another stock market analyst, reflecting a policy shift throughout the brokerage industry.  ---  Two top Ferruzzi traders are resigning, two months after the grain firm was forced to liquidate its huge soybean futures position in Chicago.  ---  Markets --  Stocks: Volume 149,250,000 shares.  Dow Jones industrials 2664.89, off 14.63; transportation 1443.28, off 25.96; utilities 213.78, off 0.32.  Bonds: Shearson Lehman Hutton Treasury index 3323.47, up 5.75.  Commodities: Dow Jones futures index 130.61, up 0.71; spot index 129.80, up 1.16.  Dollar: 146.86 yen, up 0.53; 1.9755 marks, up 0.0050.  The surprise $1.4 billion bid for MGM/UA Communications Co. by Rupert Murdoch's News Corp. and its Fox Inc. unit apparently expired yesterday.  As of late last night, MGM/UA hadn't made any announcement.  A special meeting of MGM/UA directors had continued late into the evening.  Insiders said the bid, announced Wednesday, had a time limit of less than 24 hours.  The directors were comparing the last-minute News Corp. proposal with an earlier offer they had already accepted: a $1 billion bid from Qintex Group.  It wasn't clear whether News Corp. had extended its offer.  Sources said the News Corp. offer had come after behind-the-scene complications in MGM/UA's agreement to be acquired by Qintex Group.  Last April, MGM/UA announced it had reached an agreement to sell the bulk of the company to Qintex, an Australian operator of resorts and an Australian television network, in a transaction due to close on Sept. 30.  But on Wednesday, News Corp. and Fox made their bid.  Sources said Christopher Skase, chairman of Qintex Group, and Kirk Kerkorian, MGM/UA's majority shareholder, have held meetings in the past few weeks in which the original terms of the agreement came under discussion.  As part of the original agreement in April, Qintex agreed to pay $20 a share.  But the company also agreed to sell back certain MGM assets to Mr. Kerkorian, including the lion logo, the MGM television operations, a small MGM film library and the MGM headquarters here, making the effective price to Qintex about $600 million.  However, sources said Christopher Skase, chairman of Qintex Group, and Kirk Kerkorian, MGM/UA's majority shareholder, have held meetings in the past few weeks in which the original terms of the agreement came under discussion.  As part of the original agreement in April, Qintex agreed to pay $20 a share, or about $1.1 billion.  But the company also agreed to sell back certain MGM assets to Mr. Kerkorian, including the lion logo, the MGM television operations, a small MGM film library and the MGM headquarters here, making the effective price to Qintex about $600 million.  However, sources said MGM/UA officials and Mr. Skase recently discussed whether MGM/UA would sell the entire company to Qintex.  It isn't clear which side suggested the possible change in plan.  However, it's understood that MGM/UA initiated the renewed talks with News Corp. and Fox Inc. News Corp. had been one of the two final bidders for MGM/UA earlier this year but lost out after bidding $19.80 a share.  Qintex is understood to have been considering making an offer for the entire company when the News Corp. offer was announced.  Yesterday, Qintex officials declined to comment.  But sources said Qintex is considering making a bid for the entire company, among other options.  "Mr.  Kerkorian had a change of mindset about what he wanted to do.  He had vacillated many times about what he was selling and what he was keeping," said a source close to the transaction.  Officials at MGM/UA declined to comment.  Mr. Kerkorian had tried to sell the company for more than a year before the agreement with Qintex, and many who expressed interest complained that the financier often changed his mind in negotiations.  Hollywood has also been rife with rumors that Mr. Skase was having difficulty rounding up the financing for his bid.  Earlier this month, Qintex announced it had commitments for $400 million in bank financing for the $600 million acquisition.  Qintex also said it was negotiating with about 10 investors in the U.S. and overseas for the private placement of $500 million of common and preferred stock for acquisition costs and for working capital.  However, the fact that the financing still wasn't in place has continued to fuel rumors that nervousness over the financing may have led MGM/UA to reopen talks with News Corp. and Fox.  Under the agreement with Qintex, MGM/UA has said it has the right to terminate the merger if it decides to accept a higher offer.  In that case, it has to pay Qintex $18.2 million.  In composite trading yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange, MGM/UA closed at $20.625, down 62.5 cents.  Messrs.  Skase and Murdoch, both Australians, appeared to be on very friendly terms before the News Corp. bid topped the Qintex bid.  After MGM/UA announced its agreement with Qintex, Mr. Murdoch hosted a cocktail party in his home to introduce Mr. Skase to top Hollywood executives and agents.  And Mr. Murdoch was one of the people with whom Mr. Skase has talked regarding financing plans.  Insiders say that after MGM/UA's agreement with Qintex, Messrs.  Murdoch and Skase had discussions about "some kind of joint arrangement."  However, the talks "never went anywhere," according to a source close to the transaction.  Mr. Skase is now said to be "distraught" and "angry" over Mr. Murdoch's bid.  Mr. Skase had clearly expected the deal to go through.  In recent months he paid more than $8 million for the palatial home of the late Edie Goetz, the daughter of the late Louis B. Mayer, a founder of the original MGM studio.  The 15,000-square-foot home features five rooms for servants and is situated on two acres in the wealthy Holmby Hills area, just outside Beverly Hills.  That home is still in escrow, and Mr. Skase has been renting a home in Holmby Hills in the meantime.  He has a residence in Brisbane, Australia.  Mr. Skase has other reasons to be in Los Angeles.  Through a unit, Qintex Group holds a 43% stake in Qintex Entertainment Inc., a Los Angeles-based producer of television movies and miniseries.  Air France and Lufthansa German Airlines are expected to announce an agreement today to reinforce their cooperation through such steps as coordinating flight schedules, undertaking joint promotions and exchanging managers.  Both carriers declined to comment yesterday, but sources said Air France Chairman Bernard Attali and Lufthansa Chairman Heinz Ruhnau are to sign the accord in Paris.  Air France earlier this week scheduled a news conference for today.  The pact isn't believed to include any kind of cross-shareholding, sources said.  Air France is state-owned.  West Germany holds 64.5% of Lufthansa but plans to lower the stake to 51.6%.  Like most other European carriers, both Lufthansa and Air France have said they are searching for alliance partners around the world.  The West German carrier said it is talking to AMR Corp.'s American Airlines about a marketing pact.  The idea behind such linkups usually is to tie route networks together, so that each partner can offer its passengers services where it can't fly but its partner can.  In theory, this boosts traffic and brings economies of scale.  In recent months, several other European airlines have made marketing pacts with U.S. and Asian carriers, and a handful have invested as well.  Swissair bought 5% of Delta Air Lines, Scandinavian Airlines System purchased 10% of Texas Air Corp., KLM Royal Dutch Airlines is buying 10% of Northwest Airlines and British Airways has taken a 15% interest in an employee group bidding for United Airlines.  It isn't clear what benefits a marketing alliance between neighboring European carriers would bring.  But with airline deregulation expected in the European Community after 1992, Air France and Lufthansa might be hoping to avoid competing with each other in the EC.  Lufthansa, Europe's second largest carrier, and Air France, No. 4, have many ties.  The two have been members of an aircraft maintenance consortium called Atlas Group for 20 years.  They are both founders and 25% owners of the Amadeus computer reservations system.  And last year they launched a new carrier, West Berlin-based EuroBerlin France.  Both carriers put a lot of emphasis on freight activities, and they see eye-to-eye on issues such as airline deregulation.  UAL Corp.'s board approved a $300 a share, $6.75 billion offer from a group led by United Airlines' pilot union and chairman Stephen M. Wolf that would make the carrier's parent the largest employee-owned company in the nation.  The board's decision, reached in a six-hour meeting in Chicago, follows a six-week bidding war for the nation's second-largest carrier sparked by Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis.  The board approved the labor-management bid after Mr. Davis failed to increase his $275-a-share, $6.19 billion offer.  It was unclear last night if Mr. Davis would seek to sidetrack the buy-out, which includes a $750 million investment by British Airways PLC for a 15% stake.  Employees will own 75% and management 10%.  The board explicitly left the door open to higher bids.  But the buy-out group plans to move quickly, saying it will start a tender offer by Sept. 21.  The agreement doesn't contain any "lockup" provisions under which the buy-out group would receive a fee if their bid is topped by Mr. Davis or another other bidder.  The pilot-management group had the advantage of $250 million in annual cost concessions agreed to by the pilots.  Mr. Davis had tried, but failed to convince United's other labor groups to support his bid.  Mr. Davis didn't have any comment last night, but he wasn't expected to concede defeat immediately and was believed likely to take some action today.  If the agreement holds, United would be the second major airline to elude him this year after he lost a bidding war in June for Northwest Airlines parent NWA Inc.  Mr. Davis's options include raising his bid, teaming up with another European airline, or hanging back to see whether the unusual labor-management coalition can survive a budding civil war with a rival union of machinists.  However, officials close to the pilot union say they believe Mr. Davis will avoid a protracted fight.  The lack of a firm response from Mr. Davis or any other bidder influenced the board's decision to accept the bid from the pilot-management group.  Board advisers questioned Davis representatives closely on Wednesday about any possible increase over $300 a share.  But the Davis advisers wouldn't provide details.  The UAL board's decision follows a two-year effort by the pilot union to acquire a controlling interest in the airline.  The union made a $110-a-share offer in April 1987 that the board rebuffed.  However, that bid ultimately led to the resignation of former UAL chairman Richard Ferris, and to sale of UAL's non-airline assets.  This employee-led takeover is certain to attract comment and attention far beyond Wall Street from a social and political perspective.  The pilot union is perhaps uniquely situated among labor groups to make such a bid because some of its members earn more than $150,000 a year.  But its highly leveraged structure, with about $1 billion in equity and $7 billion in debt, may raise qualms in Washington, particularly in light of a panic this week in the market for high-risk, high-yield junk bonds.  Prompted by Campeau Corp., a leveraged retailer choking on debt, the sell-off sent tremors through real and rumored takeover stocks including UAL and other airlines.  UAL fell $2.75 to $280.50 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange.  Three other potential targets also skidded.  American Airlines parent AMR Corp. dropped $4.125 to $77.625, Delta Air Lines fell $2.875 to $71.625, and USAir declined $1.375 to $46.625.  But the UAL purchase won't require any junk bonds.  UAL said Citicorp and Chase Manhattan have agreed to provide $3 billion, and are "highly confident" they can raise an additional $4.2 billion.  British Air, which has a successful marketing agreement with UAL, will receive common and preferred stock and a seat on UAL's board.  The pilot union is contributing $200 million from a pension plan, and employees will have three of 15 board seats.  UAL said Salomon Brothers Inc. will lend $200 million temporarily until the pilot pension money can be released.  About 35 UAL executives, including Mr. Wolf, are putting up $15 million initially for a 1% stake.  They will receive options in the new company equal to a 9% stake.  Management also will have three board seats, and a strong say in selecting eight outside directors.  In a statement, Mr. Wolf said the buy-out serves United's 68,000 employees as well as its shareholders and the flying public.  "As the largest U.S. employee-owned company, United Airlines will keep its tradition of quality service and combine it with a new entrepreneurial vigor."  Mr. Wolf added that he is "hopeful that all employees will join and become part of this opportunity."  The proposal still faces some rough sailing.  None of the UAL's other labor unions have agreed to participate in the transaction.  The pilot union and UAL management were hoping to obtain about another $120 million in cost concessions from the other labor groups.  The pilot union has said the transaction is possible even if the other employee groups don't participate.  The flight attendants plan to advise their members as early as today about whether to participate.  The pilots face the stiffest opposition from 23,000 machinists, who make up the airline's largest union.  Louis R. Schroeder, head of United's machinists, said the union doesn't support the bid "in its current form."  He warned in a letter sent to UAL directors yesterday's that "it would be imprudent for the board and lenders to presume we will do so in the future."  Mr. Schroeder also for the first time raised the specter of a strike that could disrupt efforts to close the purchase.  Mr. Schroeder said that machnists begin new contract talks Oct. 1 and warned that if the union's wage and job-security concerns aren't addressed, "We can do what we have done before-strike."  The board's approval, however, puts more pressure on the other unions to fall into line.  John Peterpaul, national president of the International Association of Machinists, said the union doesn't want to "shut the door" on possible future negotiations, but doesn't now support the labor-management bid.  Mr. Peterpaul said the machinists don't yet have enough details about how the transaction will be structured to rule out participating.  The union has balked at a management demand that details of the offer be kept secret.  Both union officials chided UAL for failing to consult other labor groups when it was working on the joint bid.  Cummins Engine Co., seeking to tap a growing new-product market, formed a joint venture with Toshiba Corp. of Japan to sell ceramic-composite parts for truck and car engines in the U.S.  Ceramic composites, which are already used by some Japanese engine makers, haven't widely replaced metal parts in U.S. engines.  Such parts have been heralded as being able to withstand higher temperatures than metal.  But some ceramic parts sold in this country have proven too brittle to gain much acceptance, securities analysts said.  Toshiba, based in Tokyo, already markets a ceramic-composite fuel injector link used in one model of Cummins heavy-duty truck engines.  Cummins, a maker of diesel engines, parts and power systems, said last month that a slump in heavy-truck orders will mean laying off about 100 workers at four plants in southern Indiana.  But analysts said selling cermamic parts gives the company a new market that could lead to new jobs in the next few years.  Cummins didn't announce terms for the joint venture company, to be known as Enceratec Inc., but it said a sales office will open immediately near Cummins headquarters.  Plans call for Enceratec to research and develop, and eventually manufacture, new ceramic parts.  Principal customers are expected to include major U.S. producers of gasoline and diesel engines, ball bearings, precision instruments and other industrial machinery and equipment, Cummins said.  Fred L. Harris was elected a director, increasing the board to six members.  Mr. Harris, a lawyer, represents the interests of Commonwealth Holdings Inc., which recently purchased 5% of the company's stock.  El Pollo Asado operates and franchises restaurants that specialize in Mexican food and charbroiled chicken.  W.H. Clark, chairman, president and chief executive officer of Nalco Chemical Co., was named a director of this energy and natural gas distribution concern, increasing board membership to 11.  John R. Purcell, chairman and chief executive officer of Grenadier Associates Inc., was named a director of this publishing and entertainment concern, expanding the board to seven.  Robert Nicolle, 54 years old, was named a director and chief investment officer of Matheson Investment Management Ltd., part of the financial-services business of Matheson & Co., the British arm of this financial-services, hotel and property concern.  Mr. Nicolle was previously with Kleinwort Benson Investment Management, where his responsibilities included developing private banking and investment services for individuals.  Jeremy Long, 36 years old, was named to the new position of deputy chief executive at this British entertainment company.  Mr. Long will also continue as the company's group finance director.  Frank J. Pizzitola will assume the posts of chairman, president and chief executive officer of this water-utility holding company.  He will succeed Allen E. Rosenberg, who will retire at the end of the month.  Mr. Pizzitola is a partner at the New York investment bank of Lazard Freres & Co. and a director of GWC.  He will also serve as chairman of General Waterworks Corp., GWC's principal unit.  Ronald S. Dungan has been appointed president and chief executive of General Waterworks, succeeding Mr. Rosenberg.  John F. O'Brien was named chairman of this insurance carrier.  Mr. O'Brien, who is a former executive of Fidelity Management Co., a Boston mutual fund firm, was previously named president, chief executive officer and a member of the board of State Mutual Life Assurance Co. of America, which owns 51.3% of Hanover.  He succeeds the late Frederick Fedeli in all those positions.  U.S. banks posted near-record second-quarter profits totaling $7 billion, as the troubled Southwest banks reduced their level of nonperforming assets.  Earnings declined slightly from the record first quarter, in which banks earned $7.3 billion, but were 31% above the 1988 second-quarter earnings of $5.4 billion.  That combined for a record first half of $14.3 billion.  Banks also added $4.6 billion to their equity capital in the second quarter to $206 billion, and are currently at the highest capital level in 15 years, said William Seidman, chairman of the Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.  Most banks are raising their capital to meet higher standards that will take effect in about 18 months.  Regional trends continued their shift in the second quarter, with problems moving east.  In the Southwest, for example, second-quarter charge-offs were almost two-thirds lower than a year ago, and nonperforming assets declined by 28%.  The Southwest, however, still has the highest percentage of nonperforming assets, at 4.75%, as a percentage of total assets.  The Northeast was the only region to show a year-to-year increase in the proportion of unprofitable banks, as nonperforming real-estate loans increased.  Mr. Seidman cautioned, however, that the problems weren't of the same scope.  "The Northeast is nowhere near the kind of problems the Southwest has experienced in recent years," he said.  The industry also continued its consolidation.  The 12,944 banks were the lowest number since the FDIC was founded in 1934, and down from 13,411 in the second quarter a year ago.  Moreover, Mr. Seidman said, banks are losing market share to other financial-services companies, such as credit unions.  Debt to less-developed nations will be the greatest uncertainty in banking results during the remaining half of the year, Mr. Seidman said, particularly the impact of the recently completed Mexican-debt restructuring.  "It will depend on the world economy and how the Brady plan plays out," Mr. Seidman said.  Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady unveiled a plan in March which emphasizes reducing debt over continued lending.  On-Line Software International Inc., which is attempting to shore up its business, expects to report "modest profitability" in the fiscal first quarter ended Aug. 31.  On-Line also said that as part of a new five-point program to strengthen business, it will refine its direct sales structure and reposition its Case technology, which will result in a nonrecurring expense in the first quarter.  As part of its direct sales restructuring, On-Line will halt direct sales of its Case-Pac product, which represents about 1% to 2% of sales.  The company said it also refocused its Ramis information-products line to include a joint direct marketing/telemarketing effort.  The Ramis line represents about 15% of total sales.  On-Line develops and sells software for computers made by International Business Machines Corp. and for IBM-compatible computers.  In the year-earlier quarter the company posted a $185,000 loss, including a one-time $1.3 million gain from the repurchase of debt.  A former director of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York was sentenced to a year in jail for leaking information about the discount rate to a New Jersey government-securities trader.  Six months of the sentence was suspended.  Federal Judge Dickinson R. Debevoise here also put Robert A. Rough on probation for two years and ordered him to perform 200 hours of community service.  Judge Debevoise rejected Mr. Rough's personal plea for no jail time, saying he didn't want to give the impression that "prison was only for those not socially advantaged."  In June, Mr. Rough, who served as a director of the New York Fed from 1982 to 1984, pleaded guilty to one count of bank fraud.  Last December, he was indicted on seven counts of wire, securities and bank fraud.  Mr. Rough admitted that he leaked to Gilbert Schulman, then president of the brokerage firm of Bevill, Bresler & Schulman Inc., the New York Fed's discount-rate recommendations to the Federal Reserve System in Washington.  The discount rate -- the interest rate at which the Federal Reserve lends to banks and other financial institutions -- can influence stock and bond prices.  Mr. Rough never attempted to profit from leaking information and he made nothing from it, Assistant U.S. Attorney Paul A. Weissman stated in his sentencing memo.  But yesterday, Mr. Rough admitted he had "breached a trust" and made a "grievous mistake."  "It was done out of friendship, not out of greed," said Mr. Rough, 50 years old, his voice cracking several times as he addressed Judge Debevoise.  A third-generation banker, Mr. Rough added: "God knows, my (deceased) dad must be shaking his head now. . . .  I have disgraced my family's name."  The judge, suspending half the jail time, said he was "convinced (that Mr. Rough's) remarks came from the heart."  Mr. Rough could have received five years in jail and a $10,000 fine.  His jail term is scheduled to begin Oct. 16.  Bevill Bresler, Livingston, N.J., traded heavily in government securities before it collapsed in April 1985.  Former officers of the firm, including Mr. Schulman, were later convicted of siphoning millions of dollars from the company.  "Don't give me a room full of analysts with opinions about a stock," Wall Street's veteran investors are known to say.  "Just give me one bull and one bear -- and 20 minutes for them to shout it out."  Truth by dueling, it turns out, is a fabulous technique for sorting out disputes.  So why limit it to arguments about stocks?  Two new books stake out opposite positions on a much more important topic than IBM's third-quarter earnings.  They address the vexing issue of whether a steady procession of buy-outs, mergers, restructurings and takeovers is good or bad for the American economy.  Defending the takeover movement is Harvey Segal, a one-time Citibank vice president and former economics writer for the Washington Post and the New York Times.  In "Corporate Makeover" (Viking, 269 pages, $19.95), a wide-ranging look at everything from Adam Smith's writings to the RJR Nabisco deal, Mr. Segal generally sees acquisitions and restructurings as a cure for corporate sloth and mismanagement.  At the heart of Mr. Segal's argument is a belief that big corporations have lost their way.  Giants such as Sears Roebuck and Exxon have stumbled when they tried to diversify.  Surveys show that executives get well paid whether their companies prosper or not.  And Mr. Segal is suspicious of corporate perks, focusing on partridge-shooting parties by oil-company executives and the now well-known excesses at Allegheny International under former chief executive officer Robert Buckley.  Mr. Segal makes some lively arguments.  In a broadside against Texaco's directors, who have survived through all the Pennzoil litigation, he declares: "General Custer died for his bad judgment at the Little Big Horn and Friedrich von Paulus surrendered in disgrace at Stalingrad.  But in corporate wars, generals are more likely to be rewarded than punished for their shortcomings."  Yet "Corporate Makeover" tries to cover so much ground that it often doesn't venture much beyond what has already appeared in the business press about say, Michael Milken and the price of Big Macs round the world.  But the once-over-lightly approach leaves some big puzzles, such as why takeover bids put drastically increased values on RJR, Time Inc. and other well-known companies.  Can new buyers maximize values that old management ignored?  Or are the tax advantages for a debt-financed takeover that large?  Or are other factors at work?  Mr. Segal votes for reason No. 1 and races off to the next topic, when a deeper analysis would have been welcome.  It's a shame, too, that Mr. Segal doesn't scrutinize takeover artists with the same vigor that he applies to corporate managers.  The raiders have their jets too, and sinecures for needy family members.  If Harvey Segal does his best to wave the flag for takeovers, Max Holland would rather burn that flag.  In "When the Machine Stopped" (Harvard Business School Press, 335 pages, $22.95), he looks strictly at the 41-year life story of a single machine-tool company, Burgmaster Corp., which began as an immigrant's dream and ended in liquidation.  It's an intriguing study and Mr. Holland shows a storyteller's touch, even if some of his conclusions don't seem to fit his facts.  Burgmaster was founded by Czech immigrant Max Burg in 1945 and grew rapidly.  It was a quick innovator, and in the booming markets of the 1950s, everything worked out well.  Its strong earnings attracted a conglomerate buyer, Houdaille Industries, in 1965, which in turn was taken private in a leveraged buy-out by Kohlberg Kravis Roberts & Co. in 1979.  But Burgmaster soon was overwhelmed by Japanese competition.  It started showing losses and in 1986 it was shut down, with its workers dispersed and its equipment sold at auction.  Mr. Holland does his best to blame Burgmaster's problems on the conglomerate acquisition and the subsequent LBO.  The book is rich with detail about 20 years of conflicts between numbers-oriented outside managers and shirt-sleeved production leaders who cared only about making good machine tools.  There's no question where Mr. Holland's alliances lie; his father was a Burgmaster production employee for 29 years.  But as Mr. Holland acknowledges, Burgmaster's design and production team began to make missteps in the 1970s.  The company had many other woes as well, including high labor costs at its Los Angeles-area facilities, the 1980-82 recession, and the high dollar of 1983-85 that touched off a flood of imports.  Most tellingly, Burgmaster -- and much of U.S. industry -- disastrously misread Japan's potential in the 1970s, when there was still time and abundant cash flow to improve competitiveness vis-a-vis Pacific Rim competition.  Burgmaster ended up as a rare LBO wipe-out, while Houdaille overall performed passably for its buy-out owners, and many other LBO companies prospered.  Burgmaster still is an intriguing case study, if only as an example of what can go wrong, rather than what is symptomatic about takeovers.  But Mr. Holland tries to draw the widest lessons possible.  He closes his book with a denunciation of U.S. policies that allowed Burgmaster to fail, and the curious belief that if the U.S. had "a coherent role for the government in its economy," things would be better.  Score it a draw.  Mr. Segal probably has the better argument.  But Mr. Holland is a better fighter.  --- Mr. Anders covers financial markets for the Journal's New York bureau.  WILLCOX & GIBBS Inc. boosted the semiannual dividend 19% after adjusting for a 4-for-3 stock split paid June 30.  The new dividend is five cents a share.  Before the split, the New York distributor of industrial products and specialty manufacturer of covered yarn had paid 5.625 cents a share.  In May, directors indicated they would boost the payout.  The new dividend is payable Oct. 31 to stock of record Sept. 29.  Citicorp Chairman John S. Reed walked a verbal tightrope with securities analysts on the touchy subject of whether the biggest U.S. bank will boost its reserves for losses on loans to developing nations.  In the end, several analysts came away with the impression that some meaningful addition to reserves probably will be made during the fourth quarter.  Asked repeatedly about his plans during the two-hour session, Mr. Reed said at various points: "From a practical business point of view, I'm comfortable today with where we are, though we will look at it . . .  I'm not thinking of raising reserves . . .  For the moment we feel we're OK with the economic risks."  The operative word in Mr. Reed's remarks appears to be "today."  J. Richard Fredericks, an analyst with Montgomery Securities, San Francisco, said, "I interpret his remarks to mean that they will increase reserves in the fourth quarter, not the third quarter."  A large increase in reserves would depress Citicorp's earnings.  For the first six months of 1989, the bank holding company earned $924 million, or $2.63 a share.  Citicorp has $2.87 billion of reserves earmarked for its $9.3 billion portfolio of developing-nation loans.  That represents 25% of its exposure, well below the 50% set aside by many big British banks and regional U.S. banks, but still above the 10% level set by Japanese banks.  In recent months, the Federal Reserve Bank of New York has been quietly pressuring banks with low capital and reserve levels to raise capital.  It isn't known whether Citicorp is one of those banks.  Mr. Reed said a 50% reserve level may be "appropriate" for a bank like Britain's Barclays PLC that is getting out of sovereign lending, or lending to government agencies, but not for Citicorp which remains in that business.  Sounding a positive note, Mr. Reed added that the "beginning of the end" of the developing-country debt crisis is under way, but that the process will take another two or three years.  In other matters, Mr. Reed said:  -- It was his "informed guess" that Brazil and Venezuela would be "substantially current" in their interest payments by the end of 1989.  He said he expects a "significant but not total payment" from Brazil in the third quarter.  -- Citicorp's global consumer business will earn more than $800 million this year, almost as much as the $870 million earned by the entire company in 1984.  -- He expects Citicorp's corporate banking business in Europe to grow more rapidly than its U.S. corporate business over the next 10 years.  -- Citicorp basically has given up trying to buy a Japanese bank because of a lack of sellers.  "I'd give it a 5% possibility," he said.  He said Citicorp will continue to increase its Japanese retail banking business one branch at a time, with a goal of 50 branches.  -- Citicorp has no plans for a common stock issue.  Westinghouse Electric Corp. said its Westinghouse Credit Corp. unit completed an $820 million, five-year revolving-credit facility with 23 domestic and international banks.  The credit facility will be used as a backup to commercial paper outstanding and for general corporate purposes, the company said.  Westinghouse is an electrical, broadcasting and financial-services concern.  Gov. James Blanchard is beginning to wonder if he can afford social activism on the cheap.  Washington activism, that is -- paid for with Michigan money.  "Washington has gone from revenue sharing to revenue bleeding," complains the liberal Democrat, a sentiment increasingly voiced by governors of both parties and many shades of ideology.  Congress, confronting monumental budget deficits, first terminated its revenue-sharing program with the states.  Now, in an end run around those deficits, Congress and the White House increasingly are ordering up expensive new programs for the states to execute.  President Bush's new war on drugs alone could cost states well over $9 billion for new prisons and more police, maintains Sen. Joseph Biden (D., Del.), the Senate Judiciary Committee chairman.  Tuesday, he conducted a hearing on those and other state costs associated with the program.  The result of such moves by the federal government has been to crimp the style of a new breed of activist governor that emerged in the 1980s to attack problems with more imagination and efficiency than Washington typically musters.  Mr. Blanchard, himself a former congressman, epitomizes the breed -- and he isn't happy.  "If we let this trend continue, I'm telling you, we're not going to have any budgets left," he warned colleagues at a recent National Governors Association convention.  "This is either a back-door tax increase or pushing off on states things that Congress, if it had any guts, would do itself."  He isn't alone.  In a provocative phrase, the magazine Governing reported that state officials are beginning to feel like "field hands of federalism."  "What Washington once permitted states to do, it now requires us to do," complains Ohio Democratic Gov. Richard Celeste.  In reaction, the usually low-key governors, at their convention, overwhelmingly urged Congress to slap a two-year freeze on new Medicaid mandates.  They argued that current mandates are crippling their ability "to properly fund education and other important services."  A freeze would stop a proposed Medicaid expansion in its tracks.  Explosively growing state expenditures for Medicaid are projected to quadruple from about $12.5 billion nationally in 1970 to $50 billion in 1994.  In Michigan, Medicaid is projected to cost $1 billion in the coming fiscal year.  That's already a sizable chunk of a state budget of about $16.5 billion, and the cost is projected to increase a minimum of $200 million over the next three years.  This growth rate far outstrips the 3%-to-4% expansion of the Michigan budget as a whole.  Among the results, says Shelby Solomon, Gov. Blanchard's director of management and budget, is "a tug-of-war between constituencies" -- and a lawsuit.  Even as Congress eyes new Medicaid mandates, Michigan is struggling to contain the costs of the program -- and, for its pains, has been haled into court by angry health-care providers.  "I don't think advocacy groups have any idea they've been snookered by Washington," says Gov. Blanchard.  The White House and Congress, he says, are encouraging them to believe there is such a thing as a free lunch.  Sen. Biden would agree with that, at least when it comes to the new anti-drug program.  "The real {White House} strategy is that they're going to ask the states to bear the overwhelming bulk of the load," he says.  He predicts states will be forced to raise taxes, even as President Bush continues to pose as an anti-tax champion.  Some advocacy groups, in turn, are dismayed to find liberal governors opposing liberal legislation like the Medicaid expansion, which would extend health coverage to now-excluded poor pregnant women and children.  "I think the last thing they should be opposing is an expansion of children's health {programs}, even if they have to pick up some of the costs," says Sara Rosenbaum, director of programs and policy for the Children's Defense Fund.  She argues it's "disingenuous" for governors to say the proposed Medicaid requirements would take money from education when the mandates would help children directly.  Adds Robert Greenstein, director of the Center on Budget and Policy Priorities: "While I think the governors have a larger point, this is one of the worst possible places to make it."  He notes that "poor prenatal care can have serious long-term effects," eventually forcing states to spend heavily on remedial education and other services.  Liberal House member Henry Waxman (D., Calif.) also has expressed "profound disappointment" with the governors' stand, while pointedly questioning the "political logic" of Democratic governors opposing social legislation.  The Medicaid measure passed by the House Energy and Commerce Committee, where Rep. Waxman chairs a subcommittee on health and the environment, would require states to phase in coverage of pregnant women and infants in families with incomes of almost double the federal poverty level.  Under current law, states must provide similar coverage by next July, but only to families below the poverty level.  They have an option to be more generous than that, however, and 20 states already are.  Current law will mandate coverage of children up to age one; the legislation approved by the committee would require coverage up to age six, in families falling below the poverty level.  The federal government pays from 50% to 78% of health-care costs for the Medicaid program, with the poorest states getting the most help in federal matching funds.  Medicaid is the states' biggest fiscal headache, but not their only one.  In recent years, Congress has also passed a catastrophic-illness insurance program under Medicare that imposes state administrative costs; nursing-home reform that forces states to move some long-term mental health patients out of Medicaid-supported homes and into mostly state-supported community mental health centers; and environmental-cleanup programs, including one that will require states to locate and remove leaking underground fuel tanks.  This year, Congress is considering a measure directing states to improve day-care facilities, plus the anti-drug war and the Medicaid expansion.  What is striking is that the complaints about federal mandates are coming from the nation's most imaginative governors.  Most of them agree with the policy goals Washington is setting and most, like Republican Gov. Thomas Kean of New Jersey, believe states can achieve those goals better than Washington.  But there are two missing ingredients, from the state perspective.  One is flexibility.  "The states want to work with Washington to set the performance goals," says Iowa Republican Gov. Terry Branstad, the new chairman of the National Governors Association.  That's why, earlier this year, governors led a successful fight to strip some proposed state requirements from the child-care legislation in the Senate.  The other, more important, missing ingredient is federal money.  Mr. Solomon, the Michigan gubernatorial aide, calculates that reduced aid from Washington, combined with increased Washington mandates, has caused "a $3 billion swing" in the state budget burden.  Adds Ohio budget director Lee Walker: "You really have to fund the mandated programs first."  And once that has been done, there may be little left over for the governor's own priorities.  That's what happened this year to Gov. Bill Clinton.  The Arkansas Democrat proposed a sweeping education package, accompanied by an increased sales tax, that would have given teachers an average $4,000 raise over two years.  But the legislature, brushing aside the governor's argument that newly mandated federal programs were eating up much of his revenue, rejected the sales tax.  Even after larger-than-expected revenue receipts, the governor was able to deliver raises only in the $500-to-$700 range.  "We're going to fall behind other states after years of trying to get ahead," he warned during the fight.  He's weighing another try at a special session.  In Michigan, Gov. Blanchard is pushing a half-cent increase in the sales tax to pay for educational improvements.  He also has resorted to legislative brinksmanship to get programs started.  He threatened, for example, to veto the entire state education budget unless a new preschool program was funded.  It was.  But more commonly he has launched new programs by cutting old ones.  Budgeting, says his budget chief, Mr. Solomon, "has become a zero-sum game."  Thus Gov. Blanchard redirected welfare money to launch a new "Job Start" program that fights the high-school dropout problem and helps find jobs for graduates.  Elements of his commerce department, the heart of his state economic-growth strategy, nevertheless took budget cuts of 10% or more.  The money saved went into the general fund.  Gov. Blanchard and his colleagues will no doubt lobby President Bush for more money at an "education summit" Mr. Bush has called for late September.  "If George Bush can't face these {revenue} problems now, with 3 1/2 years to go before his next election campaign, he never will," the governor concludes.  But Gov. Blanchard isn't overly optimistic.  And, as a former congressman himself, he isn't hopeful at all that Congress will stop mandating expensive new state programs.  "They know they're not going to be held accountable," he says.  A total of 561 Japanese companies entered bankruptcy proceedings in August, down 29% from a year earlier and the lowest total for the month of August in 17 years, the Teikoku Data Bank Ltd. said.  Outstanding debts of the failed companies fell 31% from a year earlier to 79.13 billion yen ($538.5 million), the lowest amount in 16 years for August, according to the private economic research company.  The research company said that it doesn't see bankruptcies turning back up from current low levels soon.  At a hearing in federal court last week, Atlanta criminal lawyer Edward Garland was skittish about defending Colombian drug suspect Eduardo Martinez Romero.  But his hesitancy didn't stem from any moral dilemma.  Mr. Garland was simply afraid that he wouldn't get paid.  The attorney told reporters outside the courtroom that he wouldn't commit himself to continue representing the extradited Colombian because, in cases where payment involves money tainted by drug trafficking, the government can seize a lawyer's fee.  "I'm not ready to take on any more pro bono work," Mr. Garland said.  As the Bush administration vows to step up drug prosecutions and as the Colombian government contemplates extraditing more suspected drug kingpins, the pool of experienced defense lawyers willing to defend narcotics traffickers is shrinking.  This attrition in the "white powder" bar, as it is known, stems largely from two decisions handed down by the U.S. Supreme Court in June.  In those 5-4 decisions, the high court ruled that federal law gives prosecutors broad authority to seize the assets of accused criminals, including funds used to pay lawyers' fees.  They confirmed prosecutors' power to seize assets as a weapon in the war on drugs.  Writing for the majority, Justice Byron White said that criminally tainted assets belong to the government, not the accused, even if such funds "are the only way that that defendant will be able to retain the attorney of his choice."  The fees involved can be huge.  Joel Hirschhorn, a flamboyant Miami lawyer who for two decades has defended dozens of drug traffickers, says, "No lawyer would take a big case for anything less than $250,000."  Other attorneys say the increasing scarcity of white powder lawyers is driving fees up.  Mr. Garland, who thus far is continuing to represent Mr. Martinez, has already felt the sting of fee forfeiture; he is involved in a pending dispute with federal prosecutors over fees paid to him in another drug case.  In that case, the government is trying to seize part of the value of a house, property that Mr. Garland says was turned over to him as payment from a client.  He says the government's power to seize legal fees "retards the willingness of good lawyers to take drug cases."  It's done far more than that.  Some of the best-known names in the white powder bar have left the business altogether.  Mr. Hirschhorn recently joined a big Miami law firm, Broad & Cassell, where he'll handle only civil litigation.  "This is my last drug trial," Mr. Hirschhorn proclaims during a break in court proceedings in Bridgeport, Conn., where he is defending an accused cocaine trafficker.  "I've lost three fees" totaling "in the low six figures," Mr. Hirschhorn laments.  "And I could see that the handwriting was on the wall."  Mr. Hirschhorn says he'll be happier -- and safer -- handling real-estate disputes.  He adds that at least six other noted criminal lawyers in Miami, where many high-profile drug lawyers are based, have contacted him about making similar career switches.  Robert Breier, a Miami lawyer who once specialized in the tax aspects of drug cases, says he now takes mostly civil tax cases and turns away any prospective clients where charges involve drug trafficking.  As Donald Bierman, a Miami lawyer who still represents drug defendants, puts it: "Lots of people are applying for local judgeships."  Miami's Neal Sonnett, president of the National Association of Criminal Defense Lawyers, a national group with some 20,000 members, argues that the dearth of defense lawyers willing to handle drug cases raises constitutional problems, impairs the ability of accused traffickers to get a fair trial and warps the attorney-client relationship.  He says defense lawyers now routinely require elaborate documentation from clients to prove that the source of their legal fees is untainted by drug profits.  They also question clients exhaustively before accepting cases to ensure that they can provide such documentation.  And defense lawyers negotiate with prosecutors to prevent fee-forfeiture proceedings before signing on to represent drug suspects.  "It's constantly on my mind when I talk to a new client," says Mr. Sonnett, who still accepts drug cases despite the fact that in a recent California case he had to battle for 18 months to hold on to his fee.  "I'm willing to be a guinea pig in this war."  According to Mr. Sonnett, prosecutors are far more likely to go after the fees of lawyers who fight the government's charges, rather than those whose clients plead guilty and then cooperate with prosecutors.  Thus, he argues, fee forfeiture produces an inherent attorney-client conflict that can undercut a lawyer's zealous advocacy for his client.  Actually, the chill in the white powder bar was being felt before the Supreme Court ruled.  Concern about the seizing of attorney fees grew after Congress passed the 1984 Comprehensive Crime Control Act.  The law expanded the government's power to go after assets of people convicted in narcotics cases by making all proceeds of the criminal enterprise, not just property used to carry out crimes, subject to forfeiture.  The Justice Department emphasizes that the government's fee-forfeiture power is used sparingly.  Prosecutors in the field must demonstrate to superiors in Washington that they have "reasonable grounds" to believe that a defense attorney had "actual knowledge" that his payment came from assets tainted by drug profits before any proceedings begin.  There have been fewer than 50 such cases, and no upsurge following the Supreme Court ruling, according to several department sources.  Some members of the white powder bar think that their colleagues who are fleeing the field are overreacting.  "I got into this business to make money and defend clients, and that's what I'm continuing to do," says Miami lawyer Irwin Lichter.  "I'm just being a lot more cautious."  USAir Group said August traffic rose 7.3% to 3.21 billion revenue passenger miles from 2.99 billion.  A revenue passenger mile is one paying passenger flown one mile.  Load factor, or the percentage of available seats occupied, rose to 66.9% from 65.7%.  In the first eight months this year, USAir's traffic rose 9% to 22.84 billion revenue passenger miles from 20.95 billion.  Load factor rose to 61.9% from 61.2%.  Bond Corp. Holdings Ltd. sold its 20.4% stake in Lonrho PLC to numerous institutions, losing about #50 million ($77.4 million) from the sale and ending its fruitless courtship of the British conglomerate.  The sale leaves embattled Australian entrepreneur Alan Bond with few assets remaining in Europe and eager to get rid of the rest.  Lonrho's successful repulsion of its single biggest shareholder leaves the mining, leisure and agriculture company less vulnerable to a takeover -- for the moment.  Bond Corp.'s disclosure of the Lonrho stake last October sparked an acrimonious clash between Mr. Bond and Lonrho Chief Executive R.W. Rowland.  Mr. Rowland launched a caustic campaign calling attention to Bond Corp.'s high debt levels.  Mr. Bond's empire of brewing, media, property and resources firms subsequently became caught in a cash bind.  Yesterday, Bond Corp. officials said they sold its 114.3 million Lonrho shares as part of the empire's overall restructuring.  The sale reaped about #312 million, according to a Bond Corp. spokesman in London.  But more than half of the proceeds will pay off lenders who financed the stake purchase.  A variety of U.K., U.S. and other foreign institutions bought the shares for 280 pence ($4.33) a share.  That compares with the 330-pence-a-share average price that Bond Corp. paid and wanted to receive for its stake.  Bond Corp. spent six months seeking to unload the shares at the higher price.  "Bond must have tried every known predator to try to get rid of these shares at a premium price," observed Paul Beaufrere, an analyst at London brokerage firm James Capel & Co.  The lack of takers suggests "no predator (for Lonrho) is willing to put his head above the parapet at this stage."  Lonrho's share price sagged on London's Stock Exchange yesterday, reflecting investors' lowered expectations of a takeover.  In late trading, the shares were off 11 pence at 294 pence.  Terry Robinson, a Lonrho director, said "we have no indications" that any of the estimated 50 institutions buying Bond Corp.'s holding have amassed a stake of 5% or more.  "Bond's aggression has failed to dent Tiny Rowland's defense," dissuading other would-be bidders, added Mr. Beaufrere, the analyst.  "But any company as asset-rich as this one is and whose chairman is as old as this one is has to be prey at some time."  Mr. Rowland, whose roughly 15% stake once again makes him Lonrho's biggest shareholder, turned 71 last November.  He doesn't plan to retire soon.  Bond Corp. put the Lonrho stake up for sale last March, saying it had hoped to explore "mutually beneficial" areas with Lonrho's board.  Bond Corp.'s exodus as a major shareholder could make Lonrho vulnerable someday in another way.  Control of Lonrho now "lies with institutions.  So, if somebody comes along with an attractive (bid) proposition, the institutions will be driven by consideration of value and price," said Robert Carpenter, an analyst at U.K. brokers Kitcat & Aitken.  "No company is bid proof."  Analysts figure a bidder would win over Lonrho shareholders with an offer of 500 pence a share.  Following the Lonrho disposal, Bond Corp. is expected to try to shed its 5.54% holding in Allied-Lyons PLC, a British drinks group, and its nearly 36% stake in British Satellite Broadcasting Ltd., a satellite-television consortium.  Mr. Bond sold a 4.4% stake in Allied-Lyons last May.  He has yet to pay the latest #27 million portion of his #153 million commitment to British Satellite.  "Virtually everything in the Bond empire is negotiable now," the Bond spokesman said.  "Because what he (Mr.  Bond) wants to do is get cash."  Japanese companies plan to spend 15% more on plants and equipment in the year ending next March 31, according to a newspaper survey.  The survey of 1,558 companies, conducted by the Nihon Keizai Shimbun, a financial daily, showed that more than 20% are experiencing equipment shortages.  The survey showed that many companies have revised their equipment investment plans upward, spending 5.2% -- or 18.639 trillion yen ($126.84 billion) -- more than they planned at the outset of the fiscal year.  Australia's index of manufacturing production rose 2.2% in the second quarter from the first quarter, and rose 8.9% from a year earlier, the Bureau of Statistics said.  The trend estimate, which removes many of the irregular influences to identify the longer-term trend, rose 0.7% in the latest quarter.  The growth in the trend estimate narrows from a revised 2% growth in the first quarter.  That rise was originally reported as 1%.  The trend estimate rose 7.2% from the second quarter of 1988.  The figures are adjusted for both seasonal factors and price changes.  Allegheny Ludlum Corp. said it plans a $16 million modernization and upgrading of a steel pickling line at its Vandergrift, Pa., plant.  The specialty steel maker said the equipment will be designed and installed by Production Machinery Corp. to process 50,000 pound, 48-inch wide stainless steel coils and is expected to be in operation in the 1990 fourth quarter.  Dotronix Inc. said its board authorized the purchase of as many as 250,000 shares, or 8%, of the company's common stock from time to time in the open market.  The maker of electronic video display monitors, which has about 3.2 million common shares outstanding, said the shares may be purchased over the next 24 months at prevailing market prices.  Dotronix said the shares would be made available for possible future employee stock option or bonus plans or other corporate purposes.  The Philippine budget deficit reached 7.49 billion pesos ($350 million) as of Aug. 22 this year, way below the 15.33 billion peso deficit projected for the same period.  Philippine Budget Undersecretary Benjamin Diokno told the National Economic Development Authority board the deficit was achieved through "a combination of excess revenues amounting to 1.48 billion pesos and lower government expenses."  The authority is the country's highest policy-making agency, with President Corazon Aquino as chairman.  Bureau of Internal Revenue collections from Jan. 1 to Aug. 22 totaled 51.86 billion pesos.  The higher revenue collections were traced to increased collections of ad valorem and tariff duties on petroleum and petroleum products.  Australian house and apartment construction starts in the quarter ended June 30 rose 3.1% to a seasonally adjusted 44,450 from a revised 43,120 in the quarter ended March 31, and rose 14.2% from 38,910 a year ago.  The Bureau of Statistics said the 3.1% rise compares with a 4.5% fall in the March quarter from the period ended Dec. 31.  The bureau said the number of starts has been rising for more than a year, except for a brief fall in the December quarter.  Boeing Co. said it agreed to pay $200,000 to settle seven civil cases brought by the Federal Aviation Administration in connection with the miswiring of fire-protection systems on its jetliners.  The fine is the biggest ever collected from Boeing and perhaps from any airplane maker.  In July, the FAA proposed a $200,000 penalty in one of the cases in which Boeing allegedly notified the agency months after it uncovered wiring problems on two aircraft.  Federal regulations require that defects be reported within 24 hours of their discovery.  But the FAA and Boeing worked out a deal in which six other cases related to miswiring were included as part of a comprehensive settlement.  The FAA said the agreement specifies a number of corrective actions and design changes to be made by Boeing "to ensure the miswiring conditions that are the subject of these cases will not be repeated."  The fire-extinguishing systems have never failed in service.  In addition, the FAA said, Boeing has agreed to implement written procedures "to ensure appropriate and timely reporting of all defects" that could hurt safety.  QUAKER OATS Co. raised it quarterly dividend to 35 cents a share from 30 cents a share, payable Oct. 14 to stock of record Sept. 22.  The Chicago-based food, pet-food and toy concern said the boost reflects its policy of increasing dividends at a rate that is "consistent with the growth in earnings and which takes into account the impact of inflation."  For the year ended June 30, Quaker had profit of $203 million, or $2.56 a share, on sales of $5.72 billion.  The earnings included a restructuring charge of $124.3 million.  BSN S.A. announced in Paris that its consolidated net profit rose to 1.413 billion francs ($210 million) in the first half, up 12% from the year-earlier total of 1.257 billion francs ($187 million).  The French food group said the gain was based on a 12% revenue increase to 23.2 billion francs from 20.7 billion in the first half of 1988.  BSN noted that the first-half results include an unspecified but "significant" non-recurring gain from the sale of its U.S. subcontracting operations in the biscuit sector.  It said this was partly offset by an unspecified one-time charge linked to the previously reported purchase of Nabisco biscuit operations.  Agency Rent-A-Car Inc. said Terry W. Holt, 35, was named president and Richard M. Ginsburg, 32, was named chief financial officer.  Mr. Holt, who joined the rental car company in 1977 as an office manager, had served as executive vice president since October 1988.  Mr. Ginsburg joined the company in 1984 as director of taxation and was later named vice president of corporate development.  Both men succeed Kenneth J. Lorek, who resigned as president and chief financial officer last month.  Mr. Lorek was the second Agency president to resign in less than a year.  Riedel Environmental Technologies Inc. and Sludge Management Inc. said their joint venture received a contract to design, build and manage a wastewater sludge treatment plant for the Municipality of Metropolitan Seattle, a government agency.  Portland, Ore.-based Riedel and Seattlebased Sludge valued the 10-year contract at as much as $190 million, including contract options.  The plant will cost $13 million to build, they said.  Peninsular & Oriental Steam Navigation Co. posted a 28% rise in first-half pretax profit to #169.3 million ($261.9 million) from #131.7 million.  The U.K. shipping and property group's results surpassed market expectations, which averaged #145 million, but P&O shed three pence to 205 pence in a weaker market on London's stock exchange.  P&O said the strongest performance was in its passenger shipping operations and service businesses.  However, the company said that earnings from its containers division were "not adequate" and that its Bovis Ltd. house-building subsidiary was hurt by a downturn in the U.K.  Profit after tax and minority interests, but before extraordinary items, rose 56% to #120.2 million from #77 million, while per-share earnings climbed to 28 pence from 18.1 pence.  P&O recommended an interim dividend of 12.5 pence a share, up 19% from 10.5 pence paid a year ago.  Sales climbed 31% to #1.91 billion from #1.46 billion.  Operating profit advanced 29% to #200.8 million from #155.6 million.  Herbert Stein's Aug. 23 editorial-page essay, "Common Sense on Capital Gains," perceptively observes that capital-gains tax reform should not be judged on the basis of whether rich people or poor people get more capital gains -- that is, on vertical-equity grounds.  Unhappily, he goes on to assert, much less perceptively, that horizontal equity is the appropriate standard; cutting the capital-gains tax rate, he claims, ". . . would leave some people paying less tax than other people with the same income."  He concludes, incorrectly, I believe, that the only valid basis for capital-gains tax reform is to offset the effect of inflation in raising the tax rate on real gains above the statutory rate.  Mr. Stein's error lies in identifying capital gains as income with the same attributes, for tax purposes, as personal compensation (i.e., the earnings of a basketball player).  A capital gain, however, is the increase in the market value of an asset; this increase is the capitalization of an anticipated increase in the income (or other rewards) that the asset will produce.  In the general case, the asset was purchased with after-tax income, the income it produces is taxed as it materializes, and/or the increase in the income it is expected to produce -- accounting for the increase in its market value -- also will be taxed as it is realized.  Taxing the capital gain that is realized when the asset is sold amounts to adding a layer of income tax on the same income.  Nothing of the sort occurs in the case of the basketball player's salary.  The real reason to reduce, if not eliminate, the income tax on capital gains is to moderate this excessive, differentially heavy tax burden.  This calls for reducing the statutory rate at which capital gains are taxed; to make sure this reduced rate is not subsequently hiked back up by inflation, indexing the bases of capital assets is also called for.  Contrary to Mr. Stein's assertion, indexing is neither the sole nor primary reform called for; indexing is better seen as a complement to rate reduction, useful insofar as monetary policy fails its responsibility to prevent inflation.  Norman B. Ture  President  Institute for Research on the Economics of Taxation Washington  ---  It's too bad Mr. Stein's otherwise perceptive analysis of the capital-gains debate got off to such a bad start.  He ruins a good article with his misguided insistence that whether rich people would be the primary beneficiaries of a capital-gains rate cut is "one big irrelevancy."  He is right to suggest that in an ideal world of equity we would make two separate judgments.  First, we would decide whether capital income should be taxed at higher rates than labor income; then we would decide whether rich people should be taxed at higher rates than poor people.  The capital-gains debate, however, does not take place in such an ideal world.  The best "equitable" argument for a capital-gains break does not contend that capital gains are inherently nobler than labor income or interest income.  Rather, the argument asserts that we are making a mistake when we tax inflationary gains and that a general capital-gains break would correct that mistake (not in each case, but on average).  Mr. Stein responds that the mistaken taxation of inflationary gains is already corrected through tax deferral and the date-of-death basis adjustment (not in each case, but on average).  In such a squabble about second-best and third-best worlds, it is equally legitimate to suggest that the taxation of inflationary gains is already taken care of through our astonishingly nonprogressive rate structure (not in each case, but on average).  Even more important, most of the arguments for the capital-gains break are about instrumental policy, not equity.  They say things such as, "A capital gains cut will increase national savings," or "It will raise revenues in the short term."  It is fine to dispute such arguments on their own terms as Mr. Stein does.  But it is equally legitimate to respond, "Those benefits are not worth the distributional costs."  In the domain of instrumental policy there is usually more than one way to skin a cat.  Even if a capital-gains cut would increase savings, so might increasing taxes on certain forms of consumption.  Even if a capital-gains cut would raise revenues in the short term, so might taxing accrued capital appreciation at death.  In choosing among such alternatives, there is nothing wrong with considering their comparative effects on the distribution of wealth.  Indeed, it would be wrong not to.  Jeffrey S. Lehman  Assistant Professor of Law  University of Michigan Law School  Ann Arbor, Mich.  One of the most prosperous stock mutual funds is turning into a heavy seller of individual stocks just as its star manager, Michael Price, prepares to begin dabbling in futures and options.  The $3.5 billion Mutual Shares Corp. -- along with its sister funds, Mutual Qualified and Mutual Beacon -- disclosed plans to expand their trading horizons in proxy material filed with federal regulators yesterday.  The changes can't come soon enough for Mr. Price, who said yesterday that he was "more scared this afternoon than in awhile" about the performance of the stock market.  The major reason he's worried is the large amount of takeovers driven by high-yield junk-bond financing.  Noting the recent fragility of the weaker junk bonds, he says: "You can't have a bear junk market and a bull stock market.  Something's got to give."  Shareholders will vote on the proposal at a special meeting Nov. 17.  If it is approved, Mr. Price would have wide flexibility in hedging his portfolio of merger stocks and so-called distressed stocks, including some companies in bankruptcy proceedings.  "We're trying to pick up a few extra bucks," says Mr. Price, whose funds have racked up some of the best track records in the industry.  "It's just another way to protect ourselves."  Meantime, he's fast paring down on some of his more speculative positions.  He has pulled out of Avon Products Inc., Gillette Co., Georgia-Pacific Corp., Mead Corp. and Pinnacle West Capital Corp., among others.  He cut the funds' UAL Corp. position by more than one-third, and sold more yesterday.  The funds' cash position, currently more than 25% of assets, will go still higher, he says.  "I remember October 1987, baby, and it wasn't fun," Mr. Price says.  The current market, he adds, "doesn't pass my smell test."  What does pass muster are telephone and cellular companies, he says.  The group, which includes favorites such as BellSouth Corp., Nynex Corp. and Commonwealth Telephone, "is one of the cheapest in the market."  Because of its large cash hoard, the flagship Mutual Shares Fund has lagged the market this year, rising 18.8% through last Thursday, according to Lipper Analytical Services Inc.  But it remains one of the best long-term performing funds around: Through the 10 years ended June 30, the fund surged 522.9%, outstripping the 381% gain in the Standard & Poor's-500 index.  Mr. Price closed two of his funds -- Mutual Shares and Mutual Qualified -- to new accounts June 1, in part because he was finding fewer bargains around.  If the hedging proposal is approved, Mr. Price said he would use the following strategies, among others: Buy put options on some of the funds' underlying stocks, which would give him the right to sell the stock at a certain price by a future date.  Or he would write, or sell, call options on some stocks in his portfolios, which would generate premiums and help hedge against any declines in the underlying stocks.  He also would hedge overseas holdings by buying currency futures.  Also up for a shareholder vote is a proposal to raise the funds' annual management costs to 0.6% of average daily assets from 0.5%.  The change still would leave management costs far below those of most funds, many of which charge more than 1% of assets.  Units of Manufacturers Hanover Corp. and Equitable Life Assurance Society of the U.S. and an affiliate of Apollo Partners Ltd. said they formed a venture that will invest in communications companies.  Terrence A. Elkes, a managing director of Apollo Radio Ltd., said the companies "will provide acquisition financing sufficient to purchase several hundred million dollars in media properties."  Apollo Partners is a closely held company formed by Mr. Elkes, the former chief executive officer of Viacom International Inc. and two other former Viacom executives.  DRG PLC, a London-based stationery and packaging concern said net income for the first half of 1989 rose nearly 59% to #32.5 million ($21 million), or 30.2 pence (19.5 cents) a share, from the year-earlier #20.5 million pounds, or 19.4 pence.  The company, which is the focus of a possible cash bid by Bermuda-registered Pembridge Associates Ltd., attributed the gain to growth overseas and sales of surplus real estate.  DRG said it is increasing its interim dividend 32%, to 6.6 pence a share.  The half-year results were below some market forecasts, but the dividend was higher than the 6.2 pence forecast.  Earlier this week, Pembridge Associates said it would issue a cash bid for DRG at or below 604 pence, its close last Friday in London.  DRG has rejected any notion of talks with Pembridge, a closely held investment concern reputedly controlled by British financier Roland Franklin.  DRG didn't comment yesterday on the Pembridge action.  Hertel AG will sell 49% of its common shares in a private placement for 146 million marks ($73.4 million).  The majority shareholders of the West German tool maker, Guenther and Karl Hertel, plan to sell 250,000 common shares at 585 marks each between yesterday and Monday to institutional investors with a long-term orientation, Bayerische Vereinsbank AG, one of the two lead managers said.  The other lead manager is CSFB-Effectenbank AG, the West German unit of Credit Suisse First Boston.  The common shares will also begin trading on several West German stock exchanges.  Currently, only Hertel's non-voting preferred shares are publicly traded.  In June, Hertel issued 200,000 common and preferred shares in a one-for-four rights issue to raise 56 million marks.  Hertel preferred shares closed at 510 marks on the Frankfurt Stock Exchange.  Regarding your Aug. 18 story "Movie Audiences Panning Shopworn TV Commericals": I could not believe the double talk engaged in by the defender/purveyors of movie-theater commercials.  I guess some companies will say black is white if there's a buck at stake, but earning $20 per thousand viewers is only two cents a ticket.  Come on now, theater owners -- if I'm willing to pay $7.50 to see "Batman," I'm willing to pay $7.52 to see it without commercials.  If you want a quick buck, put your popcorn profits into junk bonds.  Movie theaters are for movies.  Dan Kelly  Los Angeles  Nat Hentoff is mixing up his Charlie Barnet chronology ("Jazz: Lambert, Hendricks & Ross Revisited," Leisure & Arts, Aug. 29).  The trumpeter on "Charleston Alley" is not Peanuts Holland, who waited more than a year after this record before joining the band.  The first trumpet solo is by Bobby Burnet, the second by Bernie Privin.  Bernie himself told me, liner notes notwithstanding.  Neil McCaffrey  Harrison, N.Y.  If the states' departments of Weights and Measures were to measure the gallon output of a gasoline pump delivering 100% gasoline as 0.95 gallon, it would be shut down, and probably there would be penalties to pay.  But if instead the proprietor dilutes the energy of gasoline with 10% alcohol, the unwary consumer still gets 0.95 gallon of energy even when the gauge says one gallon, and with everyone winking knowingly, the proprietor is given the seal of approval.  If we are to consider "alternative fuels," as your Aug. 17 article did, we need also to consider honest marketing.  When there was only one product, gasoline, a simple volumetric measurement was satisfactory.  But if there is to be a range of products, then we need a common denominator for their sale so the public is not hoodwinked.  Some equally priced products deliver 5% less energy, roughly one mile-per-gallon less.  Richard G. Devaney  Kingsport, Tenn.  In response to your Aug. 15 editorial "Uncle's Sugar": According to the July 2 Miami Herald, there are 43,000 workers and farmers employed in the Florida cane-sugar and support industries alone.  Why is it that your writers always refer to the 11,400 U.S. farmers, as though they were the only ones involved?  What about the tens of thousands of tractor drivers, truck drivers, welders, mechanics and electricians from Florida to California and Hawaii, and from Montana to Texas?  And what about the chemists, engineers, accountants, agronomists, computer operators and secretaries whom every sugar company employs?  ". . . sugar-import quotas . . . fleece the average American family of four to the tune of $100 a year." (That comes to $25 a person.)  Total per-capita consumption of all sugar in the U.S. is just over 110 pounds a year.  The difference between the world market price at 14 cents a pound (two weeks ago) and the U.S. price at 24 cents is 10 cents a pound.  And 110 pounds, at 10 cents a pound, is $11 a member, or $44 per family of four, not $100.  Eleven dollars a year is the cost to each of us so that the sugar industry can pay salaries and wages that begin with our legal minimum of almost $4 an hour, as against $4.50 a day, which is the average that foreign producers pay their workers.  Here is an interesting thought.  Let us eliminate sugar quotas altogether, and simply mandate that to enjoy the privilege of competing with U.S. workers in their home market, all foreign producers must pay a minimum wage equal to ours.  Just think what that tenfold increase in purchasing power would do for world trade.  Eldridge M. Hine Jr.  Coral Gables, Fla.  Fluor Corp. said it named Leslie G. McCraw chief executive officer and vice chairman effective Jan. 1, 1990.  The move was expected, and symbolically completes a massive restructuring during which the company divested several non-core businesses and diversified its engineering and construction operations.  In the position of chief executive, the 54-year-old Mr. McCraw succeeds David S. Tappan Jr., 67, who became chairman and chief executive in 1984 after the death of J. Robert Fluor.  Mr. Tappan, who will continue as chairman until Dec. 31, 1990, reached mandatory retirement age in 1987 but was asked by the board to stay on until the restructuring is completed.  Mr. Tappan said last March that Mr. McCraw was his likely successor.  Mr. McCraw has been president of Fluor since January 1988, and prior to that was president and chief executive officer of Fluor Daniel Inc., the company's engineering and construction unit.  Vincent L. Kontny, 52, who was and will remain president and chief operating officer of Fluor Daniel, succeeds Mr. McCraw as president of the parent.  After several years of losses, Fluor began selling natural resource assets, including its gold operations, using proceeds to pay down debt to about $60 million from about $500 million in 1986.  The company still has investments in coal and lead.  But Mr. McCraw said in an interview that the company had received inquiries about selling the lead interests, but that the coal interests are viewed differently because they represent "synergistic opportunities" with its construction projects.  Further, the coal interests are concentrated in low-sulphur coal, a business that could benefit from President Bush's acid rain program, he added.  As a result of the restructuring, Fluor cut the percentage of its engineering and construction projects for the oil industry to about 25% from 85% to 90% 10 years ago, Mr. McCraw said.  Now the majority of projects are for a variety of sectors, including industrial, pulp and paper, power, government, electronics, food, consumer products and others, he said.  "I don't see any fundamental shifts in our strategy," Mr. McCraw said, adding, "We've traditionally had a strong presence in international markets in the hydrocarbon area.  Now our challenge is to expand this reputation and diversify these opportunities."  Fluor posted net income of $56.4 million for the fiscal year ended last Oct. 31.  Terex Corp. said it plans to lay off a total of about 500 people at three of its Fruehauf Trailer Operations unit plants, acquired earlier this year.  The heavy-equipment concern said the layoffs are planned in Fruehauf's plants in Fort Worth, Texas, and in Uniontown and Harrisburg, Pa.  Before it was acquired, analysts criticized Fruehauf for being too slow to reduce operational costs to survive in an increasingly competitive truck-trailer market.  Peter F. Secchia, the new ambassador to Italy whom you profiled on Aug. 17, joins the dreary progression of amateur ambassadors ill-equipped to serve the administration or the country.  This practice of rewarding party bagmen, organizers or the friends of same is totally reprehensible.  It makes our country a laughing stock in world capitals, discredits our professional diplomats abroad, and ignores the necessity of experienced and professional pursuit of American interests throughout the world.  No one can put a price tag on this inexcusable and lucrative on-the-job training for the party faithful, but the leadership of a major embassy such as Rome is too vital a post to entrust to a neophyte, no matter how sincerely he asserts he ". . . will study hard . . ." and ". . . will be open and candid and honest."  Would the Bush administration or any other White House team consider Mr. Secchia competent to captain an aircraft carrier or command an army division?  Certainly not.  Then why send an unqualified party supporter to direct the listening post upon which the Army and Navy may depend for early warning.  Does Mr. Secchia understand that an embassy is a vital link in the country's security system?  Is this a job to which we want to send a man "to learn the ropes"?  Not when we have qualified professionals.  The Foreign Service has dozens of officers with experience and language skills who could head the team at Rome, serve the Bush administration and the country well, and bring to bear the judgment, tact and insight that leading a major embassy requires.  John R.G. Vought  St. George, Utah  British Aerospace PLC reported a 48% surge in interim pretax profit, thanks to what the company said was its expanded range of business activities.  But the pretax figure included a one-time exceptional gain of #34 million ($52.6 million) after the partial sale of Rover Group's shareholding in truck maker DAF. British Aerospace bought Rover Group from the British government in July 1988.  For the six months ended June 30, profit before tax amounted to #141 million, up from #95 million.  Market forecasts had ranged between #110 million and #120 million, which excluded the exceptional item.  British Aerospace said more than half its sales now come from products that weren't included within its product portfolio as little as two years ago.  Total sales for the half year were #3.98 billion compared with #1.86 billion a year ago.  The Federal Deposit Insurance Corp. filed an $847 million claim against MCorp, alleging that the holding company improperly siphoned money from its banks before they failed.  The claim, made in federal bankruptcy court in Houston, signals the latest round in the fight over the remains of the once-huge holding company, which lost 20 of its 25 banks to regulators in March.  MCorp subsequently filed for protection from creditors under Chapter 11 of the U.S. Bankruptcy Code and is currently trying to work out a plan to pay its debts.  In its most recent filing in the bankruptcy court, MCorp and two subsidiaries listed net liabilities of $595 million, not counting the FDIC's claims.  The companies listed total assets, after adjustments for double-counting and intercompany debt, of $564 million.  Those assets include $70 million that MCorp claims the FDIC owes it for allegedly manufacturing the insolvency of 12 healthy banks.  A federal judge in Dallas recently indicated that he is likely to support MCorp in a related lawsuit against the regulatory agency.  In its bankruptcy-court filing, the FDIC relies on an unusual interpretation of the U.S. tax laws to demand the return of $316.5 million from MCorp.  In essence, the regulatory agency charges that healthy banks in the holding company reduced their tax bill by utilizing tax-loss carry-forwards generated by unprofitable affiliate banks that later failed.  The FDIC is demanding the return of those and other benefits.  The FDIC further alleges that MCorp overcharged its member banks for data processing services and extracted excessive dividends from banks that subsequently failed.  Regulators also fault the holding company for allegedly taking unfair advantage of the 20 banks when it bought their credit-card operations.  Notably absent from its claims was any reliance on the so-called source of strength doctrine, a controversial and little-used power asserted by regulators to force a holding company to shore up failing affiliate banks.  Before the bank failures, MCorp officials had fiercely resisted pumping any holding company assets into unhealthy units.  "It's a strong positive development," said one bondholder.  "That was the single largest threat to MCorp creditors' claims."  An MCorp spokesman said the company is still studying the FDIC claims and couldn't comment on specifics.  But he added that, "based on a preliminary assessment, the company believes the claims filed by the FDIC far exceed amounts which can be justified or substantiated."  Separately, several former MCorp officials have embarked on a controversial quest to have the bankruptcy court forgive several million dollars in personal loans from the company.  Citing a provision of the loan agreement that would allow forgiveness in the event of a change in control, the former officers hired a Phoenix, Ariz., attorney to press their case in bankruptcy court.  The former officials, including James Gardner, a former group chairman, now work for Banc One Corp., the Columbus, Ohio, banking concern that took over MCorp's failed banks.  The amount owed by the former officers wasn't immediately available, although the holding company lent a total of $8.8 million to several top officials as part of an executive benefit program.  Some politicians complain that the former employees should be forced to repay the loans, particularly in light of the enormous $2 billion cost to the FDIC of bailing out the failed banks.  But several MCorp creditors said they don't plan to contest the effort.  "We think it's the FDIC that's trying to take advantage of creditors, not management," said James Potter, an analyst for Craig-Hallum Inc., Minneapolis, who is advising some MCorp bondholders.  A federal appeals court ruled that Go-Video Inc. has jurisdiction to proceed with its $4.5 billion antitrust suit in federal court in Phoenix against a group of Japanese manufacturers of videocassette recorders.  The ruling could make it easier for U.S. companies in certain states to sue foreign companies on antitrust grounds, and attorneys say the issue may wind up at the U.S. Supreme Court.  The decision by the Ninth Circuit Court of Appeals means the antitrust case could go to trial next year, attorneys said.  Go-Video is beginning to manufacture, through Samsung Electronics Co. of South Korea, a dual-deck videocassette recorder that would allow viewers to duplicate tapes or play one while recording another.  A "very limited" supply with a suggested price of $995 will be in stores by Christmas, with more to follow in 1990, Go-Video Chairman R. Terren Dunlap said.  The suit contends Japanese manufacturers conspired to prevent the marketing of the device in the U.S.  In response, the defendants had claimed the case couldn't be tried in Arizona because the companies didn't do sufficient business there.  The antitrust suit names Matsushita Electric Industrial Co., Sony Corp., JVC/Victor Co. of Japan, Sharp Electronics Corp., Sanyo Electric and NEC Corp.  Several defendants have settled, including Samsung, and a number of movie studios also named in the suit were dropped when Go-Video agreed to put an anti-copying device on the machine to prevent duplication of recorded or purchased tapes.  New York attorney Paul Victor of Weil, Gotshal and Manges, representing Victor and Matsushita, said attorneys were studying the decision and "one option" was to appeal to the U.S. Supreme Court.  "Sooner or later the Supreme Court is going to have to address this (general) issue," Mr. Victor said.  "The moving finger writes and, having writ, says to hell with it and moves on." -- Modern saying of American journalism  According to a recent poll, two-thirds of the American public believes drugs are the most important problem facing the U.S.  Nine months ago about 15% did, so what accounts for the vast shift in perception?  Neither the addiction rate nor drug-related crime has soared as dramatically.  Answer: The new president decided to break with his predecessor and make the war against drugs the focal point of his administration.  He did so against the backdrop of one lead-pipe cinch.  The mass media in America have an overwhelming tendency to jump up and down and bark in concert whenever the White House -- any White House -- snaps its fingers.  So what, you might ask?  So nothing, except that since the signals tend to change so frequently, and with so little readily discernible connection to objective reality, it makes for a badly confused public.  So nothing, except that it demonstrates how little substance lies at the heart of the media's claim to be independent watchdogs of governmental performance.  Events regularly prove that when it comes to news judgment, the media find it more agreeable to move in concert with the orchestrations of others than to decide individually what is really important -- or even real.  And so, for almost two months, there has been a steadily coalescing media consensus that the drug story is the world's most important.  That may or may not be well-founded, but it is beyond doubt that the critical mass of consensus was the result of skillful media manipulation.  Last week, we had the media equivalent of a nuclear explosion.  Speeches, interviews, specials, cover stories, enterprise features and airtime beyond belief were devoted to the issue, to the virtual exclusion of all else.  The president and his drug czar, William Bennett, had reason to be pleased.  The media should have been ashamed.  But what's new about the press playing the role of uncritical hype-merchant and cheerleader?  Nothing.  We long ago gave up control of that famous spotlight of ours.  It moves, most of the time, in response to pulls, tugs and pressure far distant from the boardrooms and newsrooms of our vast media conglomerates.  That is bad enough -- and the exact opposite of the notion so bitterly advanced by present and former government officials that the media set the agenda today.  What is worse is that journalism in general, and television in particular, has little stomach for staying with any story for very long, except when constantly prodded.  Today's sensation is tomorrow's dead fish.  The "News From Nowhere" syndrome once typical of foreign coverage is now commonplace in domestic reportage as well.  Look quickly, because those images and words flashing by will soon be forgotten with the rest.  Sustained coverage is a textbook phrase that has rare connection with journalistic practice.  For the most part, the epochal receives coverage no less ephemeral than does the trivial.  Consider a partial list of stories and issues that have come and gone (and sometimes come and gone again) over the past 12 months:  The "hostage crisis" (in quotation marks to distinguish it from past hostage crises); the Beijing spring of democracy, and its brutally efficient repression; the embarrassing refusal of the communist regime in Afghanistan to collapse on cue, repeated backgrounder assertions notwithstanding; the tenacious longevity of that former Public Enemy Number One, Manuel Noriega (wasn't it only yesterday that his fate was the world's most important story?); ethics in government (ditto); flag burning, public outrage and political posturing; Iran after the death of Khomeini and the triumph of the "moderates"; the anti-communist crusade for Western civilization in Nicaragua; the Valdez spill, the despoliation of the environment in general and the remedies just on the horizon; trash TV and trashy TV evangelists.  If it weren't for the easy news pegs provided by anniversaries, most of those stories would be as lost to public memory and comprehension as stories yet to come.  Covering the tedious reality of the world around us, rather than the topical (usually contrived) drama of the day, is not a high-priority item.  Remember the "educational crisis" wave of coverage?  The crisis is still with us; the coverage is not.  That was yesterday, today is today, and today's big news is the drug war.  The president says so, so television says so, newspapers and magazines say so and the public says so.  If words and images could win the drug war, it would all be over.  They can't, however, and soon Congress, state legislatures, city councils and lawmen of all kinds will be back in the trenches, measuring out progress, if any, in inches.  It won't be a very dramatic story.  It won't produce overnight victory or even very many clear battlefield successes, except of the most superficial sort.  At a given point, the president's advisers will tell him the obvious: It's time to detach his personal prestige from the success or failure of a thousand local engagements.  And suddenly, almost miraculously, the media will begin to look elsewhere, even though the only story that means anything will be sitting there begging for coverage.  The drug war won't be news.  But don't worry, There'll be a new war, a new number one problem, to take its place.  There always is.  ---  Mr. Carter is a political commentator who heads a television production firm.  The Transportation Department, saying it is "near the end" of its review of the recent leveraged buy-out of Northwest Airlines parent NWA Inc., has asked the company's new owners to provide extensive additional financial information by noon today.  The department, in a three-page letter to Los Angeles investor Alfred Checchi, leader of the group that purchased NWA for $3.65 billion, also requested a meeting for tomorrow afternoon with representatives of the investor group to discuss various issues.  Mr. Checchi was traveling and couldn't be reached for comment.  Department officials said Transportation Secretary Samuel Skinner will be out of town tomorrow and won't attend the meeting.  However, Mr. Skinner wants to wrap up the review of the Checchi transaction quickly, perhaps by next week.  "We're trying to accelerate this," said one official.  "The market is increasingly nervous on this, and we owe Alfred Checchi closure."  The department is asking the Checchi group to submit, in the words of a department official, "bushels" of new information, including the business and financial plan used by the group in negotiating with its lenders and a cash-flow projection for 1989.  According to the department's letter, the Checchi group is projecting a $363.3 million operating profit for this year.  The department also is seeking details on the group's contingency plans, including the possible sale of assets, in the event projected traffic doesn't materialize because of a recession or other reasons.  Mr. Checchi bought NWA with the help of two foreign companies -- Elders IXL Ltd. of Australia and KLM Royal Dutch Airlines -- which contributed $480 million out of $700 million in equity financing.  The companies' combined voting interest is under 20% because $400 million of the two firms' stake is in preferred stock.  Federal law prohibits foreign airlines from owning more than 25% of any U.S. airline.  The department is reviewing the Checchi transaction to determine whether the high debt load and other factors will undermine NWA's fitness to run an airline.  The department is scrutinizing, among other things, whether the debt level will affect Northwest's maintenance and safety programs.  In recent weeks, Mr. Skinner and other department officials have voiced concern about the potentially negative impact of leveraged buy-outs and foreign ownership on the domestic airline industry, and have vowed to take action if necessary.  Referring to the Northwest buy-out, Patrick Murphy, deputy assistant secretary for policy and program development, told an airport operators' conference Monday, "The department view is that we've retained the right to intervene in that deal, even now," if it's justified.  The department's handling of the NWA purchase could have broad implications for the rest of the airline industry.  A pilot-management group at UAL Inc.'s United Airlines, for example, has bid $6.75 billion for that airline, with British Airways PLC a major participant in the transaction.  Fender Mercies?  (Pre-faded blue jeans now available with ready-made holes to look trendy." -- News item)  Now that jeans are being sold  With pre-cut holes and rents,  We may soon expect new cars for sale  With ready-made scratches and dents.  -- George O. Ludcke.  ---  Uncle Sum  I try each month to save some dough  For taxes, which are heavy.  Just like the song of long ago --  I'm working on the levy.  -- Dick Emmons.  ---  Second Worst  Early retirement  Barely beats firement.  -- Ward Winslow.  In most circles, mention of the KGB calls to mind an army of doughy, neckless men who wear rectangular suits and earn their livings tailing foreigners, torturing dissidents and encouraging children to rat on their parents.  But the U.S.S.R.'s Committee for State Security is in fact a chummy college of career Care Bears who, while sharing an interest in law and order, write poetry, savor good food and harbor a deep concern for all Soviet people.  That, at least, is the official view as portrayed in a new 55-minute film called "The KGB Today," which was shown for the first time yesterday at the Foreign Ministry Press Center to a roomful of audibly skeptical Western journalists.  Made by the Novosti press agency, the documentary marks the high point in a recent campaign by the KGB to present itself to the world in a more flattering light.  "I want to express profound gratitude to the film crew," said Vladimir Kryuchkov, head of the KGB, in a brief filmed interview shown after the main attraction.  "Their attitude to our organization is very positive.  We are trying to create an objective image of our organization both at home and abroad.  This film is a very important first step in this direction."  Armed with such a hearty endorsement, Novosti, which itself is widely believed to have links to the KGB, is now planning to market the film in the West.  But judging by the disbelieving laughter that greeted parts of the first screening -- and the fact that Novosti hopes to get as much as $100,000 a copy -- it probably isn't destined to become the next "Batman."  For the first time, cameras were allowed behind the thick yellow walls of Lubyanka, the fortresslike KGB headquarters that overlooks the Kremlin, and into Lefortovo prison, where hundreds of often-innocent people have been detained, tortured and killed during seven decades of Soviet rule.  "We didn't want to present the KGB in rosy or in black colors," explains Yelena Kovolyova, who directed the film.  Ms. Kovolyova says she conducted an informal public-opinion poll along the Arbat, a busy pedestrian street here.  "Actually, the film crew was surprised by the attitude of people to the KGB," she says.  "We found only positive things."  For all its professed candor, the film glosses over the bloody role of the NKVD, the KGB's Stalin-era predecessor, portraying that organization as a victim of the purges rather than as their main perpetrator.  And the film makes no mention of the KGB's ferocious handling of the nation's dissidents in the 1960s, '70s and early '80s.  "When dealing with dissidents, everything was done according to the laws we had then," Col. Igor Prelin, a dapper KGB man now responsible for public relations, told a news conference after the screening.  "The KGB abided by the letter and the spirit of the law."  Col. Prelin, a bearded 27-year veteran of the service who bears a fleeting resemblance to Sean Connery in his James Bond days, is one of several officials interviewed in the film.  To illustrate the KGB's new willingness to cooperate with the West, he is shown in one scene seated on a park bench in Paris, talking amiably to Paul Payolle, a former chief of French intelligence.  But the climax of Col. Prelin's film debut is when he talks about his hobby.  "I wrote some verse -- I wouldn't call them poems, for that's too high a word," he warns before reciting a sample:  "We wage a war with no rules:  A snowstorm with no end --  We share a bottle with a foe,  Or get a bullet from a friend."  Another participant is Viktor Kastabelo, a 30ish KGB captain and physical-training teacher at the KGB Higher School, where students spend five years studying the agency's equivalent of the three Rs: "humanities, languages, law and criminology."  "I'm a normal guy," says a track-suited Mr. Kastabelo as the camera pans around a roomful of trainees wrestling with gun-wielding opponents.  "I have a family, a wife and daughter.  I get on OK with people, and I think I'm kind."  With an eye on potential Western interest, the film devotes a lot of its time to foreigners.  It gives a glowing assessment of the work of British master spy Kim Philby, who defected to the Soviet Union in 1963 and died last year.  Before showing Mr. Philby lying in his coffin at the cemetery, the camera dwells on the numerous medals he had been awarded, each one held up for viewing by a KGB guard.  The scene paints Mr. Philby as an example to Westerners who would betray their country in exchange for a luxurious apartment and a funeral with full honors.  The man believed by the West to be Mr. Philby's Soviet controller, Yuri Modin, is filmed saying, "Our friendship . . . was based on our common cause.  We were loyal to each other; his life depended on me, and mine on him."  Mr. Modin, now an elderly man with a plume of white hair and a small white beard, turned up as well at the news conference.  Afterward, he hinted that there was indeed another undetected Soviet spy working in British intelligence, the so-called Fifth Man, whose existence has long been a subject of feverish debate in Britain.  The film also shows how the KGB caught an alleged Central Intelligence Agency operative named Pavlov, a Soviet citizen it claimed was recruited by U.S. intelligence while working abroad.  One scene, apparently a re-enactment ("Sunday morning, Sept. 11," the voice-over begins in best Joe Friday style), has KGB officers leaping from behind bushes to capture the wife of the former U.S. vice-consul in Leningrad as she leaves a package for Pavlov at an agreed-upon location.  The narrator later asserts that the KGB has uncovered about 30 foreign spies in the past three years.  A spokesman for the CIA says that the agency has no comment on the subject of Pavlov.  For West German consumption, the film includes some brief shots of Matthias Rust, the daredevil West German teenager who landed his plane in Red Square.  Interviewed in Lefortovo, Mr. Rust, who has since been released, shows off the small cell he shared with another prisoner.  The narrator emphasizes that "people under investigation are given three free meals a day and have access to medical aid."  Asked if he was dissatisfied with prison conditions, Mr. Rust replied: "I have no complaints, not in this respect."  Then it's off to the prison kitchens.  There, Col. Prelin samples a cooking pot full of steaming barley porridge.  "How do you manage to cook it that well?" he asks the beaming cook.  "I'll tell you one thing: My wife cannot do it right.  I have a taste for pearl barley, back from my army days.  Can I have some more?"  With the stock market drifting lower over the past week, investors have been pouring their cash into money market mutual funds.  Assets of the 389 taxable money funds tracked by Donoghue's Money Fund Report soared $3.6 billion in the week ended Tuesday.  The huge jump, which followed a net gain of only $154 million in the two previous weeks, took money fund assets to a record $339.6 billion, the Holliston, Mass., newsletter said.  At the same time, however, there has been little change in money fund yields.  The average seven-day compound annual yield crept up to 8.61% from 8.58% in the week ended Tuesday.  But the average 30-day compound yield -- which smooths out short-term yield hiccups -- slipped to 8.63% from 8.65%.  Money fund yields have generally been declining since April and now stand at about their lowest levels this year.  But compared with those on competing investments such as U.S. Treasury bills and certificates of deposit, the yields are still attractive to many investors.  Six-month T-bills were sold Monday with a yield of 8.06%, down a quarter of a percentage point from the previous week's auction.  Meanwhile, the national average six-month yield on CDs of less than $55,000 fell 1/100th of a percentage point to 8% in the week ended Tuesday, according to Banxquote Money Markets, a New York-based information service.  But the "relative attractiveness" of fund yields compared with those on other investments wasn't the only reason for the big surge in fund assets, said Walter Frank, chief economist of Donoghue's.  "I can't help but believe the stock market had something to do with it," he said.  Mr. Frank also said Donoghue's began tracking two additional funds this week.  "Presumably some new money was brought in," he said, but it wasn't a major factor.  The average maturity of investments held in money fund portfolios declined one day to 36 days.  Average money-fund maturities are considered an indication of which way fund managers expect interest rates to go.  Shorter maturities are seen as a sign that higher rates are expected, because they give fund managers more freedom to move quickly to take advantage of rising rates.  In contrast, longer maturities are seen as an indicator of declining rates, as they permit fund managers to lock in current yields for a longer time.  The longest average fund maturity so far this year was 42 days, reached in August.  In the week ended Tuesday, money funds' average seven-day simple yield rose to 8.27% annually from 8.24%, while the 30-day simple yield fell to 8.28% from 8.30%.  Michael E. Faherty and Robert Stein were named directors of this maker of computer-aided communications systems, expanding the board to five members.  Mr. Faherty is president of Mico Inc., a Dallas consulting company.  Mr. Stein is president and chief executive officer of Ekco Group Inc., a Nashua, N.H., maker of houseware products.  Clark A. Johnson, 58 years old, was named to the board of this operator of retail food and drug stores, increasing the board to 14 directors.  Mr. Johnson is chairman and chief executive officer of Pier 1 Imports Inc., a Fort Worth, Texas, retail chain.  The NFL's Raiders occasionally make money playing football.  But mostly they make a fortune just playing the system.  In 1983, a federal court awarded the team $33 million in antitrust damages because the National Football League had "conspired" to keep the Raiders from moving to Los Angeles, after the judge instructed the jury to consider the NFL as 28 competing firms.  Sure enough, the jury quickly decided that the League was indeed in league.  There is, though, a real monopoly problem involving NFL franchises: Because there are many more municipal stadiums than football (or baseball or basketball) clubs, cities desiring Major League Status must sell the taxpayer's barn for a shot at stardom.  No one has exploited this monopsonistic situation better than the Raiders.  In the early '80s, the L.A. Coliseum Commission snatched the Raiders from Oakland for more than $10 million.  That's not the price of the team, but a bribe to move -- a cash-basis Welcome Wagon.  In response, the city of Oakland tried to seize the team in an imaginative eminent domain suit that not even the California courts could quite take seriously -- meaning that it only took five years of litigation for them to dismiss the suit.  The loss jolted Oakland, whose fans supported the Raiders in roughly the manner the Iranian fundamentalists supported the Ayatollah.  Since the Raiders actually get paid to shop, they are again looking for a new home.  First stop was tiny Irwindale, Calif., a mining town 40 miles due east of Los Angeles with a population of about 1,000, which offered the Raiders a nonrefundable $10 million in earnest money to consider locating there.  Alas, Irwindale's financing fell apart.  Now the Raiders have their sights set on Sacramento, the seat of California's government.  The local boosters want to build a $100 million private stadium, at no cost to the taxpayer -- except for a $50 million "franchise fee" from the city and county.  Public interest arguments for this subsidy have been purchased at the going rate: A Chicago consulting firm has produced an estimate that the Raiders will infuse $1.4 billion into the local economy over the next 20 years.  The study isn't worth the Raiders' deposit slip it's written on.  The assumptions employed were so optimistic as to make Rosy Scenario blush -- for instance, that the Sacramento Raiders will sell more tickets at 30% higher prices than the San Francisco 49ers.  Naturally, the usual magic is performed with multiplier effects.  Most important, it is simply posited that no dollar spent on Raiders football would ever otherwise be spent in Sacramento -- that sports money has no opportunity costs.  If this were true, the way to prosperity would seem to be to build an infinite number of sports stadiums.  Unhappily, even these fluffy assumptions could not generate a break-even for the public till, so local politicians are busily devising schemes to raise taxes on local sporting events and hotel rooms -- a tricky business because subterfuges must be employed to avoid the two-thirds vote of the people required by law for all "special assessments."  The present value of these taxes will amount to about $150 per Sacramento household.  Whatever the studies are made to say, football bidding wars are a zero sum game: L.A. will lose whatever Oakland/Irwindale/Sacramento/ (Fill in your city here) gains.  It doesn't seem to matter to local governments.  Pepperdine economist Dean Baim's recent study of 14 baseball and football stadiums estimated that only one -- private (except for the land) Dodger Stadium -- was producing a positive flow into city coffers.  The total net present value of the burden on local taxpayers for all 14 came to $136 million.  That the Raiders were rewarded by a jury for playing this game of Sack the Municipal Taxpayer is symptomatic of the crap-shoot condition of antitrust law.  The NFL may be guilty of providing the world with too few teams, but the remedy chosen by the courts adds not a tight end to the roster.  Indeed, NFL Rule 4.3, condemned in the Raiders' case as a restraint of trade, actually counteracted the effects of monopsony.  By requiring three-quarters of all franchise owners to agree to any move, the rule mitigated "the evident problems of opportunistic bargaining by `free-agent' franchises" taking advantage of municipalities that have undertaken long-term stadium investments, as shown in a recent study by Loyola College (Baltimore) economist Stephen J.K. Walters.  Competition between localities to attract industry can be an effective constraint on foolishly inefficient taxes.  The $60 million Sears just pocketed from the State of Illinois in exchange for retaining its headquarters in the state may well represent a competitive brake on the avarice of the state government.  But there is a fine line separating tax rate reductions from the public dole.  The frenzied bidding for the Raiders -- Oakland has a $54 million deal to lure them back -- has so accelerated the momentum for a special tax increase that the liberal mayor of Sacramento, Ann Rudin, has piled on with an extra arts subsidy increment.  The Raiders have collected $20 million from two California cities, may be about to pick up $50 million more, and even knocked off an additional $33 million in the Antitrust Litigation Bowl.  In a free country, big spending football maniacs should be able to view nickel defenses from on high in Malcolm Forbesian luxury boxes, but in a just country, Joe Taxpayer should not have to serve as their water boy. ---  Mr. Hazlett teaches economics and public policy at the University of California, Davis.  Lockheed Corp. was given a $437 million Air Force contract for 48 C-130 aircraft.  The Defense Logistics Agency awarded jet fuel contracts to Shell Oil Co. for $95.2 million; Mapco Alaska Inc., a subsidiary of Mapco Inc., for $28.2 million; and Tesoro-Alaska Petroleum, a subsidiary of Tesoro Petroleum Corp., for $25.3 million.  Logicon Inc. received a $38.1 million Air Force contract for technical support.  General Electric Co. won a $33.3 million Air Force contract for aircraft engines.  Unisys Corp. was issued a $21.8 million Navy contract for aircraft computers.  Martin Marietta Corp. was awarded a $15.7 million Navy contract for communications equipment.  Robert M. Byrnes, 52 years old, was named senior vice president of human resources at this pulp and paper maker.  He held the same title at Emhart Corp. David W. Oskin, who remains senior vice president of distribution, had been responsible for the human-resource functions.  R. Alan Kershaw was named vice president and treasurer of this insurance brokerage, based in the Baltimore office.  He had been assistant treasurer, international.  He succeeds James B. Lockhart III, who recently was named executive director of the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corp., a federal agency that helps guarantee payments of retirement benefits to workers enrolled in private-sector pension plans.  The Labor Department proposed $1.6 million in fines for Boise Cascade Corp.'s Rumsford, Maine, pulp and paper mill, charging worker safety and health violations.  The department's Occupational Safety and Health Administration proposed the penalties after a six-month investigation, which was spurred by complaints by the United Paperworkers Union.  OSHA said it found 535 violations, including 241 violations of health and safety standards, with nearly all of those violations involving conditions that pose a threat of serious physical harm or death to workers.  The mill, the largest paper mill in Maine, produces bleached pulp and coated and uncoated paper.  Boise Cascade is based in Boise, Idaho.  Alan McMillan, acting assistant secretary of labor for OSHA, said the company showed "a substantial disregard . . . for the safety and health of its employees" at the mill.  Boise Cascade has been cited by the agency in the past for similar violations at the Maine mill as well as at other facilities.  Many of the hazardous conditions at the mill had been identified by the company's own safety audits, but hadn't been corrected when OSHA inspected it, Mr. McMillan said.  Several of the conditions resulted in worker injuries, John Miles, OSHA regional administrator, said.  The charges included allegations of 322 willful violations, including failure to record injuries and illnesses; unsafe operation of industrial trucks; and failure to properly guard electrical equipment or to adequately guard power-transmission apparatus such as chains, belts, pulleys and gears, or to properly guard platforms, runways or floors above or near dangerous equipment.  The willful violations also included failure to provide respiratory protection for workers responding to or evacuating from emergencies involving hazardous air contaminants, the agency said.  Boise Cascade has 15 working days to contest the citations and proposed penalties before the independent Occupational Safety and Health Review Commission.  In Boise, a spokesman for Boise Cascade said the company is reviewing the OSHA allegations on a one-by-one basis and will decide later whether to contest any of the allegations.  A breast implant that won't interfere with X-ray mammography for breast cancer is under development by radiologists and surgeons at Washington University in St. Louis.  The new implant, a plastic envelope filled with vegetable oil, is designed to replace the silicone-filled envelopes that are implanted in about 100,000 women a year to enlarge their breasts.  Surgeons and radiologists say the silicone implants are becoming a major problem in screening for early breast cancer.  This is because they are opaque to X-rays and appear as large white masses on the mammograms, thereby obscuring the small white spots that may indicate early breast tumors.  It is only now that the first women to receive the implants 20 years ago are reaching the ages when breast cancer is most likely and mammography most important.  An estimated two million women have the implants and about 10% of them will develop breast cancer.  The new breast implant is transparent to X-rays and therefore shouldn't obscure any signs of breast cancer on the mammograms, according to Judy M. Destouet, head of the mammography unit at the Mallinckrodt Institute of Radiology at Washington University.  The new implant is a thin, silicone-film envelope containing what the university is calling "triglycerides," the technical term for fat.  The ingredients are actually a combination of peanut oil and sunflower oil that has been partly hydrogenated to give it the right consistency, Dr. Destouet says.  The implant is sterilized to prevent the oils from deteriorating.  In tests, the new implant appears on X-rays to have the same density as normal breast tissue.  "If triglycerides truly work, and it's already proven itself in every test so far, there's no excuse to continue using silicone to fill implants," says Leroy Young, associate professor of plastic and reconstructive surgery at Washington University.  Vegetable oils injected in animals three months ago haven't so far produced adverse reactions, Dr. Destouet said.  The safety and toxicity tests in animals should be finished in another three months, after which the first trial use of the implants in patients will begin, the U.S. Food and Drug Administration willing.  Development of the new breast implant is being funded by A/W Co., a limited partnership of Washington University and Alafi Capital, the vehicle of California venture capitalist Moshe Alafi.  Money Market Deposits-a 6.25%  Super-NOW Accounts-a 5.05%  Six-month Certificates-a 8.03%  One-year Certificates-a 8.04%  Thirty-month Accounts-a 7.97%  Five-Year Certificates-a 7.96%  U.S. Savings Bonds-b 7.81%  a-Average rate paid yesterday by 100 large banks and thrifts in the 10 largest metropolitan areas as compiled by Bank Rate Monitor.  b-Current annual yield.  Guaranteed minimum 6%.  Francis T. Vincent Jr. was named commissioner of Major League Baseball, succeeding A. Bartlett Giamatti, who died Sept. 1 after suffering a heart attack.  Baseball's 26 club owners elected Mr. Vincent, 51 years old, to serve a 4 1/2-year term to April 1, 1994, making the Greenwich, Conn., resident baseball's eighth commissioner.  Mr. Vincent, who served for nearly a year as deputy commissioner, was acting commissioner since Mr. Giamatti's death.  A Yale Law School graduate, he worked at the law firms Kaplan & Drysdale in Washington, D.C., and Whitman & Ransom in New York.  In 1978, he served as associate director of corporate finance for the Securities and Exchange Commission.  In 1978, Mr. Vincent joined Columbia Pictures Inc. as president and chief executive officer.  In 1983, he was named chairman and served in that capacity until he became deputy commissioner of baseball last October.  Here's a space trip that's pretty far out even if it doesn't reach Neptune.  The National Aeronautics and Space Administration will soon hunt for pyramids.  On Mars.  The space agency says it has granted a longstanding request from some space buffs, who call themselves the Mars Project, to photograph the Cydonia region of Mars.  Cydonia may be home to a field of pyramids and other rock formations erected by alien beings, speculate Mars Project enthusiasts, who pore over old photos of Mars looking for odd things.  They have even found one rock formation that looks like a human face.  Richard Hoagland, the Mars Project founder, says he assumes that through the pyramids the aliens are trying to tell us "something significant, something useful."  But he doesn't know just what yet.  Mr. Hoagland's ruminations have long been a source of merriment among space scientists.  But NASA started taking him more seriously after he recently recruited Rep. Robert Roe, a New Jersey Democrat who is chairman of the House Science and Space Committee, to help him.  Rep. Roe's staff asked NASA whether it planned to photograph Cydonia with its Mars Observer spacecraft, scheduled for launch in September 1992 -- with the clear implication that if it didn't, it should.  "With space, there are so many unknowns, why not take a picture?" reasons Robert Maitlin, an aide to Rep. Roe.  So now NASA, grudgingly, says it will try to unravel the pyramid scheme with new photos of Cydonia.  "We'll try, if only to kill off the rumors,"says Arden Albee, the Mars Observer project scientist.  The Mars Observer camera can see objects as small as a car.  If aliens built in Cydonia, says Michael Malin, the Arizona State University scientist who manages the camera for NASA, there should be small buildings, roads and dump sites.  "That would be clear evidence" that the formations aren't just weird geology, he says.  But the Mars Project's Mr. Hoagland says that's asking too much.  Roads could erode, over time, and aliens might have different ways of building things from those of humans.  What he's looking for are unusual geometric patterns that indicate the presence of intelligence.  "I don't want to limit ourselves to things we'd expect to see," he says.  "How alien is alien?"  Peter V. Ueberroth, former commissioner of major league baseball, was appointed to the supervisory board of Adidas AG, the West German sports-shoe and apparel maker.  Mr. Ueberroth will also join the boards of Adidas subsidiaries in the U.S., the company said.  As a member of the 12-member supervisory board of the closely held company, Mr. Ueberroth will oversee the company's international sneaker and athletic-wear operations.  The company also said Mr. Ueberroth has acquired options for a "substantial stake" in its U.S. operations and a minority share in Adidas AG, which can be exercised by an increase in the number of company shares.  The five children of the company's founder, Adolf Dassler, hold a majority interest in Adidas.  Group sales in 1988 fell 5%, to 3.15 billion marks ($1.71 billion) from 3.32 billion marks in 1987.  Ireland's Jefferson Smurfit Group PLC and Morgan Stanley Group Inc. agreed to pay $41.75 a share, or about $334 million, to acquire the 22% stake in Smurfit's U.S. paper and packaging subsidiary currently held by the public.  The new venture said it will shortly launch a tender offer for the roughly 8.6 million Jefferson Smurfit Corp. common shares the Dublin parent doesn't already own.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, disclosure of the buy-out plan sent Jefferson Smurfit Corp. shares soaring $3.50 to close at $41.125, on volume of about two million shares.  The proposed transaction is part of a potentially lucrative recapitalization and consolidation of Smurfit and Morgan Stanley's containerboard interests.  The two have operated essentially as one company since 1986, when Jefferson Smurfit Corp. and a Morgan Stanley-led investment group each bought 50% stakes in Container Corp. from Mobil Corp. for a total of $1.2 billion.  The plan calls for the combination, under a new company, of the two operations.  The combined containerboard companies, which make the material used in brown paper boxes, have a total of about 7% of their industry's capacity, making them the fifth-largest player in that business.  The Morgan Stanley group's original investment in Container was about $10 million.  The proposed recapitalization would yield $140 million in pretax profit for Morgan Stanley and $360 million for its investors in Container Corp.  The investors will cash out at a tremendous profit," said a spokesman for Morgan Stanley.  Under the proposed transaction, the new, combined company will be named SIBV-MS Holdings Inc., consisting of the Ireland-based Smurfit and a second Morgan Stanley investor group: Leveraged Equity Fund II. Thus, the second Morgan Stanley group will help buy out its predecessor -- so creating a new leveraged buyout from a previous one.  Morgan Stanley's second buy-out and Smurfit will contribute $200 million each in equity to the new SIBV-MS.  For its part, Jefferson Smurfit Group will receive about $1 billion net proceeds, after its investment in the new venture, for selling its 78%-stake U.S. subsidiary to SIBV-MS.  Jefferson Smurfit, which also has container operations in Europe and Latin America, said it may use that money for acquisitions overseas or in the U.S.  The new SIBV-MS isn't likely to make acquisitions to increase its containerboard capacity.  It will borrow $2.9 billion, including $2.1 billion from a bank syndicate led by Bankers Trust Co. and raise about $750 million through the planned sale of debt securites by Morgan Stanley & Co.  Jefferson Smurfit Corp. shares were trading at just over $30 a share before its parent and Morgan Stanley disclosed in early August that they were mulling the combination formally announced yesterday.  The original disclosure envisioned a $38-a-share buy-out, however, and yesterday's stock-price jump was related to the sweetened price that finally emerged.  Teledyne Inc. said its United Insurance Co. of America unit agreed to acquire closely held Union National Life Insurance Co. of Baton Rouge, La., for cash.  The amount wasn't disclosed.  Last June Teledyne, a diversifed manufacturing and insurance company, said it was considering spinning off to its shareholders its insurance and finance operations.  Union National would become part of this spinoff company, Teledyne said.  Union National's 1988 revenue was $78.9 million.  A grass-roots tax revolt is erupting as thousands of small retailers learn they face hefty penalties for failing to pay a little-known federal tax.  The U.S. Treasury's Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms has sent tax forms to more than 110,000 businesses that haven't paid an annual occupational tax for sellers of alcoholic beverages.  The bureau is following the mailing with dunning notices to retailers that don't pay up.  Thousands of other retailers face similar notices, officials indicate.  Many of the liquor sellers -- from taverns, groceries and restaurants to fraternal groups and gas stations -- say they weren't even aware they had to pay the 123-year-old fee, which jumped to $250 last year from just $54 the year before.  Indeed, federal tax collectors made little effort to enforce the tax until the sharp fee increase made it worth the trouble and automation made seeking compliance easier.  Some sellers of alcohol report the Treasury agency has sent notices that they owe as much as $10,000 in taxes, penalties and interest for failing to pay the tax for decades.  They must pay up or face possible seizure of their assets by the Internal Revenue Service.  Many of them complain that the tax notices are simply the latest in a score of fresh federal regulations and red tape.  Elks Lodge 109 in Wilkes-Barre, Pa., got a $9,776 bill recently.  It has had a liquor license since 1940, but lodge members say they never paid the fee because they weren't aware of it.  And while many other retailers say their bills cover only the two years ending next June 30, their assessments -- with penalties and interest -- come to $664.37 each.  Shocked by the unexpected levies, angry retailers are turning to Congress for help.  Already, one lawmaker -- Rep. Paul E. Kanjorski (D., Pa.) -- has introduced legislation that, among other things, would bar collection of the tax before 1985.  And, spurred by upset constituents, Rep. Ed Jenkins (D., Ga.), a member of the House Ways and Means Committee, is considering adding a provision to the current budget-reconciliation bill.  He wants to cut the tax to $165 and waive interest and penalties for the tax years before July 1 as long as back taxes are paid by July 1, 1991.  Retailers are demanding action.  "I realize we have to pay taxes, but this is unfair," says Dorothy Vasiloudis, whose small delicatessen in San Carlos, Calif., got a $1,019 bill covering three years' taxes, interest and penalties.  "It will take a lot of sandwiches to raise that money."  Ms. Vasiloudis, who sells beer and wine and has two employees, is outraged that the tax collectors let her go for years without trying to enforce the law.  "Too many people like me are ignorant about the tax, and that's negligence on {the tax collectors'} part," she says.  Ray Friday, owner of the Swedish Restaurant in Carmel, Calif., got the news two weeks ago that Uncle Sam wants him to pay up from 1985.  Especially miffed about the penalties and interest he has been assessed, Mr. Friday says he doesn't intend to pay until the Treasury bureau explains its procedures to his congressman in writing.  "If you're going to charge me, tell me what I owe.  Don't just bill me for it," he says.  "You have to wonder what's the public policy issue to fry these poor businesses," says Abe Schneier, a Washington tax accountant who represents business associations.  Peter Skansera, a small-business lobbyist in Idaho, says the liquor-fee penalties have especially irked gasoline stations that also face spending a lot to meet threatened new rules covering storage-tank cleanup and accommodation of handicapped patrons.  Other small businesses say they will leave the liquor-sales business because they don't sell enough alcoholic beverages to warrant paying the steeper taxes.  Hal Messick, who owns Messick's Sales & Service, a general store in Crouch, Idaho, says he has decided against renewing his city, county and state beer licenses when they run out next Jan. 1 -- and will quit selling beer then.  Ms. Vasiloudis and another California deli owner, Les Wandel of Redwood City, decided to organize local resistance to the tax after surveying about 100 other small food shops and discovering that one in four had been caught by surprise by the dunning notices. (She says many new retailers who recently got state licenses learned about the tax then.) The two are seeking contributions to hire a lawyer to protest to the Treasury bureau and ask that the taxes and penalties be waived.  They've also contacted their congressman.  A lawmaker's lobbying can pay off.  After Rep. Kanjorski learned of the Elks Lodge's troubles in Wilkes-Barre, the fraternal group was able to settle with the bureau by paying about a tenth of the bill, or about $1,000.  The lodge convinced bureau officials it had been shut down for a while and had lost all of its records as the result of a 1972 flood.  The Treasury agency gets information about state licenses from 29 states and matches the names and identification numbers by computer with tax records.  The other 21 states aren't organized well enough to be helpful, an agency spokeswoman says, and it will be several more years before delinquent retailers in those states can be dunned.  The spokeswoman acknowledges that thousands of retailers will probably be hit.  "That's why we're trying to publicize the tax through speeches by officials to trade groups," she says.  The Treasury says that only about 60% of an estimated 600,000 retail outlets in the U.S. have been paying the tax.  Thus, the current annual tax deficiency could be $60 million before interest and penalties.  If the agency can't collect the tax after a series of notices, it turns the taxpayer's case over to the IRS, which has the power to seize assets.  From Oct. 1, 1988, to last June 15, the bureau sent out tax-form packages to 273,000 concerns, representing more than 400,000 retail outlets that must pay the tax.  Included were about 110,000 stores that hadn't paid the tax in the past.  In 1988, the first year for the higher fee, collections jumped to $128.2 million from $26.7 million.  Even for retailers who pay the tax, billing is spotty.  Michael Hurst, owner of 15th St. Fisheries in Fort Lauderdale, Fla., says he sometimes forgets to pay because he rarely gets a bill for his seafood restaurant.  In contrast, he says, renewal forms for his income taxes and his Florida liquor license arrive regularly, reminding him in time to pay each year.  This week, he says, he checked his tax stamp and discovered it's out-of-date again.  Referring to Treasury bureau officials, he says, "These people have sloppy business practices.  The problem they have isn't with collection but with billing."  The steady decline in the number of Americans living on farms may be ending, the Census Bureau says.  An estimated 4,951,000 people -- only two of every 100 Americans -- were living on farms in 1988, not significantly different from the previous year's tally of 4,986,000.  "More than one year of data showing stability would be needed to confirm this pattern," the Census Bureau cautioned.  It noted that the decline in the farm population appeared to be over in 1984, but then resumed.  The farm population has dropped steadily over the years, falling by more than 14% since 1983.  As recently as 1950, 23 million Americans, more than 15% of the population, lived on farms.  The new census report, done jointly with the Agriculture Department's Economic Research Service, also found that farm residents tend to be older than Americans who live elsewhere.  The median age of people living on farms was 38 years, compared with 32.3 years for the nation as a whole.  The government defines a farm as a place in a rural area that sells at least $1,000 a year of agricultural products.  The small number of farms in urban areas aren't included.  Businesses in many parts of the country are putting out "Help Wanted" signs, trying to attract skilled and unskilled workers.  One way to solve this labor shortage would be to hire senior citizens, who already have proved their experience and reliability.  But many seniors won't consider taking a job because if they do, the government takes away a large part of their Social Security benefits.  Ever since Social Security's inception, retirees have been allowed to earn only a small amount of income and still get full benefits.  Today, an elderly worker's benefits are reduced by $1 for every $2 he earns above a paltry $8,880.  The penalty amounts to a steep 50% marginal tax rate.  The idea behind this punitive measure is that since Social Security originally was meant to replace lost earnings it shouldn't go to those still working.  But the retirement-earnings limit was born in the Depression, when jobs were scarce and the government wanted the elderly to retire to make room for younger people with families.  The problem in many fields now is a shortage of workers.  Many elderly workers are actually better off earning less than trying to earn more.  For those who earn just barely enough to pay income taxes, the marginal tax rate is at least 75%.  A married person earning $8,880 in income would actually lose $18 if he received a $1,000-a-year raise.  And curiously, the nation's highest marginal tax rates are imposed on the middle-class elderly.  They'll get some relief from this next year, when the earnings penalty is reduced to 33%.  The House Ways and Means Committee has also voted to increase the earnings limit for workers between ages 65 and 69 to $10,440 by 1991 -- still far too low.  But what the government gives with one hand it takes with the other.  By 1993 the elderly would be paying up to an extra 11.8% of their incomes just to fund the new catastrophic-health program.  Why does Congress favor limiting retirement income?  Static revenue models that pretend people are stick figures who don't respond to incentives predict that lifting the limit completely would cost $4.8 billion a year in added Social Security payments.  But in the real world, raising the earnings limit would induce retirees to enter the work force and earn more money.  This in turn would generate higher income and payroll-tax revenues.  Some 400,000 elderly workers earn annual incomes within 10% of the earnings limit -- a sure sign that workers already are trying to earn all they can without bumping against the penalty-triggering limit.  Former Treasury economists Gary and Aldona Robbins estimate that under a higher limit, the additional Social Security benefits would be more than offset by increases in federal revenues.  Raising the earnings limit by $3,000 -- as Colorado's Republican Senator Bill Armstrong proposes -- would cost $110 million in fatter benefit checks, but generate $1.5 billion in extra revenue a year.  Raising the limit even more would bring in additional revenue.  At the revenue-maximizing point of $39,400 in income, the National Center for Policy Analysis estimates the government would take in $3.2 billion a year in added income.  That's enough to make up most of the revenue that would be lost in killing the catastrophic surtax.  Even abolishing the earnings limit completely would still net $140 million in extra revenue.  Projections like these have a flesh-and-blood basis in reality.  We recently received a letter from a Mr. Cleve Campbell, a real-estate agent in Naples, Florida, who wrote to tell us of his dilemma at reaching age 65.  He'd like to supplement his income, but if he earns $25,000 selling real estate, he will not only pay income taxes and 13.02% in Social Security tax on that money but lose an additional $9,000 in benefits.  By his calculation he would have to pay $20,505 in taxes and lost benefits -- an 82% marginal tax rate.  Mr. Campbell notes that he and his wife also will have to pay $1,600 extra a year to finance the new catastrophic-health program.  The final insult is that like 75% of all seniors, he and his wife already have catastrophic coverage through private insurance.  "Where else can you work, keep 18% of your earnings and give the government 82%?"  Mr. Campbell asks.  "Sounds like a place east of the Iron Curtain."  Mr. Campbell believes Draconian tax rates and penalties destroy the initiative of many elderly Americans.  "And when we can't create and produce, we wither -- mentally and physically," he notes.  Energetic seniors shouldn't have to believe that their country doesn't want them to work, and that they are fools if they do.  These people are one of the nation's most underutilized resources.  Freeing up their creative energies would not only make retirement more meaningful for many, but add to both economic output and tax revenues.  France's Renault, fed up with lackluster results by its Mack Trucks Inc. affiliate said Mack will be put through a "cultural revolution" that could include more job cuts.  In New York, Ralph E. Reins, 48-year-old president and chief operating officer of Mack Trucks since last June, was elected chief executive officer, succeeding John B. Curcio, 55.  Mr. Curcio remains chairman of the Allentown, Pa., concern, but yesterday's announcement followed a hastily called board meeting in New York with officials from Renault, the French state-owned auto maker that owns 45% of Mack through Renault Vehicules Industriels, the French company's truck subsidiary.  The announcement accompanied news that Mack expects to post a $50-million third-quarter loss and "substantial losses" for the fourth quarter and into next year.  Mack has been saying since last June that sales would drop because of a difficult transition to new products, including a conventional highway tractor and a 12-liter E7 engine.  In national over-the-counter trading yesterday, Mack common closed at $11.125, off 50 cents, on volume of 181,400 shares.  The company also cited an industrywide slump in demand for heavy-duty Class B-trucks.  Second-quarter orders for 1989 dropped 12% from the first quarter.  Last month, Mack announced plans to reduce production at its manufacturing and assembly plants 45% and to cut its North American work force 21%, or 1,806 jobs.  The head of Renault's truck operations, Philippe Gras, was in New York yesterday to attend Mack's board meeting.  One French newspaper had quoted him as saying privately at the Frankfurt auto show Tuesday that heads would roll at Mack.  Until now Renault, which had its own problems, had taken a largely hands-off approach to Mack.  Officials in Paris said that has ended.  In addition to its 45% stake in Mack, Renault also holds warrants that it could exercise immediately to boost its stake above 50%, giving it effective control of Mack.  Mack posted net income of $31.8 million last year, up from just $4.1 million the year before.  Sales grew 13% to $2.1 billion in 1988.  But in the first half of this year, Mack slipped into an $18 million loss, with sales slumping 4% to just over $1 billion.  "Mack will probably need to go through a cultural revolution a bit like the one we have experienced in recent years," a Renault official said.  The Renault "revolution" included heavy layoffs and broad changes in production techniques.  And the Renault official said he couldn't rule out more job cuts at Mack.  Athena Neurosciences Inc. said its scientists helped shed further light on the brain degeneration involved in Alzheimer's disease, with a finding that has possible implications for future therapeutic drug research.  In a paper published in this week's edition of the British journal Nature, Sukanto Sinha and co-workers at the biotechnology concern said they have found the identity of a key protein associated with Alzheimer's disease.  The protein, called beta-amyloid precursor protein, gives rise to the abnormal amyloid plaques previously reported to be deposited in the brains of Alzheimer's patients.  The numbers of such plaques are linked with the disease's progressive dementia, though it isn't yet known whether the plaques are the cause of the disease or just one of its manifestations, Athena said.  The protein reported on by the Athena team is also thought to be a precursor of another previously described protein called protease nexin II, one of a family of agents that control certain enzymes and interact with cells.  The company said it is working with Eli Lilly & Co. to develop therapeutic products for the treatment of Alzheimer's disease.  Unicorp Canada Corp. and Cara Operations Ltd. said they are trying to arrange a meeting with Dunkin' Donuts Inc.'s financial adviser, Goldman, Sachs & Co., to examine confidential financial and operating information on the doughnut shop franchiser.  A spokesman for DD Acquisition Corp., which is jointly held by Unicorp Canada and Cara Operations, said the company doesn't intend to increase its bid of $45 a share, or $268 million, for Dunkin' Donuts, but left open the possibility of a higher offer.  No decision can be made "until we see what's in the information," he said.  "Give us a week and we'll be able to come up with something by then."  He said the company hopes to meet with Goldman Sachs by early next week.  Dunkin' Donuts said it signed confidentiality agreements with several parties, including DD Acquisition, that are interested in pursuing discussions concerning the acquisition of the Randolph, Mass., company.  On Monday, Dunkin' Donuts rejected DD Acquisition's offer and instructed Goldman Sachs to explore ways to maximize shareholder value, including an acquisition of the company by a third party.  DD Acquisition has agreed to keep its tender offer open at least until Nov. 1.  In addition, the parties have agreed to postpone Monday's trial in pending Delaware litigation and to suspend that litigation until at least Nov. 1.  Co op AG, a large West German retailer, filed for receivership after failing to gain sufficient backing from creditors for a debt-forgiveness plan.  Under the proposed plan, 124 West German and foreign banks were asked to write off 75% of Co op's bank debt of 2.7 billion marks ($1.36 billion) in exchange for cash payment on the remaining 25%.  Only 72 banks, accounting for 1.1 billion marks in Co op debt, had approved the plan by Tuesday's deadline.  Of the rest, most of them non-German banks, nine refused and 43 hadn't decided.  Similar to Chapter 11 proceedings in the U.S., West German companies in receivership are granted court protection from creditors while a receiver decides if the company can be salvaged.  If not, it is declared bankrupt and its remaining assets equally distributed among creditors.  Tuesday's deadline marked the end of a three-week period during which West German companies can devise a debt restructuring plan after finding a gap in its balance sheet.  On Aug. 22, Co op auditors had discovered that the retailer's consolidated bank debt totaled 750 million marks more than the 1.95 billion marks reported in February.  The discovery voided a previous debt restructuring under which banks would write off between 33% and 50% of their exposure in the ailing company.  Hans Friderichs, chairman of Co op's supervisory board, said Co op still had 200 million marks on hand.  But higher-than-expected debt and the legal deadline forced Co op to ask for court protection, Mr. Friderichs said.  However, he emphazised that Co op still might be able to withdraw from receivership if more banks agreed to settle the company's debts out of court.  Even so, Co op's future appears doubtful.  Its core business is built around an extensive, 2,000-store food market chain as well as its home-improvement centers.  Co op managers said they already have been contacted by outside groups interested in acquiring all or parts of the Co op group, which has 46,000 employees and rang up 1988 sales of 14 billion marks.  The company currently is arranging the sale of peripheral retail activities, including toys, footwear, sporting goods and liquor, to smaller retail groups.  Under the proposed plan, four foreign banks which acquired Co op as part of a rescue operation in November -- Swiss Bank Corp., Amro Bank of the Netherlands, Security Pacific Corp. of the U.S. and Svenska Handelsbanken of Sweden -- would place their Co op shares with a trustee.  He would oversee a write-down of Co op's existing capital as well as the raising of new capital later on.  Co op emerged as one of West Germany's darkest corporate scandals last year.  It was owned by West German trade unions until 1985, and later by a series of dubious letter-box companies that, in turn, appeared to be owned by Co op.  By last October, the shaky corporation was skidding toward bankruptcy after a decade of over-expansion.  Ford Motor Co. is betting that the tradition-minded buyers of its heftiest car will accept the "aero" styling that now characterizes most of the company's model line.  Ford unveiled the new Lincoln Town Car at the official preview of its 1990 vehicles.  The new Town Car is 18 feet, four inches long -- one inch longer than its predecessor -- and weighs over two tons.  But it no longer has the boxy lines that have been its hallmark for a decade.  "It has a look that will make customers either love it or hate it," said Dan Nigri, co-owner of Don McCue Lincoln-Mercury in Barrington, Ill.  "I'm not sure all Town Car buyers are ready for more modern styling, but a lot of people will be glad the car's entering the 20th century."  One is Donald E. Petersen, chairman and chief executive officer of Ford.  For a decade he shunned driving the Town Car because he didn't like either its looks or its barge-like handling.  But earlier this year Mr. Petersen drove a pre-production version of the new model, which has rounded lines and tighter suspension.  Mr. Petersen declared the vehicle to his liking.  But officials of General Motors Corp. already are probing for weaknesses.  John Grettenberger, general manager of GM's Cadillac division, poked fun at the new Town Car at a recent dealer meeting, implying that the car looks too much like its cousin, the Lincoln Continental.  The new look and feel may be enough to unsettle buyers who like traditional, meaning bulky and big, American luxury cars.  Such buyers rallied around Ford in the mid-1980s when GM downsized Cadillacs.  Ford officials said they tried to redesign the car to avoid losing the interest of its target buyer, who is 60 years old and has a household income of $59,000 a year.  For example, engineers didn't tighten the suspension as much as they would have liked.  Over the years, the Town Car has been successful for the No. 2 auto maker.  Analysts estimate that Ford makes over $10,000 in pretax profit per car, producing a significant portion of Ford's earnings.  The 1990 Town Car will cost significantly more than the old model, partly because it has air bags on the driver and passenger sides.  Preliminary base prices have jumped as much as 8.2% and range between $27,315 and $32,137.  Still Ross H. Roberts, general manager of Ford's Lincoln-Mercury division, predicted sales will rise 14% next year to 138,000 vehicles.  The Democrats have come up with an alternative to George Bush's war on drugs.  Instead of Mr. Bush's $7.9 billion, Senator Byrd says the Democrats would spend $10.1 billion.  Senate Majority Leader George Mitchell claims, "One thing clear is the inadequacy of the President's plan, and the need to improve it to provide substance to the words."  After 30 years of this, it looks as if we've got the Democrats' political philosophy down to a bumper sticker: Just Say More.  For the first time in 20 years, the New York City mayor's race is shaping up to be more than a one-party affair.  In the contest, Manhattan Borough President David Dinkins, the Democratic candidate, faces former U.S. Attorney Rudolph Giuliani, who is running on both the Republican and Liberal party lines.  If Mr. Dinkins wins in November, he will become the first black mayor of the nation's largest city and will have the chance to become one of the most powerful black politicians in the nation.  But Mr. Dinkins's primary victory over three-term incumbent Edward Koch does not guarantee election in November, even in a city in which Democrats outnumber Republicans 5-to-1.  Despite polls showing Mr. Dinkins to be a big favorite, political analysts say Mr. Giuliani's potentially broad-based appeal, based on his reputation as a crime fighter, could threaten the Democrats' hold on City Hall.  Opinion polls show crime and drugs are the most important issues.  And both issues play to Mr. Giuliani's strength.  More significant is the presence of a significant number of voters who refuse to vote for a black candidate, says Republican strategist Jay Severin.  "Race remains the dirty little secret of American politics," he says.  Mr. Dinkins played down race factors in his primary campaign, urging unity among different groups in the city.  With Mr. Dinkins's decisive victory in the primary came the prospect of outside help.  Help may come, for example, from Democratic National Committee Chairman Ronald Brown, who is scheduled to meet with Mr. Dinkins tomorrow to discuss what resources the party will contribute to the Dinkins campaign.  Help also may come from Jesse Jackson, the former presidential candidate.  Preceding Mr. Dinkins to the podium on primary night, Mr. Jackson invoked the names of black leaders from Malcolm X to Nelson Mandela and hailed Mr. Dinkins's victory as a victory for blacks.  Some of Mr. Dinkins's advisers said they were concerned their candidate seemed to be upstaged by Mr. Jackson.  "They were trying to get Jackson off the stage but he wouldn't go," said one Dinkins adviser.  In the primary's higher-than-expected turnout, Mr. Dinkins won 51% of the total vote, including one-third of the white vote and more than half the Hispanic vote.  The 62-year-old Mr. Dinkins must keep his primary supporters from defecting to Mr. Giuliani.  Detractors of Mr. Dinkins, who campaigned as a quiet conciliator, maintain he is an indecisive leader who ducks crucial decisions.  Some people even saw a lack of forcefulness on his part in the primary victory celebration.  While supporters hailed Mr. Dinkins, the television audience shrank.  Mr. Dinkins didn't make his acceptance speech until about midnight.  Mr. Giuliani is likely to have his own share of problems.  First, he will have to overcome the Democrats' numerical advantage.  In addition, he faces difficulties within his own party.  In the primary campaign, he was hit with $13 million of negative advertising by Ronald Lauder, a political unknown who is heir to the Estee Lauder cosmetics fortune.  Mr. Lauder, whose campaign was backed by U.S. Senator Alfonse D'Amato (Rep., N.Y.), hasn't removed his name from the Conservative Party ballot and could siphon off votes that otherwise might go to Mr. Giuliani.  People close to the campaigns say that Mr. Lauder has agreed to cease his anti-Giuliani advertising and that he is not expected to be a major factor this November.  But it remains unclear whether Sen. D'Amato, who has been a fierce rival of Mr. Giuliani's, will continue to try to block his election.  Mr. Giuliani is expected to get some help from the Republican National Committee, but it is unclear whether President Bush will campaign for him.  "That matter hasn't come up yet," said Giuliani campaign manager Peter Powers.  If Mr. Bush does campaign, Mr. Giuliani faces a predicament.  As a Republican candidate in a Democratic city, Mr. Giuliani does not want to alienate liberals who might be put off by Mr. Bush's more conservative positions.  COFFEE PRICES will fall further than they already have if export quotas, dropped in July, aren't restored, Virgilio Barco, president of Colombia, is said to have written to President Bush.  In yesterday's edition, this statement was mistakenly attributed to the National Coffee Association, a trade group that has a policy of not commenting on prices.  (See: "Commodities: Coffee Futures Plummet on Indications U.S. Won't Press for Restoring Global Export Quotas" -- WSJ Sept. 13, 1989)  Ford Motor Co. said it is investing $2.8 billion at five plants that will build new vehicles or switch over to a different product.  The biggest expense is $1.5 billion in retooling and facilities to build the 1991 Ford Escort and Mercury Tracer, the two smallest cars Ford builds in North America.  The Escort will be built at Ford's Wayne, Mich., plant and at its plant in Hermosillo, Mexico.  Ford is building a stamping plant at Wayne and adding a second shift of workers at Hermosillo.  The Mexican plant currently builds only the Tracer and will continue to build the Mercury subcompact after it gets the Escort line.  Ford also plans to spend another $285 million to retool the company's Edison, N.J., plant to produce Ranger pickup trucks beginning in late 1990.  The Edison plant currently builds Escorts, but that production is moving to Hermosillo.  In addition, Ford said it plans to spend $700 million to retool its plant in Wixom, Mich., for the new 1990 Lincoln Town Car and $300 million to retool a Louisville, Ky., plant for the Explorer, a sports-utility vehicle to be introduced in 1990.  The Explorer replaces the Bronco II.  The company predicted that its Ford division would sell 1.5 million cars and 1.5 million trucks in 1990, representing 16% and 30% of the U.S. car and truck markets, respectively.  Ford also said its Lincoln-Mercury division expects to sell 702,000 cars in 1990, representing 7.2% of the U.S. car market.  British Petroleum Co. said it will announce the results of its internal review to restructure the company at a news conference in London today.  Reports have been circulating in the oil industry for some time that BP planned a massive reshaping of world-wide exploration and production operations.  It's understood the announcement today will focus on these areas.  A BP spokeswoman wouldn't elaborate.  Industry speculation is that BP may plan the sale of some assets and that there may be employment reductions of as many as 1,500 employees, or 15% of the work force, possibly including some politically sensitive jobs BP had pledged to maintain when it acquired Britoil.  But it's understood the main point of the restructuring will be renewed emphasis on oil exploration.  There's a pressing need for BP to find more oil reserves to offset those lost as Alaska's giant Prudhoe Bay oil field, where BP has its biggest stake, goes into decline.  Production from that field, BP recently said, has peaked.  E. John P. Browne, managing director of BP Exploration -- and former chief executive officer of BP Exploration USA and chief financial officer of BP America -- is an architect, possibly the chief one, of the restructuring.  In a recent interview, he said BP's share of Alaskan output was expected to fall to 775,000 barrels a day in 1992 from 830,000 last year, and he said BP intends to be a "bigger gas producer and gas marketer in the U.S."  In New York Stock Exchange trading yesterday, BP American depositary receipts closed at $61.125, up $1.25.  Scientists said they found new evidence of the existence of genes that control immune response, determining whether individuals can fend off particular viruses, develop allergies or come down with "auto-immune" diseases such as arthritis.  The new evidence comes from an experiment showing that certain individuals had inherited an inability to develop an immunity to hepatitis following vaccination with Merck & Co.'s hepatitis vaccine.  The confirmation that there are, in fact, human immune response genes opens up a new avenue in research on why individuals vary in their ability to fight off infections or reject organ transplants.  The discovery of human immune response genes also could lead to new insight on why some people develop antibodies against their own tissues, causing auto-immune diseases such as multiple sclerosis and rheumatoid arthritis.  The experiment with the hepatitis vaccine was reported in this week's New England Journal of Medicine by scientists from a number of medical centers and hospitals in Boston led by Chester A. Alper and his colleagues from the Center for Blood Research.  The experiment was spawned when 598 workers in Boston hospitals, clinics and medical laboratories were vaccinated with Merck's Heptavax-B vaccine for hepatitis B.  Such health care workers are at risk of hepatitis B because of their dealings with infected blood.  The Boston researchers found that 4% of the workers failed to develop an immunity to hepatitis, as evidenced by the lack of anti-hepatitis antibodies following three shots of the vaccine.  The researchers then checked the workers for variations in a cluster of related genes known as the major histo-compatibility complex, or MHC.  It's long been thought that the genes that control the immune response are hidden in this cluster.  But they have never been identified in humans.  The researchers found that a higher-than-expected number of the workers who failed to develop anti-hepatitis antibodies had one particular variation in their MHC genes that was rare in the workers successfully vaccinated.  Because they had previously genetically "typed" a large number of people for other research, the scientists knew of four families in which some members also had the unusual variation in the MHC genes.  Fourteen members of these families volunteered to be vaccinated with the vaccine.  Five of these 14 volunteers developed either an extremely low level of antibodies to hepatitis B or none at all.  All five of these "non-responders" had inherited two copies of the unusual variation in the MHC genes, one copy from each parent.  The remaining nine members of the families were known to have inherited only one copy of the MHC genetic variationfrom either their father or their motherand one copy of a more normal version of the genes.  All of these developed a far higher level of antibodies to hepatitis B than the non-responders.  The antibody response followed exactly the pattern of a dominant gene -- that is, it required only one copy of the gene to produce a normal level of antibodies.  Conversely, the failure to produce antibodies followed the pattern of a recessive gene in that it required two copies of the genetic variation.  Significantly, the recessive gene prevents the affected people from developing antibodies only to the hepatitis B virus.  The volunteers also were given tetanus shots, and all developed normal levels of antibodies to tetanus toxoid.  However, four of the volunteers with the genetic variation were allergic to the gluten in wheat, a kind of overreaction of the immune response.  The experiment, plus other evidence, suggests that this or other variations in the same genes may underlie a susceptibility to various auto-immune diseases, the researchers said.  Revlon Inc. claimed that one of its cosmetic creams reduces cellulite without having sufficient evidence to back up those claims, the Federal Trade Commission charged.  The agency's complaint is aimed at Revlon's claim, in advertising and promotional materials, that its Ultima II Pro-Collagen anti-cellulite body complex helps disperse toxins that contribute to cellulite, fatty deposits under the skin, and strengthens and tones the skin.  The commission voted 4-1 to issue the complaint, with Commissioner Mary Azcuenaga dissenting.  Revlon has 30 days to respond to the charges.  "When advertisers claim that their products have certain physiological effects, we expect them to have competent and reliable scientific evidence to back up those claims," said William MacLeod, director of the agency's Bureau of Consumer Protection.  Revlon said that in the course of the FTC's investigation it provided extensive proof for the advertising claims and "sees no valid legal basis for the issuance of the complaint."  The company said it believes the FTC is "mistakenly" trying to evaluate its cosmetic product by applying a stricter standard used to evaluate drugs and that it will "vigorously defend its position in the administrative process."  A Revlon spokesman added that the company stopped selling the product in question in October 1987, seven months after it was introduced, partially because of slow sales.  New York City, over its grand and tumultuous history in this century, generally has had mayors who were Italian, Jewish or Irish.  The political scientist's explanation for a phenomenon like this is that it reflects the relative political strength of a city's voting blocs.  There is of course much to that, but a simpler reason may be that if huge numbers of Italians, Jews or Irish live in New York, some of them will end up in politics.  The most politically adept or most ambitious will become mayor.  But this obvious and natural phenomenon had broken down in New York, and until recently in many other large American cities.  Despite a vast population of blacks living throughout its several boroughs, New York City has not only never had a black mayor, it's never come close.  Now it is very close.  David Dinkins, the black borough president of Manhattan, has just ended the larger-than-life, 12-year mayoralty of Ed Koch, capturing the nomination of the city's dominant Democratic Party.  The biggest paradox is that in a time when it's said that the city is being sundered by racial tension, Mr. Dinkins won Tuesday with the support of about one-third of white voters.  It would have been no surprise had Mr. Dinkins fared well among whites in liberal Manhattan, but he also pulled white votes in Brooklyn, Queens and Staten Island.  If in fact racial animosity was as intense as some commentators suggest, Mr. Dinkins' candidacy would have been crushed in these boroughs.  This isn't to say that race is a non-issue in New York but only that it's much more complex than the publicity the city receives over Howard Beach, the rape of the Central Park jogger, the Bensonhurst murder or the race-based self-promotion efforts of the Rev. Al Sharpton.  Tuesday's voting patterns suggest that New Yorkers are considerably more sophisticated in their feelings about this issue than the city's political and media elites, who persist in seeing the divisions resonant of a South Africa in any incident involving blacks and whites.  Some of New York is indeed being torn asunder, but it is mainly poor neighborhoods under siege from homicidal crack gangs.  At the end of a long campaign, the voters decided that Mr. Koch, for all his real achievements, had served too long to deal with fresh problems.  In November, of course, Mr. Dinkins must face Rudolph Giuliani, who won the Republican nomination, and Ronald Lauder, who stays on the ballot as the Conservative Party nominee after losing the GOP primary.  Mr. Giuliani profited from his own ethnic heritage among the heavily Italian Republican voters, allowing him to overcome Mr. Lauder's attacks on reckless law enforcement.  Given the lack of racial polarization in the Democratic results, it doesn't seem likely he will be able to mobilize the "crime" issue to overcome Mr. Dinkins' Democratic advantage.  If he prevails in November, Mr. Dinkins will bear an extraordinary burden.  As if the drug pathologies weren't enough, he would have to contend with Manhattan's unforgiving liberals, who will try to capture his administration, and with the city's public unions, a source of financial wreckage in the past.  Mayor Koch, with the help of highly talented aides, restored the city's greatest historical strength, its economic vitality.  But it is an extremely fragile vitality now, dependent on the confidence of all who contribute to the city's economy.  Just as Mr. Dinkins' rise to the brink of the city's mayoralty is a quintessentially New York phenomenon, so are the instinctive optimism and hope reflected in Tuesday's voting.  The campaign now has two months to put in place a trait crucial to all successful New Yorkers -- confidence.  International Business Machines Corp. will announce on Tuesday a broad initiative to help corporate customers confront their biggest problem: their inability to write software fast enough.  Industry executives said IBM will not only announce a series of its own software products but will announce alliances with some developers that provide software-writing tools.  Other developers will say at the news conference that they will make their products mesh with IBM's, the executives said.  IBM, based in Armonk, N.Y., confirmed that it will make the announcement, but declined to provide details.  The executives generally welcomed the long-awaited announcement, but some consultants and competitors expressed skepticism.  They said the strategy will initially focus on the mainframe environment and purely on IBM-compatible systems.  And they said that to be really useful the strategy must better incorporate minicomputers, personal computers and hardware made by IBM's competitors.  Gartner Group Inc., a consulting firm, has been telling clients that some limited development projects will benefit from the IBM initiative as early as next year, but that broad benefits won't start to appear until 1993.  "The announcement will be very long on vision, very short on what's physically there," said Peter Levine, a consultant at Gartner Group.  Theodore F. Ryan, director of international business development at Electronic Data Systems Corp., said that, in any case, "there's no silver bullet" that will solve the software-development problem.  IBM's idea is to provide a framework for so-called computer-aided software engineering -- the main technology that customers are using to attack their backlogs of software-development work, which are often two to three years long.  A solution to the backlog problem has been called the Holy Grail of the computer industry, because it would create demand for all sorts of additional hardware and software.  Yet, while computer-aided software engineering products have been widely available, few work well together, and parts of the software-development process generally have been ignored.  "The software-engineering market has never had anybody come along before and say, 'These are the rules,'" said Sam Albert, a consultant in Scarsdale, N.Y.  The centerpiece of the IBM announcement will be something called a repository, which stores data about a company's software-development process.  It contains rules about information -- where it should come from, who has access to it, how it should be presented on a screen and so forth.  It also catalogs code that has been written throughout the company.  That saves time when programmers find that someone already has written a piece of a program that they need.  It also means that fewer problems should develop down the road, because the code catalogued in the repository will generally have been used widely enough that any errors will have surfaced already.  Among other things, IBM also is expected to announce a version of its Cross System Product, which can be used to generate code from specifications provided by a programmer.  In addition, IBM is expected to disclose that it has incorporated into its products technology from three companies that it recently invested in -- Bachman Information Systems Inc., Knowledgeware Inc. and Index Technology Corp. IBM also is expected to say that it is working closely with some systems integrators, which, among other things, do software development for customers.  Among them will be Computer Task Group Inc., another company IBM recently invested in.  The industry executives said IBM is making a big push to get customers and software developers to sign on to its strategy.  IBM has put its sales force through extensive training, is briefing 200 big customers on its plans today and has a session set up for consultants Monday.  The executives said the real test will be whether customers decide IBM is moving fast enough on this or whether some of the initial versions of the products are too bare-bones to be very useful.  Some competitors will certainly complain that IBM has delivered too little and will try to persuade customers to ignore the IBM strategy.  But IBM has shown that it still controls the standards at the high end of the computer industry -- despite the well-publicized wars over standards in personal computers and workstations.  Consultants pointed to DB2, a mainframe database language that was widely criticized as underpowered when IBM introduced it a few years ago.  IBM repeatedly improved the product and it came to dominate that market.  Referring to the Tuesday announcement, Larry Bacon, a senior vice president at Travelers Corp., the insurance company, said: "It would have been better if they had put together a complete product that you could just buy and run on your computer.  But that's very easy to say and very hard to do."  Digital Equipment Corp. said it offered a voluntary severance program to 700 manufacturing employees in Massachusetts as part of a cost-cutting program to reallocate people and resources within the company.  A spokesman for the Maynard, Mass., computer maker, which has 125,800 employees, said that 200 to 300 people were expected to accept the offer, which provides between 40 and 104 weeks of pay, depending on length of service, and a year's health benefits.  Like International Business Machines Corp., Digital has a long history of avoiding layoffs.  But the company, which has seen weak domestic demand for its computers, has repeated warnings that it is "cautious as to near-term revenue growth and profitability."  As growth has slowed, profit margins have shrunk and the company has sought to cut costs.  In composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange yesterday, Digital closed at $97.50 a share, down $2.  As part of its reallocation program, the company disclosed in June a plan to shift as many as 4,000 manufacturing and administrative workers to customer service and sales jobs in the year ending July 1990.  A further 1,000 to 2,000 would be retrained and moved to sales and field jobs in fiscal 1991, the company said.  Digital's effort to reallocate workers stems in part from manufacturing efficiencies at the company, analysts said.  Like other major computer makers, Digital has streamlined manufacturing by increasing the density of circuits contained in semiconductor chips.  Machines that once may have required dozens of circuit boards and components wired together have been reduced to a single chip.  For example, the closet-sized VAX 11/780 computer that was introduced in 1978 was reduced to a single chip in 1985.  According to an internal document, the refrigerator-sized VAX 8700 model brought out only two years ago will be shrunk to the size of a tiny microchip next year.  Digital managers, meanwhile, seem increasingly guarded about their efforts to cut costs.  In recent weeks, the company has examined phone records of some employees to identify those who have talked to reporters.  A spokesman said the investigation was undertaken "to find out who was leaking proprietary information."  Separately, Digital said its attorneys will respond by Sept. 29 to a lawsuit filed by three shareholders in July in U.S. District Court in Boston.  The suit alleges violation of federal securities laws and negligent misrepresentations under state law by the company and its officers in connection with the disclosure of information concerning results for the year ended July 1.  The company spokesman said the suit is "without merit."  Wednesday, September 13, 1989  The key U.S. and foreign annual interest rates below are a guide to general levels but don't always represent actual transactions.  PRIME RATE: 10 1/2%.  The base rate on corporate loans at large U.S. money center commercial banks.  FEDERAL FUNDS: 9% high, 8 13/16% low, 8 13/16% near closing bid, 8 7/8% offered.  Reserves traded among commercial banks for overnight use in amounts of $1 million or more.  Source: Fulton Prebon (U.S.A.) Inc.  DISCOUNT RATE: 7%.  The charge on loans to depository institutions by the New York Federal Reserv Bank.  CALL MONEY: 9 3/4% to 10%.  The charge on loans to brokers on stock exchange collateral.  COMMERCIAL PAPER placed directly by General Motors Acceptance Corp.: 8.70% 20 to 44 days; 8.675% 45 to 59 days; 8.60% 60 to 89 days; 8.375% 90 to 119 days; 8.25% 120 to 149 days; 8.125% 150 to 179 days; 7.75% 180 to 270 days.  COMMERCIAL PAPER: High-grade unsecured notes sold through dealers by major corporations in multiples of $1,000: 8.82% 30 days; 8.75% 60 days; 8.65% 90 days.  CERTIFICATES OF DEPOSIT: 8.28% one month; 8.31% two months; 8.30% three months; 8.24% six months; 8.26% one year.  Average of top rates paid by major New York banks on primary new issues of negotiable C.D.s, usually on amounts of $1 million and more.  The minimum unit is $100,000.  Typical rates in the secondary market: 8.75% one month; 8.75% three months; 8.75% six months.  BANKERS ACCEPTANCES: 8.73% 30 days; 8.62% 60 days; 8.53% 90 days; 8.48% 120 days; 8.35% 150 days; 8.27% 180 days.  Negotiable, bank-backed business credit instruments typically financing an import order.  LONDON LATE EURODOLLARS: 9% to 8 7/8% one month; 8 15/16% to 8 13/16% two months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% three months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% four months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% five months; 8 7/8% to 8 3/4% six months.  LONDON INTERBANK OFFERED RATES (LIBOR): 8 15/16% one month; 8 7/8% three months; 8 7/8% six months; 8 7/8% one year.  The average of interbank offered rates for dollar deposits in the London market based on quotations at five major banks.  FOREIGN PRIME RATES: Canada 13.50%; Germany 8.50%; Japan 4.875%; Switzerland 8.50%; Britain 14%.  These rate indications aren't directly comparable; lending practices vary widely by location.  TREASURY BILLS: Results of the Monday, September 11, 1989, auction of short-term U.S. government bills, sold at a discount from face value in units of $10,000 to $1 million: 7.64% 13 weeks; 7.64% 26 weeks.  FEDERAL HOME LOAN MORTGAGE CORP. (Freddie Mac): Posted yields on 30-year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days. 9.96%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.25%, 2% rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  FEDERAL NATIONAL MORTGAGE ASSOCIATION (Fannie Mae): Posted yields on 30 year mortgage commitments for delivery within 30 days (priced at par) 9.92%, standard conventional fixed-rate mortgages; 8.85%, 6/2 rate capped one-year adjustable rate mortgages.  Source: Telerate Systems Inc.  MERRILL LYNCH READY ASSETS TRUST: 9.14%.  Annualized average rate of return after expenses for the past 30 days; not a forecast of future returns.  The world's leading industrialized countries are likely this month to discuss, and may even endorse, an increase in the resources of the International Monetary Fund, officials from the U.S., other industrialized countries and international agencies said.  Any increase in IMF resources is almost certain to be linked to an increase in Japan's shareholdings in the IMF -- and hence its voting power.  Tokyo probably would move into second place behind the U.S. from fifth place.  West Germany would remain in third place.  Britain, the current second-largest shareholder, probably would drop to fourth place along with France.  These issues are expected to loom large at the annual meetings of the IMF and the World Bank to be held here later this month.  Separately, the IMF criticized the U.S. in its annual report for the year ended April 30, expressing "concern" that further substantial reductions of the nation's fiscal deficit "wouldn't be forthcoming soon."  The IMF also called for "urgent and forceful action" on the U.S. budget deficit and said Washington might need to act to boost savings.  While the report commended the U.S. for controlling inflation and containing "overtly protectionist measures in new trade legislation," it also warned that protectionist pressures remain strong in the U.S.  The international agency argues that it needs an increase in its resources to keep pace with growth in the world economy and to fulfill its role in handling the international debt crisis.  IMF resources are provided by member countries, which pledge to keep a certain level of their financial reserves with the IMF.  Michel Camdessus, the IMF's managing director, has requested a 100% increase in member quotas, which would imply a doubling of the IMF's resources of about $120 billion.  Britain apparently is proposing a 25% increase.  France and Japan back the call for a 100% increase, while the West Germans apparently favor an increase of about 70%.  The U.S. hasn't yet said whether it will back an increase in IMF resources, but Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady on March 10 committed the U.S. to considering one by the end of this year.  Because of these differences, it is quite likely that the leading industrialized countries will commit themselves in the coming weeks to an increase in IMF resources without specifying its size.  They then would deal with the percentage increase and the sensitive issue of revising individual countries' shareholdings later this year or early next year.  The IMF is pressing for an early decision on quotas.  "Pressure for a timely decision will be extremely strong," said a senior monetary official discussing the forthcoming annual meetings.  He added that there was "a strong commitment to make a final decision {on quotas} before the end of the year," and he pointed out that at last year's annual IMF meeting in West Berlin, the major shareholders agreed to phase out borrowing by the agency and move back to "a fully quota-based IMF."  The campaign for a large and quick quota increase has met some opposition in the past.  Some senior officials from the U.S. and other countries have argued that the IMF doesn't need as large an increase as it is seeking.  The IMF's annual report provides some support for this argument.  The agency's actual lending dropped in financial year 1989 to 2.68 billion special drawing rights ($3.35 billion) from 4.56 billion SDR in financial year 1988.  The IMF's financial transactions and its balance sheet are denominated in SDRs, which represent a basket of currencies dominated by the dollar, the yen and the mark.  Currently, an SDR equals about $1.25.  IMF lending is picking up again.  Its loan commitments rose substantially in financial year 1989 to 4.6 billion SDR in 1989 from 2.96 billion SDR in 1988.  Already in financial year 1990, which began May 1, the IMF has committed to lend 7.97 billion SDR.  The Federal Reserve Board doubled the limit on banks' underwriting of certain private and municipal securities, further chipping away at the barriers between banking and investment banking erected during the Depression.  The Fed also voted to allow banks, through subsidiaries, to underwrite securities backed by the banks' own loans.  That activity had been prohibited out of fear that banks would package their worst loans and sell them to an unsuspecting public.  Under the provision approved yesterday, such securities would have to be rated by a national rating agency, such as Standard & Poor's Corp.  The Fed increased to 10% from 5% the percentage of revenue a bank's securities subsidiary can receive from underwriting corporate debt, commercial paper, securities backed by mortgages and consumer debt, and municipal bonds linked to revenue from specific projects.  The balance of the subsidiary's revenue must come from the less-risky underwriting of federal debt.  In January, in response to requests from five big banks, the Fed allowed banks to underwrite corporate debt for the first time, and said it would later consider raising the ceiling on revenues from those activities to 10%.  The January decision provoked sharp words from some important committee chairmen in Congress who said the Fed was usurping its power.  Congress is divided on the issue and hasn't taken any action to stop the Fed's moves, but legislation to give banks more powers is likely to be considered next year.  Yesterday, Rep. John Dingell (D., Mich.), chairman of the House Energy and Commerce Committee, lashed out again.  Arguing that the nation's savings and loans got into trouble after diversifying from their traditional home lending, Mr. Dingell said the Fed governors "are like the Bourbons.  They forget nothing because they learn nothing."  But the Securities Industry Association denounced the action as "absurd," saying that even most investment banks don't generate 10% of their business from these types of debt activities.  "It's closer to 8%," a spokesman said.  The association also said that allowing banks to issue securities backed by their own assets could create conflicts of interest and the "very dangers Congress wished to avoid."  Fed governors expressed strong interest in raising the limit from 10%, but didn't say specifically when they would consider the issue again.  Yesterday's decision "doesn't imply that anything above 10%" wouldn't be within the Fed's power to allow, said Fed Gov. Wayne Angell.  Another governor, Martha Seger, complained that the level isn't high enough to entice small and medium-sized banks into the securities business.  "Except for the biggest five or six banks, it isn't worth it to get into this," Mrs. Seger said.  Fed staff said requiring securities backed by a bank's own loans to be rated by an unaffiliated national rating agency would ensure that an impartial credit judgment is made.  In addition, the Fed's action allows banks to securitize assets issued or guaranteed by three government-backed enterprises, the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp., the Federal National Mortgage Association and the Government National Mortgage Association.  The Fed's move followed a federal appeals court ruling in New York last week that national banks can package their own mortgages and underwrite them as securities.  The ruling, upholding an action by the Comptroller of the Currency, may face an appeal to the Supreme Court from the Securities Industry Association.  Under the comptroller's decision, national banks can underwrite the securities as part of the bank's operations.  The Fed provisions require the securities activities to be in a separately capitalized subsidiary.  Skies Aren't So Friendly  For Birds These Days  FEATHERS ARE flying as the skies become more crowded.  Commercial jetliners increasingly are striking birds, and airline industry executives say the resulting mechanical damage is contributing to the growing problem of flight delays.  The number of collisions reported by the U.S. and Canada jumped 10% between 1986 and 1987, the latest year in a study by the International Civil Aviation Organization, a Montreal-based United Nations group that monitors collisions between birds and commercial planes.  In 1987, birds struck planes about 1,500 times in North America.  The U.S. reported between 650 and 700 of the collisions.  About 6% of bird collisions world-wide caused such emergencies as aborted takeoffs and obscured visibility.  A few years ago, a goose crashed through the cockpit window of a Republic airplane, blinding the captain in one eye.  About 20% of the time, birds hit airplane engines.  Some experts believe such collisions are among the most underrated and underreported safety problems facing airlines.  To combat lax record-keeping, the Federal Aviation Administration is starting a campaign to urge airlines, pilots and engine makers to report bird strikes.  The United Nations group says 18% of the world's airplane-bird collisions involve gulls and terns, followed by perching birds (13%), hawks and other hunting birds (7%), lapwings and plovers (4%), and pigeons and doves (3%).  Overseas Fares Getting  Faster U.S. Approval  FARE COMPETITION may heat up on international flights because carriers will be getting faster fare approval from Uncle Sam.  The U.S. government has overhauled its antiquated procedures for reviewing proposed fare changes.  Unlike domestic fares, the Department of Transportation still regulates international fares.  Approval from foreign governments also is often required.  The speed of approval in the U.S. has been notoriously slow because of a 1938 law that requires all airlines to submit changes on paper.  What's more, the department's workload is building because more carriers are criss-crossing the oceans.  Now, the Transportation Department has issued a regulation allowing carriers to propose changes through an electronic system that is going through a test run slated to end in October.  Carriers submit their fare proposals through a network run by Airline Tariff Publishing Co. in Washington.  The department replies through its computers, and response time has shrunk to minutes from days.  Foreign governments are likely to act more quickly on fare changes, too, because they'll get word of U.S. decisions faster.  Because carriers can get speedier approval, they probably will test fare increases and reductions more often in the highly competitive international travel business, says Thomas Moore, the Transportation Department's chief of tariffs.  Eastern Quietly Starts  Boosting Some Prices  SINCE ITS RETURN to the air this summer, Eastern Airlines has repeatedly heralded its price cutting.  But recently the Texas Air Corp. unit began raising fares in some of its markets.  In many cases, prices are being increased by 18% to 33%.  For example, Eastern last week boosted its one-way coach fare between Atlanta and Miami to $199 from $149.  That ticket, popular with business travelers, requires no advance purchase.  Systemwide, the Miami-based carrier also has added new restrictions to its cheapest ticket requiring seven-day advance purchases.  Now, travelers can buy only round-trip tickets, and they can't make their return trip for at least two days.  Before, people could buy the discount tickets for one-way travel.  Initially, Eastern was losing money on the low fares it introduced this summer to entice fliers onto its fleet, hobbled since March by a machinists strike.  But the reduced fares did fill seats.  In Atlanta's Hartsfield International Airport, for instance, Eastern's domestic business has grown from just 4,000 passengers in April to 500,000 in July, or about half the level of business before the strike began.  With such gains, the carrier believes it can afford to raise some prices.  This doesn't mean travelers can't still get good bargains on Eastern.  Whenever it begins a new route, the carrier offers deeply discounted fares.  But Eastern is coy about its increases.  David Kunstler, vice president of planning, says last week Eastern cut fares on 50% of its traffic, but wouldn't detail how many markets that includes.  Regarding increases, Mr. Kunstler would only acknowledge that the airline "adjusted" some fares.  If You Like White Meat,  Skip the Airline Chicken  WHAT HAPPENS to the chicken meat most people don't want?  The airlines feed it to passengers.  More carriers are buying dark, deboned thigh meat, which costs half as much as white meat, say poultry producers.  Stockpiles of the dark meat have swollen in recent years because consumers increasingly prefer white meat.  "It's been a real hard item to move," says Harold Ford, executive vice president of the Southeastern Poultry and Egg Association in Atlanta.  Trans World Airlines is one fan.  It includes thigh meat in teriyaki, barbecue and sweet and sour recipes.  "It reconstitutes very well," says Art Dupree, director of dining services.  A federal judge ordered Dilip Shah, former president of a Par Pharmaceutical Inc. subsidiary, to pay a $250,000 fine and perform 12 months of community service for paying an illegal gratuity to a Food and Drug Administration official.  In Baltimore, District Judge John Hargrove, in sentencing the second defendant in the generic-drug scandal, suspended all but two months of an 18-month prison sentence given to Mr. Shah.  The two months he spends in a prison work-release program will count toward the 12 months of service he will give to the American Cancer Society of Central Indiana.  Mr. Shah, a former FDA staff member and a founder of Par's Indianapolis-based Quad Pharmaceuticals Inc., pleaded guilty earlier to a charge of paying an illegal gratuity of $1,000 in 1987 to Charles Chang, a former FDA branch chief who reviewed new-drug applications.  Mr. Shah's income-tax return for 1988 shows income of about $5.5 million, including proceeds from the sale of his stake in Quad, according to a pre-sentencing memorandum sent to the judge last week by Rep. John Dingell (D., Mich.), chairman of the House Energy and Commerce Committee's investigative panel.  The panel has been probing wrongdoing in the FDA and the generics industry.  Sentencing of Par and Quad, which both have pleaded guilty to one count of paying an illegal gratuity to an FDA official, was postponed yesterday until Oct. 20.  Each company faces a maximum fine of $500,000.  Ashok Patel, a former Par senior vice president who pleaded guilty to giving Mr. Chang about $500, will be sentenced Oct. 17.  Of all the companies caught up in the generic scandal, Par, of Spring Valley, N.Y., has suffered some of the most severe financial setbacks.  It has suspended distribution of all its generic drugs in tablet and capsule form.  The 150 suspended products accounted for about 40% of Par's third-quarter revenue of $27.6 million, according to Richard Nadler, a Par vice president.  At a congressional hearing Monday, FDA officials recounted several instances of bookkeeping irregularities and manufacturing problems at Par and its Quad unit.  U.S. Attorney Breckinridge Willcox, in the meantime, continues to pursue a grand jury investigation of the generic-drug scandal.  Additional indictments are expected in the next few months as the investigators shift their main focus from the FDA to corporate fraud and other misdeeds.  In July, Judge Hargrove gave a three-year suspended sentence to Raj Matkari, a former vice president of Pharmaceutical Basics Inc. of Chicago, and ordered him to pay a $2,000 fine and put in 500 hours of community service.  Mr. Matkari, who has cooperated with the government's investigation, pleaded guilty to paying a $2,000 gratuity to Mr. Chang in 1987.  A deteriorating junk bond market helped spook nervous investors into sending stock and bond prices and the dollar lower.  The stock market bore the brunt of the retreat.  Takeover and brokerage stocks -- the issues that would be hurt the most by junk bond woes -- were among the worst hit.  And a spate of sell programs late in the session drove the Dow Jones Industrial Average down 27.74 points to 2679.52, the first close under 2700 since Aug. 23.  Retreats in the bond and currency markets weren't so pronounced.  The unraveling of the heavily leveraged Campeau Corp. was the focus for much of the day.  As a series of Campeau disclosures rocked the junk bond market, worries spread about the viability of several proposed takeover deals that depend on junk bonds.  But analysts said it wasn't just the junk bond market's problems that hurt stocks.  Growing concern that Friday's trade report will show exports falling short of expectations hurt the dollar, which in turn hurt bond prices.  Traders said the sell-off in bonds sent stock-index futures down, triggering index-arbitrage programs in which traders purchased the futures contracts and sold the underlying stocks.  A.C. Moore, director of research at Argus Research, said that with little economic news to focus on, traders and investors are prone to respond to rumors.  He also pointed out that lower-than-expected auto sales for early September, reported yesterday, may be weighing on investors' minds.  He said the sluggish auto sales show an economy that may be weaker than had been thought last month, when autos were selling briskly because of incentives.  "That may raise a question or two among those who are getting comfortable with the soft-landing theory," he said.  The stock market's retreat in heavier-than-usual trading "shows just how fast investor psychology can change" from the euphoria in mid-August, when the Dow industrials reached a record high, said Eric Miller, chief investment strategist at Donaldson Lufkin Jenrette.  But one junk bond trader, noting that Campeau's problems will make it much more difficult to raise funds for other leveraged buy-outs and takeovers, said: "If leveraged buy-outs are motivating the stock market, then the stock market is too high."  In major market activity:  Stock prices plummeted in active trading.  Volume on the New York Stock Exchange totaled 175.3 million shares.  Declining issues on the Big Board outpaced gainers 912 to 555.  Bond prices slumped.  The Treasury's benchmark 30-year issue lost nearly half a point, or about $5 for each $1,000 of face amount.  The yield on the issue rose to 8.14%.  The dollar was down.  In late New York trading the dollar was quoted at 1.9705 marks and 146.33 yen compared with 1.9863 marks and 146.95 yen.  The other day a small group of fellow constituents and I met with our congressman, a member of the Ways and Means Committee.  Our purpose was to try to change his mind about supporting a two-year cut in the tax rate on capital gains (the "Jenkins plan").  We had many reasons.  The Jenkins plan provides its benefits overwhelmingly to the unneedful rich: 60% of benefits would go to persons with more than $200,000 in income, conferring upon each of them an average tax cut of $9,500.  There is no evidence of likely positive economic effects from the plan: The main source of finance for venture capital is pension funds and other tax-exempt institutional investors, which are not affected by capital gains taxation.  Finally, we worried that the inclusion of commercial property in the break might ignite a sudden sale of real estate, deepening the severe slump in our local market, already among the most depressed in the country.  For all of this, the Jenkins plan may fail to raise any revenue, despite its backers' promises.  While the Joint Tax Committee has estimated a $2.1 billion revenue gain for 1990 from the two-year cut, the Congressional Budget Office warns that this effect depends on estimates of induced changes in asset sales, which are highly conjectural.  All agree, moreover, that whatever revenue the Treasury may gain from the plan in the short run, it will lose after 1991 -- modestly if the tax rate on capital gains is restored; drastically if the cut is extended.  None of these points is new.  However, we too learned from our meeting.  What we learned had to do with the special political circumstances that make the Jenkins Plan, and schemes like it, attractive to Congress.  There is now before the Ways and Means Committee, it develops, a list of special tax provisions due to expire.  These include tax credits for purposes ranging from child care to mortgage revenue bonds to housing rehabilitation to research and development -- all worthy.  Now, under the Gramm-Rudman procedures, none of these "extenders" can be added by the Ways and means Committee, unless the Committee offsets the projected revenue loss for fiscal year 1990 with some other revenue gain.  The president is firmly committed: no new taxes (this year).  And here is the appeal of the Jenkins plan.  Whether or not it will actually raise revenues in the short run, and never mind the fact that it will surely lose revenues massively after 1991, the Jenkins Plan is projected to raise revenues in 1990.  It thus provides the running room, under the Gramm-Rudman procedures, that would permit the Ways and Means Committee to fund the "extenders."  Since none of the alternative capital gains proposals, like indexing, do this, they are noncontenders.  We have here, in other words, a tax cut to finance another tax cut.  What the Jenkins plan really illustrates is the sad state and corrupting influence of the Gramm-Rudman procedures.  That law, whose purpose was to force steady progress toward a balanced budget, has now reached the limits of legislative tolerance for cuts and sacrifice.  Yet the secular religion of budget-balancing remains strong, and no one wishes to say openly that the law is a ass.  Instead, Gramm-Rudman's supporters have quietly given up the fight, and joined forces with traditional politics in schemes to take advantage of a loophole.  The loophole lies in the fact that adherence to Gramm-Rudmann's targets is required only in the projections for the fiscal year budget under consideration.  If expenditures are added to a fiscal year already under way, the law interposes no objections, as with the savings and loan bailout.  And if revenues are cut or spending increased for fiscal years in the future, the law's attitude is also benign.  Gramm-Rudman in its present form thus places a premium on schemes that help "muddle through" the budget for the currently upcoming fiscal year.  The Jenkins Plan is not alone in serving this purpose: So too does the practice of deferring capital and maintenance expenditures from the highway trust fund, at the risk of building up even larger deficits for future years.  There are economic consequences.  Careful economists have long recognized that expected future deficits, not merely the present-year deficit, are among the forces that drive up long-term interest rates.  That being so, schemes like the Jenkins plan pose a double hazard for asset markets.  Not only do they threaten a selloff of long-term stock and bond holdings that could cause a price crash, they add to that potential mayhem by driving up interest rates and so deterring real investment.  What to do?  One cannot, of course, expect congressmen to forgo opportunities like those created by Gramm-Rudman and the Jenkins plan.  But one can hope that they will recognize the high costs of allowing these opportunities to arise, and that they will then change the rules, and so restructure their incentives.  Herewith three suggestions.  First, Congress should close the Gramm-Rudman loophole, and require a complete offset of new expenditures or tax reductions over the full five-year planning horizon.  This would eliminate the Jenkins plan and trust fund abuses.  Similarly, a 60% vote might be required before new spending could be packed into a previously legislated fiscal year.  That would eliminate routine backdating, and also force Congress to deal honestly with emergencies like the S&L bailout, when necessary, by exempting them outright from GrammRudman.  Second, Congress should revise the Gramm-Rudman trajectories, eliminating the foolish, pointless and unattainable goal of zero official deficit by 1993.  That should be replaced with a reasonable and feasible benchmark, such as stabilizing the share of public debt in GNP.  As it happens, this objective has already been roughly achieved.  A stricter but more technical alternative could be reached within a few years without letting future deficits get out of hand.  Finally, Congress should make the choices easier by raising income taxes, beginning with the top rate.  The effective date of such a change can be delayed, to make it consistent with the president's pledge of "no new taxes" (this year).  Then, and only then, the Democratic leadership and the Republican president might sit down and discuss what the real problems and priorities are.  There are some things, gentlemen - -drugs, education, homelessness, the environment -- that could use a little of your attention.  ---  Mr. Galbraith, who teaches at the University of Texas's Johnson School of Public Affairs, is author of "Balancing Acts: Technology, Finance and the American Future" (Basic Books, 1989).  BTR PLC Chief Executive Officer John Cahill said acquisitions will remain a key strategy in the U.K. conglomerate's efforts to balance earnings among its three main regions of operation.  Mr. Cahill, speaking to reporters about the company's half-year results, said BTR continues to look for acquisitions in Europe, its largest market, and in the U.S. and Asia, where it intends to continue expanding as well.  BTR said earlier that pretax profit for the first six months rose 39% to #513 million ($794 million) from #368 million a year earlier, largely as a result of broad-based growth.  Sales rose 34% to #3.5 billion from #2.6 billion against trading profit of #574 million, up 42% from #405 million.  Mr. Cahill said a flurry of acquisitions earlier this year provided about 40% of BTR's pretax earnings growth in the period, underscoring the recent influence of purchases on the group's operations.  "Our strategy is to buy underperforming companies and add value to them," he said.  The following were among yesterday's offerings and pricings in the U.S. and non-U.S. capital markets, with terms and syndicate manager, as compiled by Dow Jones Capital Markets Report:  @ CORPORATES  General Electric Capital Corp. -- $250 million of 8.30% notes due Sept. 20, 2009, won in competitive bidding by a group led by Kidder Peabody & Co. and reoffered at 99.464 to yield 8.386%.  The issue is non-callable and can be put back to the company in nine years.  Rated triple-A by both Moody's Investors Service Inc. and Standard & Poor's Corp., the issue was priced at a yield spread of 25 basis points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  Bank of New England Corp. -- $250 million of 9 7/8% subordinated notes due Sept. 15, 1999, priced at 99.925 to yield 9.886%.  The issue was increased from an originally planned $200 million.  The non-callable notes were priced at 175 basis points over the Treasury's 10-year note.  Rated Baa-1 by Moody's and triple B-plus by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Morgan Stanley & Co.  Societe Generale (New York branch) -- $200 million of 9 1/4% subordinated notes due Sept. 20, 1999, priced at par.  The issue, which is non-callable for five years, was priced at 115 basis points above the Treasury's 10-year note.  Rated double-A-1 by Moody's and double-A by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  Security Pacific Corp. -- $150 million of 8 3/4% notes due Sept. 15, 1994, priced at 99.86 to yield 8.785%.  Rated double-A-3 by Moody's and double-A by S&P, the issue will be sold through underwriters led by Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  The issue was priced at 67 basis points above the Treasury's five-year note.  Baxter International Inc. -- $150 million of 9 1/4% notes, due Sept. 15, 1996, priced at par.  Rated single-A-3 by Moody's and triple-B-plus by S&P, the non-callable issue will be sold through underwriters led by Merrill Lynch Capital Markets.  The issue was priced at 115 basis points above the Treasury's seven-year note.  Bruno's Inc. -- $125 million of 6 1/2% convertible subordinated debentures due Sept. 1, 2009, priced at par.  The debentures are convertible into common at $15 a share, representing a 21.21% conversion premium over yesterday's closing price.  Rated Baa-1 by Moody's and triple-B-minus by S&P, the issue will be sold through Robinson-Humphrey Co.  The issue is non-callable for three years.  A sinking fund is scheduled to begin in 1999 that will retire 60% of the issue before maturity.  @ MUNICIPALS  Rhode Island Housing and Mortgage Finance Corp. -- $149 million of home ownership bonds tentatively priced by a Goldman Sachs & Co. group to yield from 6.90% in 1995 to 7.875% in 2022.  Lake County, Ill., Forest Preserve District -- $80 million of land acquisition development bonds, tentatively priced by a Donaldson, Lufkin & Jenrette Securities Corp. group to yield from 6.20% in 1991 to 7.20% in 2008.  The bonds are rated double-A/double-A.  Serial bonds are priced at par.  Term bonds have coupons of 7 1/8% priced at 99 1/2 to yield 7.174% in 2007, 6 1/4% priced to yield 7.10% in 2008 and 6 1/4% priced to yield 7.10% in 2009.  Virgin Islands Public Facility Authority -- $76.8 million of revenue bonds tentatively priced by a Bear Stearns & Co. group to yield from 6% in 1990 to 7.25% in 2007.  The bonds are rated single-A-1/single-A.  Serial bonds are being reoffered at par to yield from 6% in 1990 to 7.15% in 2002.  Term bonds have a 7 1/4% coupon and are priced at par.  Indianapolis -- $66 million of series 1989A gas utility system revenue bonds, tentatively priced by a Goldman Sachs & Co. group to yield from 6% in 1991 to 7.20% in 2020.  The bonds are insured and triple-A-rated.  Serial bonds are priced at par to yield from 6% in 1991 to 6.90% in 2001.  Term bonds have coupons of 7% priced to yield 7.10% and 7.10% priced at 98 3/4 to yield 7.20%.  South Coast Air Quality Management District, Calif. -- $60 million of refunding revenue bonds priced late Tuesday via a Stone & Youngberg group to yield from 6.20% in 1992 to 7.20% in 2014.  Zero-coupon bonds yield from 7% in 2003 to 7.10% in 2008.  The 7.20% term tranche due in 2014 was priced at par.  The bonds are insured.  Pittsburgh -- $60 million of Series 1989 improvement bonds apparently won by a Prudential-Bache group.  The bonds, insured and triple-A-rated, were priced for reoffering to yield from 5.75% in 1990 to 7.167% in 2014.  @ MORTGAGES  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. -- $750 million of 8.30% one-year debentures priced at par.  Freddie Mac said the debentures were priced to yield five basis points more than a Treasury issue of comparable maturity.  The noncallable debentures mature Sept. 21, 1990.  The offering will be sold through Freddie Mac's 17-member debentures selling group of banks and securities dealers.  The minimum order is $5,000, with additional increments of $5,000.  The debentures are available in book-entry form only.  Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corp. -- A $400 million Remic, Series 90, was offered through Goldman Sachs & Co. using Freddie Mac 9 1/2% securities as collateral; and a $400 million Remic, Series 91, using Freddie Mac 9% securities as collateral was also offered, underwritten by First Boston Corp. No pricing details were available.  Federal National Mortgage Association -- $300.4 million of Remic mortgage securities offered in 13 classes by Shearson Lehman Hutton Inc.  The offering, Series 1989-66, backed by Fannie Mae 10% securities, brings Fannie Mae's 1989 Remic issuance to $23.9 billion and its total issuance to $36 billion since the program began in April 1987.  Pricing details weren't available from the underwriter.  @ EUROBONDS  TMC Pimbs First Financing PLC (vehicle) -- #250 million of mortgage-backed floating-rate notes, due July 31, 2029, via Salomon Brothers International.  The notes pay three-month London interbank offered rate plus 0.18, increasing to Libor plus 0.50 after 10 years, priced at par but reoffered at a fixed level of 88.93.  Callable at par after five years if less than 10% of the issue remains outstanding, otherwise after 10 years.  Average life 7.2 years.  Fees 0.27.  Toyota Motor Credit Corp. (Japanese parent) -- 150 million Canadian dollars of 10 3/8% Eurobonds due Oct. 13, 1994, priced at 101 3/4 to yield 10.41% less fees, via Nomura International Ltd. Fees 1 7/8.  Unilever N.V. -- 100 million European currency units of 8 7/8% Eurobonds due Nov 6, 1992, priced at 101.56 to yield 8.80% less full fees, via Istituto Bancario San Paolo di Torino.  Fees 1 3/8.  While U.S. government and industry officials fret about the nation's lagging development of the next generation of television technology, a U.S. company has stuck a foot in the door of the Japanese TV effort.  Texas Instruments Inc. of Dallas said yesterday it will pay an undisclosed fee to receive basic semiconductor technology for high-definition television developed by Japan's public broadcasting entity, NHK, and a group of leading Japanese electronics companies.  Even Texas Instruments officials said it will be months before they can ascertain the practical significance of the pact.  That's when they'll find out whether NHK will transfer enough advanced technology to allow Texas Instruments to develop a competitive chip, and whether Japanese makers will actually buy chips from the U.S. company instead of from their own semicondctor operations.  But the announcement is symbolically important on many levels.  The Japanese are considered far ahead of the U.S. in developing HDTV, which gives a much clearer picure than existing TVs and also includes advanced technologies that can be used in many electronics fields.  As a result, the technology has become a rallying point for many in the U.S. concerned about technological competitiveness with Japan.  The agreement comes shortly after Japanese and U.S. government officials began negotiations over structural impediments to foreign business success in the Japanese market.  Americans often complain that Japanese companies quietly band together to develop basic technologies, and effectively block foreign companies from participating.  Japanese HDTV development is a commonly cited example.  The pact also addresses one of the demands of the U.S. semiconductor industry.  Earlier this summer, the Japanese electronics trade organization promised to explore giving U.S. chip makers a bigger portion of the Japanese HDTV business.  The Texas Instruments pact also marks a rare example of technology being transferred from Japan to a U.S. company.  Americans often complain that Japanese companies rose to power by taking easily accessible U.S.-developed technology and then refused to return the favor.  The timing of the Texas Instruments announcement was also good for the Japanese.  It came in the middle of a visit here by U.S. Commerce Secretary Robert Mosbacher, one of the most vocal critics of Japanese trade policies in the Bush administration.  During his visit, Mr. Mosbacher has pushed for greater technological cooperation between Japanese and U.S. companies as a way to avoid trade tensions.  Mr. Mosbacher, asked at a news conference here yesterday about HDTV development, said it "should be a two-way street -- this would be a good example for building that basis."  Some Americans expressed skepticism about the agreement.  "It sounds like borrowing the running shoes of your opponent when he's halfway around the track; it doesn't help much," said John P. Stern, a vice president of the American Electronics Association, which has been actively lobbying for the U.S. government to support a domestic HDTV industry.  He added, however, that he wasn't familiar with the details of the pact.  But Texas Instruments, in its official release, said its access to the so-called MUSE technology will "give it the system knowledge needed to design integrated circuits for advanced televisions" and will "increase its penetration of the Japanese semiconductor market."  The company said that in the next year, NHK will give lectures and "extensive question-and-answer sessions" explaining NHK's decoder, memory codes and other technologies to Texas Instruments officials.  Texas Instruments said it will use the technology to develop "state-of-the-art" equipment.  NHK officials couldn't be reached for comment.  The world foreign-exchange market has more than doubled in the past three years to average daily trading of over $500 billion.  And Japan -- its market, its institutions and its currency -- is playing a bigger role.  New data from the world's central banks portrays a huge global currency market where speculation, investing and hedging wash across international borders almost instantaneously.  The huge turnover in global currency markets -- in aggregate, the world's biggest financial market -- dwarfs trading in more familiar financial instruments such as stocks and bonds.  For example, the average daily foreign-exchange trading volume of over $500 billion compares with an average daily trading volume of $125 billion to $150 billion in U.S. government securities in America and $6.2 billion on the New York Stock Exchange.  London remains the world's largest currency market, with daily turnover of $187 billion.  The U.S. is second, at $128.9 billion, followed by Japan, at $115.2 billion.  But Japan's share of world currency trading has grown over the past three years, while London's has fallen.  The U.S. share has remained relatively stable.  Geoffrey Dennis, chief economist for the U.S. unit of James Capel & Co. in New York, said: "The underlying theme is that Japan is getting big and becoming more important."  Margaret L. Greene, senior vice president in charge of foreign-exchange operations at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, said that the growth of global currency markets has outpaced that of the output of goods and services in the world and the volume of world trade.  She said that the foreign-exchange market's size reflected the growing integration of the world's economies and financial markets, as well as some financial institutions' desire to expand into currency trading and a growing desire on the part of other institutions to manage their currency risk exposure.  Daily average foreign-exchange trading volume in the U.S. has more than doubled to $128.9 billion from $58.5 billion in 1986, according to the New York Fed.  The Bank of England reported that trading in the London market is up 108% to $187 billion from $90 billion three years ago.  Over the same period, volume in Japan soared 140% to $115.2 billion from $48 billion three years ago.  But despite the world currency market's explosive growth, Nicholas P. Sargen, an international economist at Salomon Brothers Inc., said that size alone didn't necessarily mean that it was more difficult for central banks to try to guide the market through intervention and other tactics.  "Intervention occurs at the margin," he said, with central banks buying and selling currencies at critical moments so they can have the maximum effect on exchange rates.  He added that the effect of an intervention also depends on whether central banks adjust for it in their domestic markets.  The new data on the global currency market is gleaned from surveys released simultaneously by central banks of several major countries, including the U.S., Britain and Japan.  At least 12 smaller central banks also conducted separate analyses of their respective currency markets.  The surveys were done during 20 business days in April.  The data provided plenty of evidence of Japan's growing clout in the world's foreign-exchange market.  Japan's central bank, for instance, reported that trading between banks in Japan and institutions overseas had grown 180% from 1986, compared with a 100% increase in purely domestic foreign-exchange trading between banks located in Japan.  A spokesman for the Bank of Japan read that as a sign of Japan's growing importance as an international financial center.  In addition, Japanese financial institutions' share of the London market's volume increased to 11% from 7% in 1986.  And the yen's share of U.S. market volume grew, mainly at the expense of the British pound and Canadian dollar.  The mark remained the most actively traded foreign currency in the U.S., with the yen second, pound third and Swiss franc fourth, followed by the Canadian dollar and French franc.  Among nonbanks in the U.S., such as securities firms, the yen ranked as the most traded currency, with average daily turnover more than tripling.  Ms. Greene said that the yen's increased role in part reflected the growing importance of Japan in the world economy and world markets, the yen's growing significance as a currency for international transactions and the increased role of Japanese financial institutions.  Overall, the New York Fed said that currency trading in the U.S. had grown at annual compound rate of 30% since 1980; commercial banks accounted for 85% of the turnover in the U.S. market this year.  All but a tiny share of the transactions in the most recent survey involved buying or selling U.S. dollars; so-called cross currency trades that don't involve the dollar accounted for just three to four percent of all trades.  The New York Fed also reported that currency trading in the U.S. was widely dispersed.  Thirty-one institutions each accounted for 1% or more of market turnover.  The 10 largest institutions accounted for 42.2% of the turnover.  Eight of the top 10 institutions in 1986 were also among the top 10 in the 1989 survey, but only one of the top five in 1986 remained in the top five this year.  The Fed refused to identify these big traders.  Ms. Greene said the Fed had no information on what percentage of the total currency turnover in the U.S. market could be attributed to outright speculation.  She added: "Our best guess is that 12% of the transaction volume of banks and nonbanks is with institutions outside the wholesale market," or that which comprises financial institutions trading among themselves.  Among smaller currency markets, respective central banks reported average daily volume in the Swiss market at $57 billion, Hong Kong at $49 billion, France at $26 billion, Holland at $16 billion, and Canada at $15 billion.  West Germany's Bundesbank didn't participate in the current survey.  Only the U.S., Japan, Britain and Canada surveyed their markets in 1986.  Figures for each country were adjusted to eliminate double counting of transactions where both sides of a transaction were conducted within a country's domestic market.  But the Fed warned that double counting internationally -- for instance, a bank in New York selling to one in London -- can give an exaggerated picture of the size of the world market.  Ms. Greene said that the central banks were discussing trying to cleanse the international data of cross-border double counting at a later date.  The Wall Street Journal will begin publishing next Tuesday a series of stories based on the results of a comprehensive study of consumer buying habits and attitudes.  "The American Way of Buying," a national consumer study, was conducted for the Journal by two of America's leading pollsters, Peter D. Hart Research Associates and the Roper Organization.  "The stories will go far beyond the raw survey data," says Norman Pearlstine, the Journal's managing editor.  "Wall Street Journal reporters across the country are interviewing consumers, marketing consultants and experts in different industries to help interpret and analyze the survey results."  Stories will focus on such subjects as consumer attitudes about investing and shopping, Americans' entertainment and fitness habits, their retirement goals and the amount of confidence people have in major industries.  Stories will appear each week on the front page of the Marketplace section throughout the rest of the year.  "The study is the latest example of The Wall Street Journal's expanded commitment to coverage of marketing and the marketplace," Mr. Pearlstine says.  For the Journal survey, two separate nationwide, face-to-face public-opinion polls were conducted by Hart and Roper.  Each pollster interviewed slightly more than 2,000 people in their homes for 45 minutes to one hour.  The study, produced in conjunction with the Journal's centennial, also takes a look at business travel.  More than 400 frequent travelers -- those who take more than 12 business trips a year -- were interviewed by phone in a third survey.  Four months after it put itself on the block, Circle K Corp. said that no bidders emerged and the company took down the for-sale sign.  Circle K, the nation's second-largest convenience store operator, also said its board voted to suspend the company's common-stock dividend in the latest quarter.  The move comes in the wake of a 39% drop in net income in the company's first quarter ended July 31.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, Circle K shares fell $1.75 to $7.75 on turnover of 1.7 million shares.  On May 22, after the company announced it was officially on the block and its chairman might propose a leveraged buy-out, the shares had spurted $1.125 to close at $14.25.  Several parties "expressed an interest possibly in acquiring the company," but no proposals were received by a special committee of outside directors set up to evaluate various financial options, Circle K said in a brief statement yesterday.  Company officials couldn't be reached to elaborate on the statement or to discuss reasons for the dividend omission.  The only potential bid that was publicly discussed was from the chairman, Karl Eller, who owns 7.1% of Circle K's common shares.  Several months ago, Mr. Eller retained financial advisers in connection with a possible leveraged buy-out of the company, but he apparently never made a formal bid.  Some analysts speculated at the time that Mr. Eller might be tired of the convenience-store business and more interested in selling the company than in buying it.  Mr. Eller has declined in the past to be interviewed on that speculation and other matters related to the proposed sale, and couldn't be reached yesterday.  Circle K said that its board decided to end its search for a buyer upon the recommendation of the special committee's financial adviser.  The board also decided not to pursue a recapitalization of the company and asked managers to "devote their full energies" to strengthening operations.  The adviser, the merchant banking firm of Wasserstein, Perella & Co., told the committee that a leveraged buy-out probably couldn't be financed now at a fair price to shareholders because of the weak market for high-yield securities and the company's poor operating results.  In its fiscal first quarter, Circle K reported profit of $7.6 million, or 13 cents a share, down from $12.4 million, or 25 cents a share, a year ago.  Revenue climbed 25% to $1 billion from $816 million.  The market for high-yield convenience-store securities has been severely depressed in recent weeks in the wake of operating problems at Southmark Corp., the nation's largest convenience-store operator, which went private in a leveraged buy-out in 1987.  Poor operating results at Dairy Mart Convenience Stores Inc. apparently caused a major bank recently to suspend financing for a management-led buy-out of the company.  Circle K, like other convenience-store operators, has been buffeted by increased competition as oil companies have opened their own convenience stores.  In addition, Circle K has engaged in a massive expansion in the past year, which substantially increased its debt-to-equity ratio.  In recent quarters, Circle K has paid a regular dividend of seven cents a share on common.  While the common dividend will be suspended for the latest quarter, Circle K said its board declared a cash dividend of $2 a share on its $8 cumulative convertible series A preferred stock.  The dividend will be paid on Sept. 28.  Claiming a chemistry breakthrough with major implications for composite materials, General Electric Co. researchers said they have developed a technique to manipulate the fundamental nature of molecules in plastics.  They said the technology allows plastic molecules to penetrate and embed themselves in the network of fibers of other materials, creating extremely strong composites that are light and easy to fabricate.  Such bonding had been difficult because of molten plastics' high viscosity.  "This is a significant advance that opens doors for new applications previously denied to plastics," said John W. Verbicky Jr., manager of GE Research and Development Center's Chemical Synthesis Laboratory.  He said new uses might include parts in a wide range of industries where engineers seek to replace conventional materials such as steel, aluminum and glass with structural composites.  Some researchers working on similar technologies elsewhere said they weren't familiar with the details of GE's breakthrough, but they acknowledged the formidable challenge in getting resin to completely bond with reinforcement materials in forming composites.  "It's a major problem.  If GE can do it, that will be a significant accomplishment," said Curtis W. Frank, professor of chemical engineering at Stanford University, a center for composite materials research in the country.  Composites are considered the materials of the future for such uses as all-plastic autos, ceramic engines and supersonic planes.  Alan Miller, another Stanford professor, estimates that half the structure of the next generation of military aircraft will consist of composites, compared with 10% in current aircraft.  Composites are engineered by bonding different materials to achieve desired properties, particularly strength.  Thermoplastics, which flow when heated and lend themselves well to reshaping, have been important for composites.  GE's new technology "holds long-range possibilities" for a new generation of such plastics, Mr. Verbicky said.  Some of GE's more than two dozen chemists and engineers who have been working on thermoplastic composites for nearly six years will present a series of technical papers on the subject tomorrow at a meeting of the American Chemical Society in Miami.  A typical composite consists of a network, or matrix, of carbon or glass fibers embedded in plastic resin.  Until now, the thickness, or viscosity, of molten thermoplastic resin has prevented it from flowing into all the voids in that matrix, thus limiting its strength.  The molten resin is thick because its building blocks, known as monomers, link to form long chains, called polymers, which tangle easily with one another to form a viscous melt.  GE scientists say they have "tricked" the monomers with a catalyst to form rings instead of long chains.  These cyclic, or ring-like atomic structures, prevent them from tangling.  The resulting molten resin is "like light machine oil and easily slips into the tight spaces" within the complex fiber-reinforcing network, Mr. Verbicky said.  Once the resin occupies all the nooks and crannies, another catalyst is applied to open up the rings into linear chains, which returns the resin to its natural viscosity, a state that gives plastic much of its inherent strength, he said.  Mr. Verbicky said that molecules generally attach to the ends of other molecules to form linear chains.  The GE catalyst, however, causes the chemical chain at a certain point to "recognize" the end of its own chain, instead of the end of another chain.  It links to itself, forming a ring.  Previously, there has been limited success in inducing monomers to form rings, but the process took days to complete and offered little practical use.  "We are able to make very large rings in a very simple process, in less than two hours," Mr. Verbicky said.  He said the cyclic resin can be produced in powder form.  This powder, and the catalyst to open the chains, can be packed into carbon or glass matrix.  When the whole infrastructure is heated, the molten resin fills the matrix and the second catalyst is triggered at a predetermined time to break up the rings and harden the melt.  He said GE researchers have developed catalysts with varying "trigger times" for different fabrication processes.  Most contemporary movie dialogue isn't worth listening to, especially action-picture talk.  What seems to matter is the blam-blam, or Mel Gibson's grin -- both of which, I admit, have an appeal.  But a proficient script still makes an astonishing difference in a movie's pleasure quotient, and Richard Price's screenplay makes "Sea of Love" a pleasurable experience indeed.  Yes, it's another detective story featuring a middle-aged cop who drinks too much and whose wife has left him.  Yes, he's little and his buddy is big (a variation on the white cop/black cop, old cop/young cop theme).  Yes, he falls for a sensual woman who may or may not be the killer in the case he's working on.  What's new -- or, rather, old --is the way the movie captures the emotional chaos and absurdity that should always be present in these stock situations but that almost never are anymore.  The "Sea of Love" characters are tricky, human.  And Mr. Price, who has written four novels, has given them such good talk.  This isn't surprising considering the promise in his first two produced screenplays, "The Color of Money" and the Scorsese segment of "New York Stories."  Here, his gritty street-wise dialogue sounds real, not like some Hollywood hack's idea of the way New York tough guys talk.  The story's good, too, with enough convincing plot twists to keep even a jaded connoisseur of suspense off-guard.  Al Pacino plays Frank Keller, the cop who won't take advantage of his chance to retire after 20 years on the force.  It's a role that can be added to the list of Pacino's great New York characters.  And it's terrific to see this daring actor holding the screen again, having recovered from his catastrophic participation in "Revolution."  His Keller's no Serpico, driven by virtue to near-madness.  Like Keller, Pacino's older, calmer.  The wildness around his hollow black eyes has softened.  Now he just looks weary, slowed down by booze and the extra weight he's carrying on his bantam frame.  Murder doesn't interest him much, but he can't help getting interested in a serial killer who seems to choose her victims from the personal ads in a slick city weekly.  After all, he's a lonely guy himself, just too cheap or too embarrassed to advertise for dates.  He and his partner, the ebullient John Goodman (who's given room to do some nice comic riffs), place their own personal ad, hoping to lure the killer.  There's a remarkable lack of glibness in the singles-bar scene, where Keller chats up his "dates" just long enough to collect their fingerprints on their wineglasses.  Mr. Pacino gets the empathy and misery just right, as he picks up and quickly drops first an older woman who thinks she's getting the brush, then an acid-tongued harridan.  Then he meets Helen (Ellen Barkin), a foxy single mother Keller swiftly falls for.  So did I; Ms. Barkin's so perfectly cast, so good at keeping you guessing.  Is Helen just another pretty woman trying to find a partner and a father for her child, or is she a vicious man-hating murderer?  She doesn't slip.  It's partly her face that keeps you off-guard.  Everything is slightly crooked.  So one minute she looks like one tough cookie; turn her a couple of degrees and the same features seem utterly vulnerable.  At all times she's highly erotic.  It's true that Ms. Barkin is too often remembered for her sensuality, if she's remembered at all.  But maybe this picture will get her a bigger audience than just those of us who came to appreciate her talent in "Diner," "The Big Easy," "Desert Bloom," "Enormous Changes at the Last Minute" and "Down by Law."  Director Harold Becker ("The Onion Field," "Taps," "Boost") doesn't have a virtuoso style -- the lighting is just dreary -- but he has enough feel for his edgy material to keep it all moving without losing the script's keen sense of New York nerves.  ---  By the time "In Country" was over, there was nothing I could say I liked about the mysteriously sought-after young British actress, Emily Lloyd.  I was even starting to hate her navel. (Director Norman Jewison insists on repeated shots of Emily jogging with his lens pointed at her exposed bellybutton.)  This movie, based on Bobbie Ann Mason's poignant tales of backwoods Kentuckians coming to terms with the Vietnam War, has a worthy premise: How does a young woman come to peace with the war that killed her father before she was born, a war that no one really wants to talk about?  Mr. Jewison knows how to entertain audiences ("Moonstruck," "The Cincinnati Kid"), but he also has a desire to improve them at the same time ("In the Heat of the Night," "Agnes of God").  Here he abandoned entertainment for sanctimony almost completely when he miscast Ms. Lloyd as the person who must carry the movie and accepted the dreary, speechifying script by Frank Pierson and Cynthia Cidre.  Ms. Lloyd spends most of the movie arching her eyebrows -- apparently her way of expressing interest or great emotion -- and spitting her dialogue, in a Southern accent that's only minimally more believable than her Brooklynese in "Cookie," the other movie she's currently appearing in.  She keeps pestering the other main character -- her uncle Emmett (Bruce Willis), a rather shell-shocked Vietnam veteran -- about what happened "over there."  Understandably, he doesn't want to cough up those awful experiences.  But Ms. Lloyd's insistent question gets so irritating that I found myself silently begging Emmett to tell her already, so we could all leave.  Mr. Willis looks a little silly with his Fu Manchu mustache, but otherwise isn't given enough screen time to embarrass himself.  Many of the subsidiary characters are well played but given short shrift, especially Kevin Anderson as the girl's boyfriend.  Yet audiences may feel compelled to weep at the ending, a cheap, tear-wringing scene that's about as effective an emotional manipulation as the TV commercials for long-distance telephone calls.  ---  VIDEO TIP: "Sea of Love" isn't the first movie to entangle its hero with a lover who might be a killer.  In Alfred Hitchcock's "Suspicion," Joan Fontaine plays the mousy wife who becomes convinced her elusive husband (Cary Grant) is trying to murder her.  "The Jagged Edge," a popular 1985 release, had Glenn Close playing a defense attorney who falls for her client (Jeff Bridges), a man accused of murdering his wife.  Let's just say that Jeff Bridges isn't Cary Grant.  Surgeon General C. Everett Koop took a last swipe at the tobacco business in a vitriolic attack calling for an outright ban on cigarette advertising.  In testimony before a congressional subcommittee, Dr. Koop also lambasted several cigarette ads by name, and said that "much of today's advertising for tobacco products is deceptive."  Singled out for special criticism were ads for Lorillard's Newport, Brown & Williamson's Kool, and RJR Nabisco's Camel cigarette brands.  The surgeon general, who steps down at month's end, used the hearing as a platform to take his parting shot at cigarette companies.  He labeled Newport's "Alive with Pleasure" slogan as "clearly . . . designed to undermine the surgeon general's warning," and quipped, "truth in advertising would demand use of the slogan, 'Dying in Agony'" instead.  Dr. Koop made his remarks on behalf of a bill proposing a ban on the use of pictures in cigarette ads, and allowing only all-print "tombstone" ads.  The surgeon general, who has long advocated an all-out ban on cigarette advertising, said he supported the bill only "as a reasonable compromise."  He added, "I would continue to endorse a total advertising ban as a long-term goal."  The surgeon general also lent his support to the bill's proposed ban on cigarette vending machines in public places accessible to children.  "Would we tolerate the sale of alcoholic beverages through vending machines?" he asked.  "Of course not.  Why, then, should we be so permissive with the sale of tobacco . . . ?"  Dr. Koop's influence is limited, at best, however, and it isn't clear that his plea will have much effect in promoting the bill -- much less a total ad ban.  He has already relinquished his duties to acting Surgeon General James Mason, and officially retires Oct. 1.  And he prefaced his testimony by noting that his views "are my own and do not represent those of the administration."  Cigarette industry executives were quick to downplay his remarks.  A spokeswoman for the Tobacco Institute, a trade group, said Dr. Koop was "putting forth a good quote instead of thoughtfully presenting a case which could justify censorship."  She added, "It may be a case of preaching to the converted.  He isn't bringing anything new to the table, and he isn't bringing anything compelling to the table."  Still, the surgeon general's stand gives the anti-cigarette ad forces an added measure of firepower, even as their number and influence grows.  Several congressional efforts are under way to restrict cigarette advertising, with the tombstone-ad bill proposed by Rep. Tom Luken (D., Ohio) among the most visible.  At the same time, ad industry executives are increasingly nervous about the Supreme Court's recent decisions favoring restrictions on commercial speech.  Dr. Koop took issue with the cigarette industry's contention that banning cigarette advertising would be unconstitutional, since selling cigarettes is legal.  "An advertising ban seems to me to be a reasonable middle ground between the status quo and a total prohibition of tobacco use," he said.  He also cited as "highly objectionable" two recent cigarette ads: a Kool campaign "that clearly targets young people"; and a Camel ad, with advice for picking up babes at the beach and a picture of a muscular hunk carrying a woman out of the surf, which he said "suggests violence against women."  A spokeswoman for RJR Nabisco, which makes Camel cigarettes, said, "We ran that ad just one time and it was meant to be a lighthearted, tongue-in-cheek approach.  We never intended to offend anyone."  At Brown & Williamson, which makes Kool, a spokeswoman said, "We believe that smoking is an adult custom.  Our advertising is clearly directed only towards adult smokers."  The proposed legislation, she added, "is an attempt to legislate personal behavior that is both unfair and discriminatry to adult smokers."  ---  Ad Notes . . . .   OMNICOM GROUP: Omnicom sold a majority interest in ARA Group, its subsidiary in the Netherlands, to BDDP Group Paris.  Terms weren't disclosed.  Omnicom said it will continue to hold a 15% interest in the firm and ARA executives will obtain a substantial minority in the agency.  WHO'S NEWS: David Perry, 45, was named executive vice president, director of broadcast production at Saatchi & Saatchi Advertising, New York.  WHO'S BAD?  L.A. Gear Inc. said it has signed singer Michael Jackson to design and market world-wide a line of Michael Jackson fashion sneakers.  The agreement is valued at more than $20 million, and will run for between 18 months and two years.  The theme of the marketing campaign will be "unstoppable."  L.A. Gear said the agreement, effective immediately, is the first in which Mr. Jackson is actively involved in design of a product.  Every investor has heard about how crucial it is to diversify, but many people -- even some with varied stock and bond holdings -- probably don't realize how undiversified they really are.  "Individuals rarely take an overall view" when it comes to diversification, says Michael Lipper, who heads Lipper Analytical Services.  "They think of it in terms of different chunks of money" they have invested in stocks, bonds, cash and other assets.  In reality, "securities are only one part of the total {diversification} picture -- and not even the most important one at that."  Take the case of a young Wall Street executive with a mortgaged cooperative apartment in lower Manhattan.  A diversified stock portfolio would actually compound, not lessen, such an individual's risk because all those "assets" -- job, home and savings -- are heavily exposed to the vagaries of the stock market.  In a similar vein, Lawrence Manchester, head of the private-client group at Standish, Ayer & Wood, says he would advise a client who owns a car agency to avoid long-term bonds, utilities and insurance stocks.  Those investments, just like the car business, are "very interest-rate sensitive," he says.  For that client, diversification means "fixing it so that when his company goes in the dumper every four years, he's protected in his portfolio."  The way the professionals see it, diversification for individuals isn't driven by fancy theories about market volatility.  Instead, they say, it starts with a basic grasp of personal economic risk.  "I'd always ask myself at the start of the analysis, 'What's the worst that could happen to me?  And the next worst?' -- and build a portfolio strategy based on that," says Russell Fogler of Aronson + Fogler, a Philadelphia money-management firm.  "It's a sequential process."  At different points in an individual's investing lifetime, diversification has two roles to play, the pros say.  Initially, its function is to protect the individual from being hit hard by losses in basic "assets," such as job, home and purchasing power.  "Most people don't think of their job as their No. 1 investment," says Mr. Lipper.  "But over their lifetime, it's salary, insurance and pension benefits that will wind up setting their whole investment picture."  The second purpose of diversification is to protect against the long-term risk of "outliving one's capital" once the job ends, says Mr. Lipper.  In this context, says Owen Quattlebaum, head of personal financial services at Brown Brothers Harriman & Co., diversification means "branching out into other, risky assets" such as stocks and bonds.  In other words, it becomes "something genuinely defined as a way to make money," he says.  What strategies should the individual use to hedge these risks?  The pros offer some advice:  JOB RISK.  At the end of a long economic expansion, especially in this age of corporate restructurings and increasing foreign competition, job risk -- unemployment and other factors that threaten income and benefits -- is relatively high.  In such a hazardous environment, individuals should safeguard their option of seeking new opportunity elsewhere.  Depending on how marketable a person's skills are and how vulnerable his or her industry is, everyone should hold between three months' and a year's worth of after-tax salary in short-term cash investments, such as bank deposits and moneymarket funds, the specialists say.  Additionally, says Mr. Lipper, an individual should hedge against the loss of three to 12 months of pension and other benefits -- a sum usually equal to about a third of pretax salary.  That money should be invested in risky assets, such as stocks and long-term bonds.  "In this barbell strategy, individuals should be as aggressive as they can stomach on the far end," he says.  HOUSE RISK.  A mortgaged home is probably the individual's major exposure to "the factors in the local area that will vibrate with the job risk and, in effect, double up the job risk," says Mr. Quattlebaum of Brown Brothers.  The risk of having to meet house payments while searching for a new job would probably be covered by the cash reserves mentioned above.  However, says Mr. Lipper, people who think they might have to sell their home and move to find employment in another area should consider protecting themselves against potential losses.  Today's "short-term weakness in housing prices might entail a 10% to 20% hit to the equity in your house," compared with what it would cost to buy a comparable home in a more-vibrant area, he says.  He recommends setting aside money to cover that potential shortage and buying "intermediate bonds of one to five years' maturity and roll them over -- so that you get a reasonable interest rate."  In the years ahead, houses -- and real-estate assets generally -- present another risk: "They will not be as effective a hedge against inflation as in the 1970s because the country is so overbuilt," says Barry Berlin, vice president at First Wachovia Capital Management.  Rolled-over positions in intermediate bonds, as well as stocks and foreign securities, could help offset that risk.  INTERNATIONAL RISK. Individuals are increasingly exposed to international risks -- not only as employees in industries facing tough foreign competition, but also as consumers of imported goods ranging from cars and television sets to shoes and wine.  For that reason, the pros recommend building long-term investments -- eventually reaching 10% or even 20% of total securities holdings -- in international stock and bond funds.  Such diversification "also tends to reduce portfolio volatility," says Mr. Quattlebaum.  "It's not that you're betting for or against the dollar, you're adding something that will smooth out risk" and potentially boost portfolio returns, he says.  International risks are especially acute for employees in industries such as "steel, autos, chemicals, farming, semiconductors and, to some degree, banking," says Mr. Lipper.  These investors may also want to emphasize U.S. shares that are relatively protected from foreign competition, such as pharmaceutical, retail-trade and insurance stocks.  RETIREMENT RISK.  Many U.S. consumers aren't prepared for the loss of earnings power that comes with retirement.  "The need to build capital {for retirement} is enormous," says Mr. Lipper.  "Most people make the mistake of not saving enough and not having their money work hard enough for them, because they underestimate the risk" of falling short late in life.  Investors should pursue the most-aggressive investment strategy they can stand with retirement savings, because the long time horizon skews the odds in their favor, the pros say.  For instance, data for the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index going back to 1926 indicate that the odds for losing money in stocks over one year are around 30%.  But over 10 years, the risk of loss falls to just 4%.  Allocating a portfolio among different assets reduces risk even further.  For most individuals, liquid savings and homeownership probably provide enough exposure to cash and real estate.  For the rest, the pros recommend earmarking 60% to 70% of retirement funds to stocks and 30% to 40% to long-term bonds, in line with what professional pension managers do.  Non-U.S. stocks and bonds should make up 10% to 20% of the total portfolio, they add.  City Attorney James Hahn capped a five-month investigation into Mayor Tom Bradley's financial dealings by filing a civil lawsuit against the mayor for allegedly improper reporting of certain securities holdings.  Mr. Bradley also faces problems as federal investigators continue to probe his financial relationship with former Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc. junk bond chief Michael Milken.  In addition, Mr. Hahn referred his findings to the Los Angeles County district attorney, the state attorney general, the state Fair Political Practices Commission and the U.S. Comptroller of the Currency.  No criminal charges were filed as a result of Mr. Hahn's investigation.  Nevertheless, Mr. Hahn attacked the mayor's conduct.  "Just because we found no violation of law does not mean that what the mayor did was right," he said.  In a 45-minute televised address, Mr. Bradley responded point by point to the report.  "When all is said and done, the inquiry confirms what I have said all along.  I did not engage in conflicts of interest.  I did not violate the public's trust."  As for the alleged violations in reporting his investments, Mr. Bradley said, "The errors I made were not deliberate.  They show only that I'm not an accountant, and I shouldn't have tried to be one.  These were technical violations of a civil nature -- nothing more."  In the introduction to his 691-page report, Mr. Hahn said his investigation was limited to conflict-of-interest questions and "did not intrude into the exclusive province of other authorities," specifically the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Mr. Hahn gave information about the 71-year-old mayor's stock transactions to the SEC in May.  Mr. Hahn's six-count suit alleges that the mayor "intentionally or negligently" violated disclosure requirements under the state's Political Reform Act.  In early August, Mr. Bradley filed amended financial interest statements with the Los Angeles city clerk and the Fair Political Practices Commission, which showed discrepancies with earlier filings.  The investments that Mr. Hahn alleges were improperly reported include: as much as $100,000 of Metromedia Inc. bonds purchased Dec. 31, 1984, and disposed of March 7, 1986; as much as $10,000 of L.A. Gear Inc. common stock bought and sold July 1, 1986; more than $100,000 of Cadence Design Systems Inc. common stock, purchased Dec. 14, 1988; more than $100,000 of common stock of CVN Cos., purchased Sept. 9, 1988, and sold Dec. 19, 1988; as much as $10,000 in interest from a "federally unregistered" Gibraltar Financial Corp. bond; and as much as $100,000 in a bond of Trans World Airlines, acquired March 8, 1988.  Mr. Hahn wouldn't give the amount of fines Mr. Bradley faces under the suit although it reportedly could total more than $2 million.  About half of Mr. Hahn's report is devoted to the city's dealings with Far East National Bank, a Chinatown bank that paid the mayor $18,000 to serve as a consultant last year.  Mr. Bradley returned the money as reports of a potential conflict of interest began surfacing in March.  In interviews with city attorney investigators, Far East's president, Henry Hwang, said he hired Mr. Bradley as a paid consultant, with the title of "foreign adviser," because he hoped the mayor could "open some doors for us with some . . . major corporation: People that he might know that we are not able to get because we're a very, very small bank."  When asked later what the mayor was able to do for Far East, Mr. Hwang responded: "Frankly, not much."  The report said that on March 22, after a conversation with the mayor, the city's treasurer made two $1 million deposits with Far East without any competitive bids from other financial institutions, contrary to treasurer office policy.  The report contends that a bid sheet was doctored with "white out" correction fluid to cover a reference that the Far East transaction was "per the mayor."  Written over the correction were the words "per Leonard Rittenberg," the city treasurer.  Mr. Hahn said that "there is no question in my mind of a cover-up" at the treasurer's office but that there is no evidence that any such cover-up was related to or orchestrated by the mayor.  The report also showed that the city treasurer had placed sizable deposits in Gibraltar Savings & Loan in 1986 and 1987, reaching $320 million in 1986.  In that same year, Mr. Bradley bought more than $100,000 of bonds of the thrift's parent, Beverly Hills-based Gibraltar Financial Corp.  But the city attorney concluded that there was no evidence Mr. Bradley directed the deposit of city funds in Gibraltar, whose operations were taken over earlier this year by federal thrift regulators.  Nor did the city attorney find any impropriety in Mr. Bradley's service as a paid director of Valley Federal Savings & Loan -- a post he resigned in April -- or in his ties to a task force whose director, Juanita St. John, faces criminal charges for failing to account for $180,000 in city funds allocated to the group.  Ms. St. John has been a business partner of Mr. Bradley.  The report gave details of several instances where Drexel had dealings with the city, including a 1985 meeting where Mr. Milken made a presentation on the "positive aspects of the high-yield bond market" to the police and fire pension commissioners.  But the city attorney concluded that although the mayor had used Drexel as brokers in his personal investments and had made limited partnership investments through Drexel, there wasn't any evidence that the mayor tried to influence any public agencies to do business with the firm.  The Japanese government canceled plans for its fourth sale of shares in Nippon Telegraph & Telephone Corp., conceding that the ambitious privatization program for the company had gone awry.  Finance Minister Ryutaro Hashimoto said persistent weakness in the share price of the telecommunications concern made the stock sale impractical and threatened to undermine confidence in Japan's stock market.  His remarks, made at a hastily convened news conference, came after the Tokyo stock market closed.  The decision to cancel the fourth share offering is more of an embarrassment to the government than a financial blow.  Although the 1,950,000 shares would have been worth a total of 2.94 trillion yen ($20 billion) at yesterday's closing price of 1,510,000 yen, the country's booming economy has boosted government tax revenue sufficiently to more than counterbalance the revenue lost from the NTT issue.  Economists said the government thus wouldn't have to resort to other types of fund raising, such as bond issues, to make up for the lost revenue.  "Dropping the NTT issue may hurt psychologically," said Lawrence S. Praeger, manager of research and strategy at Nikko Securities Co.  "But it would have hurt more psychologically if it had been a bust."  Stock-market participants generally welcomed the government's decision to abandon the NTT issue.  Buying up 1,950,000 of the market's most expensive shares would have drained much liquidity from a market that has seen turnover decrease to a thin 11.7 billion shares in August from a peak of 29.2 billion shares in February.  "If it had gone ahead, it would have caused the demand and supply situation in the market to deteriorate," said Takatoshi Okuyama, general manager of international sales at Daiwa Securities Co.  "We should appreciate the decision by the government."  That attitude marks a significant reversal in the market's sentiment toward NTT since the government launched the company's privatization three years ago.  Then, market participants -- from fee-hungry securities houses anxious to underwrite the issue to housewives looking for a promising blue-chip stock investment -- made NTT the hottest new issue ever brought to Tokyo's stock exchange.  The four-year NTT privatization program was the biggest government share sale in Japanese history.  With a de facto monopoly on most private telephone and data-communication lines in Japan, NTT is Japan's largest company.  Even at today's depressed price, it is the most heavily capitalized issue in the world, with a market value of 23.56 trillion yen.  NTT's privatization was supposed to set a model for share sales in other government-owned enterprises, such as Japan's tobacco and railway companies.  The government had planned to sell four blocks of 1,950,000 shares each, placing a total of 32% of the company in private hands.  The first sale, in February 1987, generated a wave of excitement in the stock market, as the shares doubled within days from their offering price of 1.6 million yen each.  The government sold a second block of shares in November of the same year, just after the world stock market crash, for 2,550,000 yen a share.  Again, investors made instant profits.  But NTT's share price soon began dropping and never recovered to its 1987 peaks.  Last year, the government disillusioned many investors when it went ahead with the third share sale at 1.9 million yen a share -- below the second offering.  That was the first sign that the government, breaking a custom among most Japanese stock issuers, wasn't able to guarantee investors a profit on new share sales.  Tokyo stocks fell back yesterday following Tuesday's gain that marked the first advance after five consecutive losing sessions.  The market opened firmer.  But as gloom spread after the U.S. currency rebounded to the 147-yen level in Tokyo in midmorning, investors stepped back to the sidelines, leaving the Nikkei index powerless to go above the opening level the rest of the day.  Traders said participation by institutional investors was particularly sluggish ahead of the release of major U.S. economic indicators Friday.  The Nikkei index of 225 selected issues, a 219.22-point gainer Tuesday, was down 45.94 points at 34286.94.  In early trading in Tokyo Thursday, the Nikkei index rose 22.38 points to 34309.32.  Wednesday's volume on the First Section was estimated at 600 million shares, up from 514 million Tuesday.  Advancing issues outnumbered declining shares, 490 to 412, while 210 issues remained unchanged.  The losses partly resulted from the sluggishness of steels and shipbuildings, traders said.  These large-capitalization issues had bounced back earlier this week from weeks of lackluster performance, providing some traders with hope that the market might have a chance to recover.  But their popularity lasted no more than a couple of trading days.  The Tokyo Stock Price Index (Topix) of all issues listed in the First Section, which gained 17.09 points Tuesday, was up 3.31 points, or 0.13%, at 2599.16.  The Second Section index, which fell 2.08 points Tuesday, was up 5.01 points, or 0.15%, to close at 3384.54.  Steels and shipbuildings went down as investors took profits quickly, traders said.  London share prices closed firmer in moderate dealings thanks to favorable interim earnings and renewed takeover speculation in the composite insurance sector.  The market was also underpinned by a firm opening session on Wall Street, which persuaded many potential sellers to retire to the sidelines, dealers said.  The Financial Times-Stock Exchange 100 index, the broadest measure of the market, closed at 2401.5, up 3.9.  The index dropped to an intraday low of 2387.2 in early dealings before recovering in early afternoon to reach a session high of 2404.5.  The narrower Financial Times 30-share index, however, closed off 0.5 point at 1980.1.  Volume registered 641.1 million shares, up from 398 on Tuesday.  Stock prices closed higher in Brussels, lower in Frankfurt, Stockholm, Zurich and mixed in Paris, Amsterdam and Milan.  South African gold stocks closed slightly firmer.  Elsewhere, share prices closed lower in Sydney, Wellington, Hong Kong and Manila, and were higher in Taipei and Singapore.  Seoul was closed for a holiday.  Here are price trends on the world's major stock markets, as calculated by Morgan Stanley Capital International Perspective, Geneva.  To make them directly comparable, each index is based on the close of 1969 equaling 100.  The percentage change is since year-end.  @ % This  @ Sep 12 Sep 11 Year  @ U.S. ...................... 321.0 320.0 + 25.3  @ Britain ................... 718.8 720.3 + 31.6  @ Canada .................... 428.4 427.5 + 16.7  @ Japan ..................... 1521.0 1511.4 + 7.1  @ France .................... 549.0 549.2 + 24.0  @ Germany.................... 258.3 259.8 + 24.2  @ Hong Kong.................. 1964.2 1966.9 - 3.2  @ Switzerland................ 232.3 235.7 + 34.3  @ Australia.................. 346.5 349.9 + 19.3  @ World index................ 528.3 525.9 + 6.9  Thursday, Sept. 14, 7-7:30 p.m. EDT, on Showtime (repeated at 10:35 p.m. and Sept. 19, 25 and 29): "Best of Byline Showtime."  Find out what writers do when given a video camera in this selection of mini-films by Edna Buchanan, Christopher Durang, Jay McInerney and Calvin Trillin.  Saturday, Sept. 16, 8-10 p.m. EDT, on HBO (repeated Sept. 19, 24, 28, Oct. 2 and 6): "The Heist."  Pierce Brosnan stars in this tale of sweet revenge carried out at a swanky race track by a sly ex-con.  Saturday, Sept. 16, 10 p.m.-midnight EDT, on NBC: The Miss America Pageant.  Each year they rise from the Atlantic City foam, 51 mercilessly grinning Aphrodites.  For the second year, they will be judged by two panels -- one of non-celebrities who will actually select the winners, one of "celebrated judges" who will (apparently) rubber-stamp the selections.  Saturday-Wednesday, Sept. 17-20, 8-10 p.m. EDT, on TNT: "The Nightmare Years."  In this season filled with television observances of the 50th anniversary of the beginning of World War II, few programs will measure up to this excellent miniseries based on the war diaries of former CBS war correspondent William L. Shirer (author of "The Rise and Fall of the Third Reich").  More in Monday's column.  Sunday, Sept. 17, 7:30-8 p.m. EDT, on PBS (PBS dates and times vary, so check local listings; for example, this program airs Tuesday, Sept. 19, 9-9:30 p.m. EDT, on WNET/Thirteen): "The Critical Difference."  This episode of "Innovation" looks at both the good and bad news about America's Emergency Medical Services.  Tuesday, Sept. 19, 9-10 p.m. EDT, on PBS: "The Supreme Court's Holy Battles."  The Jesuit scholar John Courtney Murray once defined a republic as "people locked in civil argument, and when the argument ends, the republic ends."  This documentary, hosted by Roger Mudd, traces the history of our republic's civil argument over the separation of church and state.  Saturday, Sept. 23, 8-9 p.m. EDT, on A&E (repeated at midnight and Sept. 24): "Volcanoscapes II."  If the post-Labor Day rush fills you with pent-up tension, erupt by watching this vivid film of Hawaii's active Kilauea volcano.  Saturdays, Sept. 23-Oct. 28, 10:30-11 p.m. EDT, on Bravo: "This Is David Lander."  Is it possible to parody tabloid TV?  Find out by watching this sendup of the genre, created and performed by the British comedian Steven Fry.  Sunday, Sept. 24, 9-11 p.m. EDT, on ABC: "The Preppie Murder."  Somehow it seemed inevitable that the sorry tale of Jennifer Levin and Robert Chambers would be made into a TV docu-drama.  Danny ("Do the Right Thing") Aiello plays Detective Mike Sheehan, who investigated the case; and William Devane plays Chambers's defense attorney, Jack ("Rough Sex") Litman.  Sunday, Sept. 24, 9-11 p.m. EDT, on NBC: "Saturday Night Live 15th Anniversary."  Lorne Michaels hosts this two-hour special with vintage film clips, music and live performances from as many of the show's stragglers (and survivors) as can be rounded up for the occasion.  Mondays, Sept. 25-Dec. 18, various times, on PBS: "Spirit of Place."  This series of short documentaries is aimed at all those visitors (and natives) who think America is nothing but a standardized wasteland of interstate highways and fast-food chains.  These independent film makers' visions reveal the country's astonishing -- and undiminished -- diversity.  Tuesday, Sept. 26, 9-10 p.m. EDT, on PBS: "Mauna Kea: On the Verge of Other Worlds."  Another volcano film; only this one takes us to the rim of Hawaii's highest summit, now host to great observatories as the world's best spot for star-gazing.  Tuesday, Sept. 26, 9-10 p.m. EDT, on the Discovery Channel (repeated Sept. 27, 30, Oct. 1 and 7): "Ivory Wars."  This disturbing film is the centerpiece in the World Wildlife Fund's current campaign to save the African elephant from extinction by illegal poaching fueled by the lucrative ivory trade.  Wednesday, Sept. 27, 9-11 p.m. EDT, on PBS: "China in Revolution, 1911-1949."  This documentary about the origins of the Chinese Revolution includes some recently discovered historic footage, and live reminiscences of survivors on both the Communist and the Nationalist sides.  This is as close to paradise as a bird of prey can get.  Five-hundred-foot-high canyon walls are honeycombed with niches, cavities, ledges and crevices that make perfect aeries.  Canyon winds create drafts the birds ride up to their hunting grounds.  They descend easily to their nests with their prey. (Most cliff dwellers have to carry their prey up 200 feet or more to their nests.) The sagebrush and winterfat growing on the sandy plateau soil provide food and cover for Townsend ground squirrels and jackrabbits, among the most important prey in this prey-rich landscape.  Nesting prairie falcons alone consume 60,000 ground squirrels in six or seven weeks.  The world's greatest concentration of nesting prairie falcons lives here, part of the densest nesting population of raptors in North America, and one of the densest in the world.  Each spring between 600 and 800 pairs of raptors nest here.  They always have.  For most of history nobody paid them much attention until a young soil scientist named Morley Nelson noticed their extraordinary numbers in the late '30s.  Aware of how easily wildlife habitat disappears, he began lobbying for some kind of protection for the region.  In 1971, the cliff nesting areas received protected status.  In 1980 The Snake River Birds of Prey Area was established under the jurisdiction of the Bureau of Land Management (BLM) -- 482,640 acres along an approximately 80-mile stretch of the Snake River.  At last, hunting grounds on the plateaus above the canyon, vital to the survival of 15 species of falcons, eagles, hawks, owls and vultures, would be preserved.  I spent a few days in the Birds of Prey Area in late May.  Arriving one hot afternoon, I drove the long, dusty road that crosses the plateau and twists steeply down to the canyon floor.  The road ends at the Swan Falls Dam, erected by Idaho Power in 1901.  From the dam I followed a primitive sandy road a short way along the Snake River.  Shimmering sun on the calm, green water echoed the flittering movement of swifts and swallows above it.  Two marmots scurried across the road.  A prairie falcon screamed, but I could not locate it, although, in the hot silence, the cry seemed as visible as movement.  A redtailed hawk circled above the plateau, then back, out of view.  Most birds roosted unseen in the coolness of shadows, their presence announced only by splashes of whitewash on the walls, but a couple of pigeons strutted around a little cavelike niche.  The best way to see birds here is from the river.  This strip of the Snake is easy, the kind of river you can drift lazily down, taking your time to scan the cliffs for birds.  Usually.  The day I had arranged to meet BLM biologist Randy Trujillo and BLM Public Affairs Officer Barry Rose for a ride upriver in the BLM jet boat was gray from the start. (The jet boat seemed less ideal than the two-day canoe trip required to cover the distance, but spending time with a biologist whose territory this was was too good a chance to pass up.) A cold, damp wind swept across the plateau and funneled through the canyon.  On the choppy, white-capped river, the boat fairly leapt from wave crest to wave crest, or landed hard in the trough between.  We sat huddled in all the clothes we had brought.  Where the canyon opened into riparian areas, high grasses bowed in the wind.  A great blue heron, flying along the water's edge, seemed, in this forbidding light, an ominous bird.  When you put binoculars to your eyes, you risked knocking yourself out as the boat's movement jolted them into your forehead.  Planning to drift downriver to the dam, Randy cut the motor at our turning point.  Carried to shallow water by wind and waves, the boat hit bottom.  The motor, having ingested pebbles, became useless as an aid in getting out.  We pushed with oars but the boat would not budge.  Randy jumped into the river to push, while we continued from the boat.  Nothing happened.  Barry jumped in as well.  The boat moved.  A smaller, auxiliary motor was attached and used for the trip back.  The sky threatened with darker clouds.  Two prairie falcons flew over, and afterward, two vultures.  The men, wet to their waists, must have been freezing.  In a moment of relative calm, we found a golden eagle's nest in a niche on a south cliff, the eagle's head visible above the nest sticks.  The eagle did not move.  I find it hard to call a place with eagles in it desolate, but because this area looked desolate to many people for so long, it seemed a good place to practice war.  The army used it as a bombing range during World War II.  Since 1953, the Idaho National Guard has used it as a tank-training ground.  In 1986, the Guard proposed expanding and upgrading facilities on its Orchard Training Ground, 138,000 acres more or less in the middle of the BOPA. When the National Wildlife Federation responded in 1988 with a release about the potential danger to the birds through a loss of prey because of lost habitat, the national outcry was greater than anyone expected.  The BLM and the National Guard had some serious, and fast, moving to do.  The two agencies framed a policy to develop a joint research project.  To be funded by the Departments of Interior and Defense, it will focus on past and present impacts of military training in the BOPA.  In other words, can eagles and tanks use the same desert?  For the duration of the study, current environmental-awareness briefing of troops, revegetation programs and firefighting efforts will continue and/or be expanded.  Firefighting is everybody's top priority.  Maj. Richard Sheehan, the Guard's environmental engineer; Mike Kokert, BLM research leader in the BOPA; and Bill Burnham, director of the World Center for Birds of Prey, all told me fire is the gravest danger here.  This land burns fast in the dry summer, partly because cheatgrass, an exotic introduced to improve grazing (although the cattle would rather eat something else) burns fast.  Thriving on fire, it usurps the place of sagebrush and winterfat, destroying habitat that the raptor's prey requires.  Most fires are started by lightning.  Some are sparked by ammunition.  The Guard has firefighters on the spot the minute a fire is sighted.  When the study is finished in 1992, a National Environmental Policy Act review will be conducted to consider mitigation, and possible modification of future military training in the Orchard Training Area, as well as the impacts of recreational, commercial, grazing and other activities in this multiple-use area.  Morley Nelson (who has meanwhile become one of the world's foremost raptor authorities, and a cinematographer responsible for bringing astonishing views of raptors to millions of people) is willing to trust this process.  "I believe that the Guard intends to do it right, technically," he says, adding, "If they don't, I'll be right back there fussing with them.  The next time I fuss with them, I'm going all the way to the nation.  It was the nation that set the Snake River Birds of Prey Area, and it should be the nation that decides what happens in the end.  It's a national treasure, an international treasure, not a state treasure."  Behind Mr. Nelson's house is an array of cages and enclosures for a variety of raptors.  An eagle sits on a high roost.  A hawk flaps its wings as one of the raptor biology students comes by with food.  A sick baby owl, found the previous day by a neighbor boy, sits bewildered but calm, as Mr. Nelson examines it.  A gyrfalcon who believes Mr. Nelson is his mate screams at him to come sit on an egg that has been placed in his cage.  The bird calms down as soon as Mr. Nelson enters the cage.  At the World Center for Birds of Prey, I saw newly hatched peregrines, peregrine eggs about to hatch, and rare tropical raptors housed in a state-of-the art climate-controlled building.  One-way windows allowed me a closeup view of some of the most endangered birds on Earth, caged so that future generations might fly free.  I left the World Center and drove back to the Birds of Prey Area to watch birds that have always been free.  Hunting the plateau, they circled over the brush, searching, diving, soaring, floating on the air above this dry land that seems to stretch forever.  Wild things, they live as they have for thousands of years.  There is a reasonable chance they'll go on for thousands more.  ---  Ms. Rudner is a free-lance writer based in Bozeman, Mont.  My second visit to the Soviet Union within six months left two very clear and disturbing impressions.  First, the Soviet economy is on the verge of collapse.  And, second, in the current political environment, the economic deterioration cannot continue for long without provoking a sharp political change.  Ironically, the recent political reforms are making it particularly hard for the Soviets to achieve the economic reforms that they need.  And yet it is the new political freedoms that will permit the public to hold the political leadership accountable for the economy's abysmal performance.  The Soviet Union's inability to reconcile economic reform and political freedom could cause a repressive political swing to the right in which both will be lost.  The increasing shortages of consumer goods -- both a symptom and a cause of the worsening economic situation -- are destroying the already poor system of distribution.  Leningrad has had to issue ration coupons for soap, sugar and salt.  Many basic goods are no longer available to all.  And although consumer durables have extremely high official prices, especially relative to Soviet wages, they too have generally disappeared from the shelves.  The rise of nationalism is also contributing to the economic breakdown.  The Baltic states and other Soviet republics are preventing the shipment of locally made products to other parts of the Soviet Union and denying Soviet citizens who are not local residents the right to buy things in their stores.  The Moscow government has retaliated by announcing that Soviet citizens from other republics who visit Moscow may not buy consumer durables, imported products and other desirable goods that may happen to be available.  This disintegration of the regular market in consumer goods encourages black markets and widespread corruption.  The Soviets readily acknowledge that retailers and others involved in the distribution system help themselves to consumer goods that can be sold on the black market for much more than official prices or, better yet, for dollars or other hard currency.  The combination of shortages and of rapidly rising prices for the limited range of goods for which price increases are permitted is destroying the value of the ruble.  Although it is illegal for Soviets to trade rubles for foreign currency, this trading has become blatant.  The official exchange rate is $1.60, while the rate on the street is only 10 to 20 cents a ruble.  A primary cause of the shortages and price rises is the government budget deficit, now estimated at more than 10% of gross national product.  Although a deficit need not be inflationary if it is financed by issuing bonds that crowd out private spending, the Soviets do not issue bonds but finance their deficits by adding to the cash in the hands of Soviet workers.  In a Western economy, such an excess infusion of cash would cause prices to rise.  Soviet experts privately estimate their inflation rate at nearly 10% even though most prices are not allowed to rise.  And with only a limited number of prices free to increase, the excess cash chasing a limited supply of goods causes shortages.  The fear of future inflation encourages people to spend their savings before the ruble's purchasing power decreases even further.  With the interest rate limited to only 3%, any kind of good that can be stored for future use is a better investment than money in the bank.  But the shortages reflect declines in production as well as increases in demand.  One cause of the reduced output is the new system of factory management in which managers are elected by the workers and have some discretion over pay and work requirements.  Without the discipline from owners or creditors, managers have raised wages and met production quotas by accounting gimmicks.  In addition, workers and farmers whose income is related to their own effort frequently have cut back because the rubles that they would earn by extra effort are of such limited value.  What is needed to rescue the Soviet economy is a radical reform of the price-setting process and a move toward a much more market-oriented economy.  Mr. Gorbachev's economic advisers recognized that two years ago but have now abandoned those proposed reforms because they fear that price decontrol would lead to skyrocketing inflation.  Such inflation is politically unacceptable in a nation where Lenin's promise of price stability has been repeated for more than 70 years.  Moreover, since Soviets do not own shares or homes or other assets that would preserve their value during inflation, a rapid inflation would wipe out the life savings of every Soviet citizen -- hardly a propitious start for a government that wants to develop confidence in capitalist ways]  The prerequisite to price decontrol and the establishment of a market economy is therefore appropriate anti-inflationary macroeconomic policies.  First, the excess infusion of cash by the budget deficit must be stopped.  Soviet officials acknowledge this and say that they will cut the budgetary money growth in half during the next year by a combination of reduced defense outlays, increased revenue from the sale of imported consumer goods, and the use of bond finance.  But eliminating a budget deficit of 10% of GNP will not be possible without raising taxes, cutting subsidies or reducing the already low standard of public services.  Any such painful changes will inevitably be criticized in the press and reflected in votes against Communist Party candidates in contestable elections.  Even more important than deficit reduction is raising the interest rate that households receive on their bank deposits.  That rate must be high enough so that households will want to leave their past savings in the bank when prices are decontrolled, rather than spending them and thereby bidding up the prices of available goods.  At a minimum, that is likely to require an interest rate that exceeds the inflation rate, a substantial rise from the current token rate of interest.  Such a rise in interest payments would be unpopular with a Soviet public raised on the communist ideology that all capital income is unfair.  Moreover, since the ownership of savings is highly concentrated, paying higher interest rates would conflict with the egalitarian standard of fairness that the Soviet public has come to accept.  Popular opposition to economic reform extends not only to the policies required to prevent inflation but to the basic market reforms themselves.  While most Soviet economists continue to recognize the necessity of price decontrol and movement toward a market economy, they report that these notions are not supported by the mass of Soviet people.  Soviet citizens want a higher standard of living but do not see how that will follow from market forces.  Instead they see price reform as eliminating the subsidies on bread and rent and adding to a general price inflation that would lower their already low standard of living.  And they understand that with fewer regulations some individuals will become much richer than others, in sharp conflict with their values.  With democratization, such popular opposition inevitably increases the political reluctance to act decisively.  The deteriorating economic conditions make the continuation of current policies very unlikely.  One possibility is that the leadership will accept the political risks of adopting radical reforms that simultaneously contain inflationary pressures and move toward a market economy.  Or, Mr. Gorbachev might lose power to a politician prepared to adopt the needed reforms.  But there is a darker possibility.  The Soviet public and many of those in government or military circles may conclude that inflation, shortages, strikes and corruption are all evidence that the Gorbachev government is too weak.  They may yearn for a government that can bring back price stability, crack down on black marketeers and stop the nationalist political movements.  Such a political change could spell the end of economic "perestroika" and of political liberalization.  The very fear of such a political ouster might make Mr. Gorbachev and his colleagues adopt a tougher, less reform-oriented stance themselves.  Those of us who want to see an increase in pluralism, democracy and market forces in the Soviet Union can only hope that the current government will have the courage to adopt the needed reforms before it is too late.  ---  Mr. Feldstein, former chairman of the president's Council of Economic Advisers, is a professor of economics at Harvard.  More than 10 years after he was fired from John Hancock Mutual Life Insurance Co., Clifford Zalay gained vindication.  A St. Petersburg, Fla., jury awarded the former salesman $26 million in damages after deciding his former employers libeled and slandered him.  Of the amount, $25 million was punitive damages, intended to punish Hancock.  "It wasn't right and, doggone it, I wasn't going to let anyone take that one asset I had -- my good name," Mr. Zalay, 65 years old, said in a telephone interview.  "It took me 30 years to get it."  Although ranked in the top 2% of Hancock sales people, Mr. Zalay was fired in January 1979 in a falling out with company officials over his work style and business practices.  Mr. Zalay fought back with a wrongful-discharge suit that also alleged libel and slander.  The wrongful-discharge count was dismissed, but Mr. Zalay's Clearwater, Fla., attorney, Elihu Berman, successfully argued that Hancock officials damaged his client's reputation by distributing a copy of a company letter reprimanding Mr. Zalay for giving a policyholder bad advice.  Mr. Zalay, according to Mr. Berman, never gave the policyholder any advice.  Mr. Zalay also maintained that Hancock officials crippled his job performance by sending investigators to Florida to interview his clients.  The investigators told several policyholders he was under investigation for "shady dealings" in Chicago, though none was ever substantiated.  Mr. Zalay's suit is part of a trend among fired white-collar workers, who are increasingly suing their former employers for punitive damages.  A Hancock spokesman said the company plans to ask the judge to overturn the jury verdict.  If that fails, the company will consider an appeal, he said.  Mr. Berman said the jury award was fair.  "I don't think the award was excessive." he said, "in view of John Hancock's assets." ---  THE WEIGHT LOSS WARS have gone to court.  Nutri/System Inc. has sued Weight Watchers International Inc., a subsidiary of H.J. Heinz Inc., alleging that Weight Watchers obtained trade secrets by hiring key Nutri/System executives.  Heinz, a food-processing concern, said the allegations are groundless.  Nutri/System claims Weight Watchers received proprietary information on marketing, pricing and sales from nine former employees who currently work at the Heinz subsidiary.  The suit alleges that Jean Bakken, a former vice president of competitive marketing who left Nutri/System last week, attended a marketing and pricing meeting Aug. 31 with A. Donald McCulloch Jr., Nutri/System chairman and president.  Nutri/System says that on the day Ms. Bakken resigned, Sept. 5, many confidential documents were missing from her office.  Heinz, Pittsburgh, says it has hired Ms. Bakken, but declines to comment further on the specific charges.  Nutri/System, Willow Grove, Pa., operates 1,363 weight-loss clinics in the U.S., Canada, Australia and Britain.  Its sales of counseling services and low-calorie foods totaled $433 million last year.  Heinz acquired Weight Watchers 10 years ago, and the boom in low-calorie foods and exercise classes has turned the division into a money machine.  The world's largest weight-loss and dietary organization, Weight Watchers generated $1.3 billion of Heinz's $5.8 billion in revenue last year.  ---  TENANTS FACING EVICTION have a possible escape hatch: bankruptcy court.  But in Los Angeles, where the courts have been flooded with more than 50,000 new bankruptcy filings a year, eviction-related bankruptcies are under attack.  Until now, judges have generally interpreted federal bankruptcy law to block landlords from putting bankrupt tenants out on the street.  Such rulings have emboldened non-lawyer "tenant services" groups, which urge tenants to seek bankruptcy protection -- and often charge hundreds of dollars for their advice.  But judges, landlords and even legal-aid firms have condemned the practice.  For one thing, the tenants are often poor or non-English speaking and "do not know what they are filing," says Roberto Aldape, a lawyer for the Los Angeles Legal Aid Foundation.  The relief is fleeting, usually just a few weeks.  The tenants' financial problems usually end up being compounded because of the firms' high fees.  Enter bankruptcy Judge Vincent Zurzolo.  In a little-noticed opinion last month, he held that a landlord has a right to obtain possession after all.  "Bankruptcy mills," he pointed out, "prey upon the desperate and ignorant tenants who come to them for help and are defrauded out of money which could better be used to pay rent to their current landlords or to obtain new living quarters."  Whether the decision will be embraced by other judges -- or the city itself, which carries out the actual evictions -- isn't yet clear.  But for landlords, "it is a great ruling," says Los Angeles lawyer Jeffrey Riffer, who has represented landlords.  Other lawyers for landlords, pointing out that such bankruptcy cases have been a brisk source of business, weren't so sure the decision was an unmitigated blessing.  "You are killing the golden goose," one quipped.  ---  SPIN CONTROL: Both liberal and conservative groups have scheduled a record number of briefings to outline their hopes and expectations for the new Supreme Court term that begins Oct. 2.  Yesterday, the American Civil Liberties Union and Planned Parenthood of America jointly warned of the risk that the justices will cut back further on the right to abortion in three cases likely to be argued in December.  Among other groups, the NOW Legal Defense and Education Fund plans a session on cases affecting women's rights.  On the conservative end of the spectrum, briefings are planned by the Washington Legal Foundation and the National Legal Center for the Public Interest.  A business viewpoint?  That will be offered by the U.S. Chamber of Commerce National Chamber Litigation Center.  ---  QUOTABLE: When the National Law Journal recognized two Philadelphia lawyers as being "well on their way to achieving power," the lawyers' suburban weekly newspaper couldn't resist doing a front-page article on its hometown celebrities.  "Local Lawyers Recognized for Clout," said the headline last week in the Suburban & Wayne Times.  But one of the lawyers, David Girard-diCarlo, 46, managing partner of Blank, Rome, Comisky & McCauley, couldn't leave well enough alone.  Asked by the Suburban how he felt about being one of 50 lawyers under age 50 who were selected, he said: "I wasn't surprised.  I know my reach in the community and across the country."  Mr. Girard-diCarlo, a fundraiser for President Bush, also told the Suburban reporter that, if he needed the recognition, he wouldn't have been named in the first place.  Mr. Girard-diCarlo says he regrets speaking to the Suburban, which he says didn't understand he was talking in jest.  "That was an awful article," he says.  After years of sticking to what it terms "plain vanilla" cable TV service, cable giant Tele-Communications Inc. said it plans to make some major investments in advanced subscriber technology and new services such as pay-per-view.  Denver-based Tele-Communications, which owns directly or controls cable systems serving about 12 million of the nation's approximately 51 million cable subscribers, said that in the first of "a series of major customer service announcements" it placed an initial order for so-called "Starport" addressable control modules, some of the industry's most advanced in-home cable equipment, from General Instrument Co.'s Jerrold division.  The new equipment controls the flow of television signals into the home and allows subscribers to order individual, or pay-per-view events.  Cable companies, which have come under attack in Washington for raising prices, are responding to mounting pressure to invest in better and more advanced service.  Although Tele-Communications didn't disclose financial terms, and the initial order is for only about 250,000 units, the company is expected to ultimately invest several hundred million dollars in the new equipment.  The pay-per-view business has been growing rapidly in recent years, driven by events such as boxing matches, and to a lesser extent, movies.  Although about 17 million homes have advanced "addressable" equipment capable of offering pay-per-view events, only about 10 million cable TV homes are offered such programs on a regular basis, according to Paul Kagan Associates.  Tele-Communications, the nation's largest cable operator, had until recently resisted investing in expensive pay-per-view technology.  But pressure from subscribers and the huge success of some events on other cable systems apparently persuaded the company to begin testing equipment over the past year.  "We feel that pay-per-view events have a better chance for success with this technology in place," said J.C. Sparkman, executive vice president and chief operating officer of Tele-Communications.  "TCI will now give serious consideration to offering strong event-driven programming."  Hollywood studios are eager to see Tele-Communications offer movies on pay-per-view, given the company's huge subscriber base.  Tele-Communications has in the past said it wasn't interested because of the studios' policies of offering movies for pay-per-view well after their release in videocassette.  Mr. Sparkman said yesterday, however, that Tele-Communications doesn't "rule out the possibility of eventually showing movies, provided our friends in Hollywood are willing to give us an earlier window for release of first-run, high-quality movies."  Mr. Sparkman said that in most homes served by the company, "the set-top converter box will disappear over time, as an increasing number of our subscribers acquire cable-ready sets and gain access to the Starport technology."  Once the modules are installed in a box outside subscribers' homes, he noted, customers "can hook up as many cable-ready sets, VCRs, or other cable-ready appliances as they want with no extra monthly charges and no additional converter equipment."  Subscribers won't need to be at home during the day for in-home service calls, he added.  Imperial Oil Ltd. said it plans to sell selected oil and gas properties in western Canada which could fetch as much as 800 million Canadian dollars ($673 million).  An asset sale was expected.  Imperial previously agreed to offer for sale C$550 million of oil and gas properties as part of its agreement with Canadian investment authorities in its $4.15 billion acquisition of Texaco Canada Inc.  Imperial, which is 70% owned by Exxon Corp., said it would use proceeds to reduce debt raised to finance the Texaco Canada purchase.  The company said the properties up for sale represent about 5% of its proved reserves.  Denis Mote, an analyst with Maison Placement Canada Inc. in Toronto, said the properties are "worth about C$800 million depending on the quality of the reserves."  An Imperial spokeswoman declined to put a value on the properties.  The properties include interests in the Swan Hills, Mitsue, Nipisi, Utikuma and Waterton fields of Alberta.  Proved reserves before royalties amount to about 115 million barrels of crude oil and natural gas liquids and about 300 billion cubic feet of natural gas.  In 1988, the average daily gross production of crude oil and natural gas liquids from the properties was 26,000 barrels and 50 million cubic feet of natural gas.  Imperial said production from the properties in 1988 made up about 7% of the average daily gross production of crude oil and about 9% of gross production of natural gas of the combined average daily production of Imperial and Texaco Canada.  WHO'S NEWS: CBS named Henry A. Kissinger, former secretary of state, to the board, expanding membership to 15. . . .  Carol Taber, 43, was named group publisher of Lang Communications.  She will oversee Working Woman, Working Mother, and Success magazines and remain publisher of Working Woman.  Also Floyd Sembler, 52, was named publisher of Success.  He had been associate publisher.  Marilyn Burson was 23 years old and unmarried when she agreed to surrender her infant son for adoption.  Her one request of the agency where she sought help was that he be placed in a home where he would be the oldest child.  Her wish was denied.  She held her baby once before she formally relinquished him in 1961.  She never saw him again.  Today, a pregnant woman seeking help from an adoption agency could ask that her baby be raised by a Methodist farm family with two other kids, a dog and a swimming pool.  She could ask to be allowed to see her child several times a year, write letters, call, send gifts -- maybe even vacation together.  And if it's humanly possible, the agency will grant her wish.  Many prospective adoptive couples recoil at the idea of "open adoptions," which involve intimate and long-term contact with the biological parents of the child.  But at many agencies they simply have no choice.  The ready availability of abortion, combined with a diminishing bias against single motherhood, has reduced the number of white infants put up for adoption.  At the same time, the pool of white couples seeking to adopt has grown. (Most agencies discourage white couples from adopting black babies.)  More than a million couples are chasing the 30,000 white infants available in this country each year, estimates the National Committee for Adoption, a federation of adoption agencies.  During the past decade, these changing forces in the adoption business have shifted power from the adoptive couple to the so-called birth parents.  "Birth parents today are calling the shots," says Richard Van Deelen, associate executive director of Bethany Christian Services in Grand Rapids, Mich., which has been doing adoptions for more than 35 years.  "Today, you serve the birth mother or you're not in the adoption business."  And what many birth parents want is a continuing presence in the lives of the children they are placing for adoption.  But there are other reasons agencies have repudiated traditional, closed adoption procedures.  Most social workers and psychologists now believe that secrecy was an unreliable and unhealthy way of protecting birth parents and adoptees from the stigma of illegitimacy or abandonment.  Far from forgetting the experience, birth mothers like Mrs. Burson grieve about it their whole lives.  Furthermore, adoptees who are now adults are asking agencies about their roots.  Adoptive parents, too, are seeking help from the agencies, saying their children are preoccupied with the question of where they came from.  The practice of adoption by strangers wasn't common in this country until the 1920s, when infant formula was invented.  Over the years, some agencies have treated unmarried pregnant women insensitively, partly because there were plenty of them.  One mother remembers being forced to wear a blindfold and earplugs at the birth so she would never see or hear her baby.  Another says the mirror was removed from over her delivery table.  Now, agencies must actively woo pregnant women who might be considering giving up their babies.  "In all candor, we're involved in an extremely competitive business, and we're very much into marketing strategies," says Bryce Hatch, director of Southwest Maternity Center of the Methodist Mission Home in San Antonio, Texas.  The Yellow Pages is perhaps the most important marketing tool, followed by a well-tended network of doctors, clinics, pastors, relatives and friends.  "We've been stampeded into {larger Yellow Page ads} by the competition," Mr. Hatch says.  Much of the competition comes from private lawyers who have taken note of the $12,000 to $20,000 fees typical of adoptions of white infants.  "Most attorneys are highly responsive to birth parents' wants and wishes," says Mr. Van Deelen.  "So the birth parents go shopping.  They'll read the list to you over the phone, and if you don't provide them with open adoption, full payment of medical expenses -- they'll go down the street to the next provider.  It's an adoption free market."  Jim Gritter, child-welfare supervisor of the Community Family and Children's Services adoption agency in Traverse City, Mich., laments the notion that open adoptions may arise from competitive considerations rather than from the respect due birth parents.  So, too, do some skeptical birth parents.  "In the '60s, the catchword was, 'We'll protect you, we'll give you anonymity.' That was the sales pitch," says Marsha Riben, who put up her daughter for adoption in 1967.  "The sales pitch of the '80s is openness.  Promise the birth mother openness, and you'll get her baby."  William Pierce, president of the National Committee for Adoption, is also critical of some of the new practices agencies are embracing, whatever their motive.  "It's a new form of coercion," he says.  "Ask a lot of women, which would you rather have, a thousand dollars or a picture of your child.  Most of them will say, 'I'll take a picture of my child.' So something of value is being exchanged for their baby."  When Linda Freeman, then divorced and pregnant, approached the Traverse City agency for counseling two years ago, she was doubtful about adoption.  "I said I just didn't think I could walk away," Ms. Freeman says.  But after hearing about the open adoptions offered at the agency, she reconsidered.  Ms. Freeman chose an adoptive couple from several profiles, and the couple was at the hospital with her when she gave birth.  "If it hadn't been an open adoption, I wouldn't have given her up," says Ms. Freeman of her daughter.  "I can picture {the adoptive couple} holding her.  I know what their house looks like.  I knew I could call her.  It was a tremendous sense of relief."  A few birth parents still choose traditional, closed adoptions, and most agencies -- even the most staunchly open ones -- will accommodate them.  Mr. Hatch recently placed the babies of two women who were not interested in choosing the adoptive parents or knowing anything more about the babies.  Ironically, the adoptive parents had been so "brainwashed" by the counseling program, Mr. Hatch says, that they were disappointed the birth parents weren't willing to be more involved.  For most adoptive couples, however, the new openness is unsettling.  If that's the price adoptive couples have to pay for a baby, however, most will do it.  "When we heard about open adoptions, we thought, these people are nuts, we felt we would never do that," says Mary Nagle, an adoptive mother in Sulphur, La.  "On the other hand, if that was the only way we were going to get a baby, we were going to do whatever it took."  Mrs. Nagle, who maintains a correspondence with the birth mother of her two-year-old son, says her experience with open adoption has been "wonderful."  Adoption agencies vary widely in the amount of openness they offer, but at most agencies, it now is standard procedure for the birth mother to choose the adoptive couple from prescreened couples.  At the Traverse City agency the woman looks at portfolios of at least six families.  In the portfolios are pictures of the couple, their home, their pet, their friends, places they have visited and other children in their lives.  A three-page letter addresses birth parents in general, and a page deals with the couple's preferences in food and beverages, clothes, weather, politics, television, cars and other things.  There are two forms -- a checklist and an essay -- addressing how open the adoptive parents intend to be toward the birth mother.  Another sheet addresses 17 "big-time" questions, such as how the couple deals with stress or how they will handle a three-year-old's temper tantrum in a store.  Birth parents choose their adoptive couples for many reasons, but only occasionally on the basis of their socio-economic status, most agency directors agree.  Religion is a major factor, and so are the couple's life style and stability.  There are also a certain number of seemingly whimsical preferences, such as the birth mother at one agency who requested an adoptive home on a dairy farm (such a couple existed on the agency's waiting list).  "Some pretty immature gals will be affected by the beautiful home with the swimming pool and the horses and the back yard," says Mr. Van Deelen of the Grand Rapids agency.  But most will be more concerned with values and stability.  "Looks are important, too," Mr. Van Deelen adds.  "A couple that presents poorly is going to have a tough time in today's economy."  Face-to-face meetings between the birth parents and the adoptive couple are becoming more common, and at some agencies, such as Traverse City, they are required.  On rare occasions, birth mothers change their minds about the couple they've chosen after meeting them, Mr. Gritter says.  "The meeting is indispensable," he says.  "It's the only way for people to see the twinkle in someone's eye, the accent in their voice."  At many agencies, long-term contact between the birth and adoptive parents is required, if only in the form of unsigned letters sent through the agencies.  At the Traverse City agency, the adoptive and birth parents are expected to arrange between themselves how much future contact they plan to have.  As birth parent activists point out, such arrangements are legally unenforceable.  Once the adoption is final -- usually within six months to a year after the baby's birth -- the birth parents have no legal rights.  "It's a gigantic exercise in trust," says Mr. Gritter.  "It's a gentlemen's agreement."  One adoptive parent, Charlene Canape Giannetti of New York, says she was glad to meet her daughter's birth mother, but resisted further regular contact.  "I didn't want to be in constant touch with the birth parents," says Mrs. Giannetti.  "I didn't want to exchange photos.  I didn't want her growing up with another set of parents.  I think it's very confusing to the child."  But with birth parents knowing where their child is living, what if they show up on the adoptive parents' doorstep demanding the return of their baby?  It doesn't happen, agency directors say, precisely because the parents know how their child is doing.  "Birth parents choose adoption because they want their children to experience a high level of stability," says Mr. Gritter.  "The birth mother doesn't want to be the undoing of her own plan."  At the same time birth parents are exercising more control over their child's destiny, adoptive parents, often upper-middle-class, well-educated professionals, are finding themselves subjected to unprecedented scrutiny, first by the agency and then by the birth parents.  At Deaconess Home in Oklahoma City, prospective adoptive parents are given the Minnesota Multiphasic Personality Inventory and the Taylor-Johnson Temperament Analysis.  If the personality tests turn up any problems, the couple is given the opportunity to go through counseling.  If the couple refuses, the agency shows them the door.  At most other agencies, adoptive couples must go through an intensive counseling program to force them to recognize that the baby they're adopting has another set of parents.  "In earlier days, we looked at the adoptive parents to see if they could provide for the child and if they were healthy enough to see the child to adulthood," says Janice Thomas, adoption search coordinator of Catholic Charities of Green Bay, Wis., which began open adoptions in 1974.  "Now it's much more important for them to understand the part the birth parent plays in the adoptee's life.  If they're not interested in going that far, they can go to another agency."  Although open adoption is too recent to have produced definitive results of its efficacy, people in the adoption world agree that the closed system has had dire effects on the psychological health of both birth parents and adoptees.  Adoptees have a higher incidence of learning disabilities and mental health problems, asserts Dr. Herbert Weider, founder of the Adoption Study Center at Brookdale Hospital in Brooklyn, N.Y.  "They never recover from the blow of learning they've been relinquished," he says, "just as the birth mother never recovers from relinquishment.  But the more normal the interaction among the three parties, the better it is for everybody."  Only three states now have open adoption records, leaving thousands of people searching for their biological parents or children.  Nineteen years after surrendering her son, Mrs. Burson began searching for him.  Eight years later, she was finally told that he had died in a freak accident at the age of 15 months.  As a birth mother, Mrs. Burson says, not knowing anything about her child's fate was more painful than the anguish of thinking her child was growing up without her.  "The way it was, there's always a doubt," she says.  "You're always thinking, 'maybe something's wrong, maybe he needs me.'"  Ms. Thomas says her agency has done 600 open adoptions in the past 15 years, and there hasn't been a single horror story.  But she acknowledges that the first generation of children adopted under the open system hasn't reached adulthood, when their experience could be evaluated and compared with people adopted under the traditional system.  Mr. Pierce of the National Committee for Adoption believes that some of the new adoption practices are equivalent to the use of a drug whose explosive side effects won't be known for 20 years.  But agency directors argue that they have to take the chance.  "We know the old system wasn't working," says Mr. Gritter of Traverse City.  "We had to try something new."  Bond International Gold Inc. said it agreed to sell its Bond Gold Placer Corp. unit to Western Gold Exploration & Mining Co. for $16 million and a production royalty.  Bond International said the unit's primary asset is a two-thirds interest in a joint venture with Yuba Natural Resources Inc.  The unit manages the venture and operates the Yuba gold dredge near Marysville, Calif.  Bond International said the Yuba operation didn't fit into the company's long-term goals.  President Bush won his battle against congressional restrictions on the joint development of an advanced jet fighter with Japan.  The Senate failed to override Mr. Bush's veto of a congressional resolution imposing certain conditions on the project.  The 66-34 vote was just one short of the two-thirds needed to override a veto, although Mr. Bush stood to fare better if the issue had reached the House.  Failure of the override vote will allow the administration to continue overseeing U.S. participation in the FSX fighter program without any legally binding restrictions.  The administration says it intends to observe some of these safeguards voluntarily, but Mr. Bush contended that the resolution was unnecessary and infringed on the power of the executive branch.  The Senate approved the resolution 72-27 in May but hard lobbying by the administration got a number of Republicans to switch sides so that the margin fell below two-thirds.  In any event, it was unlikely that the House could have mustered an override; the original House vote was 262-155, well short of the two-thirds.  The FSX program envisions an upgraded version of the F-16 fighter to be jointly developed by General Dynamics Corp. and a Japanese group headed by Mitsubishi Heavy Industries Ltd. Work on the program began last summer with Mitsubishi's initial payment of $25 million to General Dynamics.  Boeing Co.'s commercial airplanes unit said Air France ordered five aircraft, new cargo models of the 747-400, for $600 million.  Seattle-based Boeing said the order was the largest the company had ever received for all-cargo aircraft.  Air France thus becomes the launch customer for the cargo version of the 747-400 aircraft.  Delivery is scheduled for August 1993.  The company said 10 other airlines have been in discussions with Boeing about the new model, including Cargolux of Luxembourg, Cathay Pacific of Hong Kong, Japan Airlines and UTA of France.  Texas Air Corp. still might sell part or all of Continental Airlines, Frank Lorenzo, chairman, said at the annual meeting.  At a post-meeting news conference, Mr. Lorenzo said there have been "no discussions with domestic air carriers, and that hasn't changed."  That statement seems to eliminate as bidders Donald Trump and Carl Icahn, who both own airlines and have been the subject of speculation on a Continental sale.  At the meeting, Mr. Lorenzo indicated that he doesn't regard such a transaction as urgent.  "While a sale remains possible, and discussions are continuing, I must reiterate that the reasons not to sell remain every bit as important as when we first announced these discussions," he said.  Mr. Lorenzo raised the possibility of a sale last month.  At that time, he said reasons not to sell included the airline's potential for improved results, after two years of record losses, and his long, personal involvement with Continental.  Meanwhile, Texas Air agreed to lend its Eastern Airlines unit $45 million to help pay part of a $98 million pension fund payment due tomorrow, the first time the parent has been drawn into Eastern's bankruptcy-law proceedings.  Texas Air agreed to the loan after negotiating for weeks with Eastern creditors and the Internal Revenue Service.  Only $72 million will be paid tomorrow -- Texas Air's $45 million loan and $27 million from Eastern asset sales.  The IRS has granted a temporary waiver for the remainder.  Just as rock stars joined forces to record "We Are the World" to bring attention to the world hunger crisis, the nation's cartoon characters, from Mickey Mouse to Garfield to Bugs Bunny, are combining talent for a half-hour televised anti-drug special.  The Academy of Television Arts & Sciences said it will produce an animated special that will air on a yet-to-be determined Saturday morning early next year.  The three major broadcast networks, as well as such cable outlets as The Disney Channel, plan to simultaneously broadcast the special.  In addition, it will be televised on more than 300 independent stations, as well as on the Canadian Broadcasting Co.  The academy estimates that an audience of over 20 million youngsters between the ages of five and 11 may view the special.  Major underwriter for the untitled special is McDonald's Corp., which is contributing "in excess of $1 million," according to an academy spokesman.  Roy E. Disney, vice chairman of Walt Disney Co., is executive producer.  Kimco Development Corp. is seeking a list of HRE Properties shareholders, saying it plans a proxy fight to oust the trustees of the real estate investment trust.  In a Securities and Exchange Commission filing, Kimco said it would solicit consents to call a special meeting for the purpose of removing the trustees.  A spokesman for HRE said the company would provide the list to Kimco.  Kimco, which with affiliates holds 8.9% of HRE, indicated it wants to elect new trustees who are "committed to realizing the underlying value of the trust's properties."  Kimco, Roslyn, N.Y., develops shopping centers; HRE, New York, owns office buildings and shopping centers.  In May, HRE rejected Kimco's $27-a-share, or $148.1 million, acquisition proposal.  Since then, advisers from Kimco and HRE have met and discussed Kimco's interest in the trust, but no plans or proposals have been made, the filing said.  The trust's shares rose 37.5 cents to $23.50 in New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday.  The stock market buckled under the weight of futures-related program selling late in the session and retreated sharply in moderately active trading.  Traders traced the downturn to a sell-off in bonds, which sent stock-index futures retreating and triggered index-arbitrage programs involving the purchase of futures contracts and the sale of stocks.  The Dow Jones Industrial Average closed below 2700 for the first time since Aug. 24, when it rose through that level en route to a record high.  The average tumbled 27.74 to 2679.52 after spending most of the session drifting at higher levels.  New York Stock Exchange volume totaled 175,330,000 shares, compared with 142,140,000 Tuesday.  But traders said the increase was due to program selling rather than any pickup in investor activity.  "There's little or no interest, pretty much across the board and across the world," said Thomas R. Walsh, head of equity trading at Nikko Securities International.  "You can't put a fire under anybody right now."  Nervousness about tomorrow's batch of U.S. economic reports and "triple witching hour" expiration of index futures and options continued to keep investors at bay, traders said.  "You've got plenty of concerns," said Ricky T. Harrington, a technical analyst at Interstate-Johnson Lane, Charlotte, N.C.  "Most people, if they have a choice, are going to sit on the sidelines and let other people take the chances here."  Among broader market averages, the Standard & Poor's 500-stock index dropped 3.24 to 345.46, the Dow Jones Equity Market Index lost 2.89 to 324.73, and the Big Board's composite index went down 1.59 to 192.29.  There were 912 issues declining in price on the Big Board, compared with 555 advancers.  Many stocks of companies involved in actual or rumored takeover bids fell, responding to the weakening junk bond market.  Holiday fell 2 to close at 81 5/8, Hilton Hotels fell 1 3/8 to 105, and American Medical International fell 3/8 to 24 3/8.  Among airline stocks, Delta Air Lines fell 1 3/8 to 74 1/2, AMR, parent of American Airlines, fell 1 to 81 3/4, and USAir Group fell 1/2 to 48.  Sea Containers fell 1 1/8 to close at 62 3/4, and Georgia Gulf fell 5/8 to 58.  Retailer Circle K fell 1 3/4 to 7 3/4 after the company said it will suspend its quarterly dividend and stop soliciting takeover bids.  The day's initial round of futures-related trading proved favorable for stocks, as program buying helped push prices to their session highs around midday.  But the index-arbitrage selling surfaced shortly after 3 p.m. and sent the market into a tailspin; a final burst of sell programs caused stocks to close at their lows.  Mr. Harrington said he viewed the sell-off as a confirmation that the Labor Day weekend marked a turning point for the market, which hit record levels just before the holiday.  He said he expects further declines over the short term, with the industrial average possibly falling to the low to mid-2600s before rebounding.  Semiconductor stocks bucked the market's downturn, as a rally that started late Tuesday continued in the wake of an industry report for August that proved stronger than some analysts had expected.  Merrill Lynch analyst Tom Kurlak commented favorably about the group in response to the data.  Other factors boosting the sector included enthusiasm about Intel's plans for a chip using parallel processing and comments from Hambrecht & Quist analyst Millard H. Phelps, who has just started a two-week series of meetings with institutional clients to deliver an optimistic forecast for the industry in the 1990s.  National Semiconductor, the most active Big Board issue, rose 3/8 to 7 7/8 as 3.5 million shares changed hands in composite trading.  Among other chip producers, Motorola gained 1 1/8 to 57 7/8, Advanced Micro Devices rose 1/2 to 9, Avnet went up 3/4 to 25 3/8, and Cypress Semiconductor advanced 3/8 to 12 3/8.  But Texas Instruments, which said it plans to take a $10 million pretax charge in the third quarter, retreated from a session high of 41 7/8 to close at 40 1/8, down 1.  The charge stems from a cut of about 700 jobs at the company's defense electronics unit.  Tandem Computers gained 1/2 to 23 5/8 on 1.7 million shares, but other computer issues faltered after rallying Tuesday along with the semiconductor stocks.  International Business Machines went down 1 1/2 to 115 3/8, Digital Equipment lost 2 to 97 1/2, and Compaq Computer remained unchanged at 91 7/8.  Reports that British Petroleum plans a restructuring of its exploration and production operations, including possible asset sales, sent the stock up 1 1/8 to 61.  The talk also led to a revival of rumors that BP may be interested in Burlington Resources, which climbed 3/4 to 47 1/2 as 1.7 million shares changed hands.  BP confirmed that it would make some kind of announcement today but wouldn't provide any details, according to Dow Jones Professional Investor Report.  Burlington declined to comment on whether it had been approached.  The two partners in Royal Dutch-Shell Group also posted solid gains, as Royal Dutch Petroleum advanced 3/4 to 68 3/4 and Shell Transport & Trading rose 7/8 to 43 1/2.  But other major oil stocks were weak even as crude oil prices neared $20 a barrel.  Exxon fell 7/8 to 44 1/2 on 2.3 million shares, Chevron lost 3/8 to 58 7/8, Texaco slid 1/4 to 51, and Amoco lost 7/8 to 49.  MGM/UA Communications, which received a takeover offer of $23.16 a share from a suitor identified only as a Big Board company, went up 1 1/2 to 21 1/4.  Qintex Entertainment, which made an earlier offer for MGM/UA, plunged 2 to 6 in over-the-counter trading.  Merrill Lynch slipped 1 3/8 to 32 7/8 amid rumors that the firm faces a third-quarter loss of as much as $100 million on highyield bonds issued by Campeau's Federated Department Stores unit.  Responding to the speculation, Merrill Lynch told the Professional Investor Report it doesn't own any Federated bonds.  The American Stock Exchange Index gained 4.23 to 388.77.  Volume totaled 15,110,000 shares, compared with 11,910,000 Tuesday.  There were 246 issues advancing, 336 declining and 265 unchanged.  Sikes Class A jumped 3 to 16 3/4.  The company said a non-U.S. suitor, which it didn't otherwise identify, expressed interest in a takeover for about $190 million to $200 million.  Jewelmasters skidded 1 to 3 3/8 after reporting an $865,000 loss for its quarter ended in July, compared with a year-earlier profit.  An Alabama company with letters of credit from Banca Nazionale del Lavoro is seeking a U.S. export license to ship to Iraq a precision machine that has raised concerns among U.S. officials because it has applications in making nuclear weapons.  While the computerized machine costs only $500,000, this is the first indication that at least some U.S. goods covered by the letters of credit were sensitive enough to draw scrutiny of U.S. nuclear export-control experts.  The Atlanta branch of Rome-based BNL had issued some $2.64 billion in unauthorized letters of credit to Iraq, using an off-the-books accounting system to conceal the transactions.  Iraq used the letters of credit to guarantee payment to U.S., British, and European companies for exports to that country.  The purpose of what has been called a "parallel bank," operated by Christopher Drogoul, the suspended branch manager of BNL in Atlanta, and the huge unauthorized trade credits remains a mystery.  But it is becoming clear that much of the machinery shipped under the letters of credit has both commercial and military applications, though it isn't yet known how it is being used.  XYZ Options Inc., a small Tuscaloosa, Ala., company that has a contract to build a turnkey machine-tool plant in Baghdad for state-owned Machinery Trade Co., has had difficulty getting an export license because U.S. Commerce Department officials and an interagency group overseeing nuclear export controls haven't ascertained who ultimately will use the machine in question.  XYZ said the machine is considered an essential part of the plant.  Richard W. Kendrick, XYZ's corporate secretary, said he leaves today for Baghdad, where he will accompany U.S. Embassy officials on a tour of the plant, which is 80% complete, to demonstrate that the machine is intended for commercial use.  In a letter to Sen. Richard Shelby, whom XYZ asked for help in getting the license, a Commerce Department official said: "Once we have established the importer is an ongoing commercial concern, we're confident the case can be approved."  XYZ, founded in April 1988, said it was set up specifically to build the $14 million Iraqi facility strictly for commercial use, such as making engine and transmission parts.  XYZ officials said a key request for the project is that as much of the material as possible be obtained from U.S. sources.  XYZ said it was initially approached to bid on the project in January, 1988 by Matrix-Churchill, a Coventry, England, company owned by the Iraqis that is emerging as a central coordinator of the Iraqi projects covered by the BNL letters of credit.  The company has been trying to get this export license since early this year but has encountered months of delays.  A Matrix-Churchill spokesman confirmed that the company sought subcontractors for such projects, but said neither this nor other projects are intended for defense purposes, just as he denied that Matrix was exporting machine tools for defense purposes.  He conceded the machines could be "retooled" for defense purposes by the Iraqis with "a very sophisticated machine."  The machine that XYZ wants to export can be used for retooling.  It is a computer numerically controlled jig grinder made by Moore Special Tool Co. in Bridgeport, Conn.  The grinder is used for making precision tooling.  It has various commercial applications, but can also make tooling for arms, according to David Douglass, international transportation manager for Moore.  "The government's concern is the end use in Iraq," he said.  "It's very possible to grind, for instance, missile parts and things like that."  He added, however, "Almost anything could be used for arms -- a drill press could."  Meanwhile, Europeo magazine yesterday reported that Luigi Sardelli, BNL's former North America manager, said in an interview that he had alerted BNL officials in Rome to irregularities at the Atlanta branch as early as October 1987.  Last night, BNL's former management was scathingly criticized in a confidential report by Bank of Italy inspectors that was read to the bank's board in their first meeting under BNL's new director general, Paolo Savona.  ---  Laura Colby in Milan, Italy, contributed to this article.  Murdoch Magazines, a division of Rupert Murdoch's News Corp., said it will launch a publication in November called Soap Opera Weekly.  Soap Opera Weekly will join Murdoch's other soap opera magazine, Soap Opera Digest, a biweekly which was purchased in June for $70 million.  "Soap opera fans are very enthusiastic about the serials they watch and the personalities appearing in them," says Leslie Hinton, Murdoch Magazines executive vice president.  "They will welcome weekly news on their shows, along with the biweekly Digest."  The launch of Soap Opera Weekly follows closely the previously reported plans of Capital Cities/ABC Inc. to publish Episodes, a magazine for the viewers of ABC Television Network soap operas.  Yesterday, Capital Cities/ABC executives officially confirmed the launch of Episodes on Feb. 20, 1990.  Episodes will be published by Fairchild Publications, a Capital Cities unit.  Murdoch's Soap Opera Weekly will sell for 99 cents a copy, primarily on newsstands.  ABC's Episodes will be sold only through telephone subscriptions.  Soap Opera Digest is one of the fastest growing consumer magazines.  For the first six months of 1989, it had 235 advertising pages, an increase of 66% from the same period last year.  Michelle Berman, publisher of Soap Opera Digest, will also be publisher of Soap Opera Weekly.  "If Murdoch increases the size of the pie and maintains his share, he's not hurting himself," said Valerie Muller, media director for Pedone & Partners, a New York ad agency.  "If soaps are hot and people are flocking to the product, why not bring out a new product?  They won't give up Soap Opera Digest.  They will get both."  Amdura Corp. said it sued Cilluffo Associates L.P. in Denver federal court, charging that the group violated securities laws in trying to replace Amdura's board.  Amdura, a Denver hardware distributor, said its lawsuit charges that the Cilluffo group has "secret understandings" with other Amdura stockholders.  It also alleges that other Amdura shareholders have been soliciting votes on Cilluffo's behalf without making the required disclosures under securities laws.  An Amdura spokesman said the lawsuit was filed "to ensure that the consent solicitation proceeds fairly."  In New York, Cilluffo said it believes the Amdura lawsuit is without merit and called the suit "a desperate, last-minute measure."  Cilluffo, which owns 17.5% of Amdura, is soliciting votes to replace Amdura's board.  Its solicitation, which will require approval of more than half of Amdura's shareholders, expires in October.  Amdura stock fell 37.5 cents to close at $13 a share in New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday.  Mexico and its main creditor banks agreed on the details of a four-year financing package, triggering a bridge loan of as much as $2 billion from the U.S. and other industrialized countries.  Mexico is expected to draw that money next week, according to a statement released last night by Angel Gurria, an undersecretary at the Mexican finance ministry, and William Rhodes, the senior Citicorp official who heads the bank committee that negotiates with Mexico.  Mexico and its banks will circulate the proposed debt package to banks around the world and expect to sign the agreement within a few months.  U.S. Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady said in a statement that the pact "represents another important step forward in implementing the strengthened debt strategy and in Mexico's efforts to obtain needed debt reduction and new financing to support its economic reform package."  On March 10, Mr. Brady announced a shift in the international debt strategy, stressing reductions in debt and interest payments made by heavily indebted developing countries rather than continued lending.  An agreement in principle on the main points of the Mexican commercial bank financing was reached July 24.  The package covers about $52.7 billion in medium-term and long-term debt owed by the Mexican government to commercial banks.  Howtek Inc. and News America Holdings Inc., the U.S. unit of News Corp., said they reached an agreement under which News Corp. will buy one million Howtek shares at $12, bringing the company's holdings to 20% of Howtek's fully diluted common shares.  The proposed transaction is subject to a definitive agreement and certain regulatory approvals, Howtek said.  The Hudson, N.H., company makes four-color scanners and solid ink-jet printers for publishing and computer markets.  News Corp. is Rupert Murdoch's U.K.-based publishing and communications company.  Robert Howard, Howtek's chairman, said he expects the company to become profitable in the fourth quarter and report "on or near break-even" results in the third quarter.  He said the News America purchase represented the exercise of a warrant granted when the company first purchased 661,000 shares last year.  Some House Democrats broke with their Senate counterparts and endorsed the Bush administration's proposal to increase spending on anti-drug programs by $2.2 billion in the next fiscal year.  But in a hearing before a House Appropriations subcommittee yesterday, the panel's chairman disagreed with administration officials over how much money should be cut from the military budget to pay for expanded drug programs.  In the Senate, meanwhile, Democrats agreed in a closed caucus to support a proposal by Senate Appropriations Committee Chairman Robert Byrd (D., W.Va.) to double the increases in anti-drug programs sought by President Bush and to make offsetting across-the-board budget cuts that would trim about $1.7 billion in Pentagon spending authority.  Senate Majority Leader George Mitchell of Maine called the Byrd proposal "a substantial improvement of the president's plan" but said Senate Democrats are willing to negotiate with administration officials and GOP senators on the matter.  A White House spokesman yesterday said, "We want to work out a compromise" with Congress.  On the House side, Democrats appeared to be much closer to agreement with the White House.  Rep. Neal Smith (D.,Iowa), the Appropriations subcommittee chairman, said, "There is no major disagreement over the mix and the amount" of federal money to be spent on anti-drug programs.  Mr. Smith differed with administration officials, however, over how to pay for the president's proposed $7.9 billion anti-drug plan for fiscal 1990, which begins Oct. 1.  He suggested that Congress cut all discretionary federal spending programs, except those in the drug area, by 0.46% to pay for the Bush plan.  Richard Darman, the White House budget director, immediately rejected that formula because it would result in a $1.4 billion cut in military spending.  Instead, Mr. Darman said the administration would accept "extremely reluctantly" a 0.22% across-the-board spending reduction that would result in a $670 million cut in the Pentagon budget.  In presenting its antidrug package last week, the administration suggested savings of only $132 million from the military.  But the budget director quickly added that the smaller across-the-board reduction would have to be supplemented by at least some of the individual cuts in domestic programs that the administration originally proposed as the way to pay for increased anti-drug spending.  As one example, Mr. Darman urged the House Democrats to endorse an administration proposal to reduce by $320 million the amount the Department of Health and Human Services spends to help states pay for the legalization of immigrants.  "We are not that far away from each other," Mr. Darman told Mr. Smith.  "To the extent that some of our offsets {in domestic programs} are accepted in particular areas, it then allows you to have a lower across-the-board percentage" cut, which in turn could be the basis of a compromise, Mr. Darman said.  Rep. Jamie Whitten (D., Miss.), chairman of the House Appropriations Committee, praised the Bush drug strategy but said more money should be spent on the problem.  "The plan is good; the problem is it doesn't go far enough," he said at the hearing.  Mr. Whitten didn't specify whether he believes more money ought to be spent immediately or which programs he thinks deserve increases.  President Bush's anti-drug plan emphasizes increased federal funding for prisons and local law enforcement, as well as expanded efforts to fight cocaine traffickers in Latin America.  The president also urged more federal spending on treatment and prevention programs.  ---  John E. Yang contributed to this article.  AMRE Inc. said its president and two other officers are in talks about a possible management-led leveraged buy-out of the direct seller of home-improvement products.  The Irving, Texas, company said Steve Bedowitz, president; Robert Levin, executive vice president, and Ronald Wagner, senior vice president have had discussions with others about a buy-out, but haven't made any proposals to the company's board.  The three executives combined own about eight million, or about 56%, of AMRE's 14.1 million shares outstanding.  The company said that talks are continuing but that there aren't any guarantees that a transaction will occur.  The company, which markets its products under the Sears, Roebuck & Co. name, had a net loss of $5.7 million for the year ended April 30, after a $7.3 million loss from discontinuing its deck sales and manufacturing units.  Revenue was $183.9 million.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, AMRE stock fell 12.5 cents to close at $7.75 a share.  Results released yesterday by Campeau Corp.'s Federated Department Stores Inc. and Allied Stores Corp. units hint at the depth of their working capital crisis.  Campeau is unable to provide Allied with a $100 million credit line promised last April to meet the retailing unit's seasonal working capital needs, Allied said.  As a result, Allied's cash needs would be "significantly in excess" of its working capital during the last two fiscal quarters, it said.  Allied had a working capital credit line of $350 million, but by the end of July, as it was gearing up to buy inventory for its Christmas season, $272 million had been used up.  Furthermore, if Campeau isn't able to obtain a $250 million loan from the Reichmann family's Olympia & York Developments Ltd., Allied won't be able to pay interest due today on its junk bonds, it said.  Analysts estimate the semiannual interest payment at about $50 million.  For its part, Federated, also facing cash needs projected to be much higher than its working capital funds, said it asked bankers to increase the amount of cash it can draw on its working capital credit lines by $50 million.  Federated had working capital credit lines of $750 million, but only $600 million of that was cash.  By the end of July, $514 million of the lines had been tapped.  Federated said it also asked its creditors to extend the maturities on $1.05 billion in loans by three months to April 30, 1990.  Federated and Allied said the $150 million and $100 million they hoped to get respectively from the possible loan from Olympia & York would enable them to meet their liquidity needs.  Both retailing units reported increases in quarterly and six-month operating cash flows, but their cash interest costs outpaced cash flow.  Federated said it had a pretax loss of $116.4 million in its second quarter ended July 29, compared with a loss of $174.2 million in the year-earlier period.  Its 26-week pretax loss widened to $206.7 million from $168.5 million a year earlier.  Sales for comparable divisions in the latest 26 weeks were $2.05 billion, an increase of 5.4% over $1.94 billion in the year-earlier period.  Allied said its second-quarter pretax loss narrowed to $48.2 million from $65.8 million.  Its 26-week loss was $99.6 million, compared with $138.7 million.  Allied's sales for comparable divisions rose 6.1% to $1.16 billion in the latest 26 weeks, from $1.09 billion.  The Senate Appropriations Committee approved back-to-back bills allocating more than $205 billion for major domestic programs in fiscal 1990, including child care and space initiatives and a 26% increase for AIDS research and treatment.  The combined budgets for the Departments of Labor, Education, and Health and Human Services would grow more than 9% to $138 billion in the fiscal year beginning Oct. 1.  And $67 billion -- representing a 10.5% increase -- is provided for the Departments of Veterans' Affairs and Housing and Urban Development as well as space and environmental agencies.  Current funding for the ambitious space-station program would be more than doubled to $1.85 billion.  On a 22-5 roll call, the panel agreed to set aside $10 million in space funds to sustain the early construction of a costly advanced solid rocket motor facility in Mississippi.  Without debate, the committee agreed to reject new funding for the high-speed national aerospace plane backed by the Bush administration, but $20 million was preserved to begin the $1.6 billion Craf-Cassini space mission.  National Science Foundation funding would be increased 7.3% to more than $2 billion, and total spending for programs under the Environmental Protection Agency would grow more than 9%, including a $150 million increase for the hazardous-waste superfund.  The increased funding for acquired immune deficiency syndrome research and treatment is a factor in pushing up the total budget for the National Institutes of Health to $7.7 billion.  But the Senate committee gives less discretion to the NIH than the House in deciding how the AIDS funds are, in fact, allocated.  Gay activists have expressed fear that funds designated for AIDS research will be diverted to other areas of research and, despite the size of the budgets yesterday, there is often fierce competition by different interest groups for the available funds.  While setting aside $1.2 billion for an expanded federal role in child care, the committee conceded that only a fraction of this money -- about $5 million -- has any likelihood of being spent in the next fiscal year.  Elsewhere, budget constraints forced a cut of $154 million from low-income fuel assistance -- a major priority in the House -- and the committee cut in half a proposed House initiative to add more than $1 billion for federal aid for the education of young public-school students from disadvantaged families.  The debate in full committee came as a Senate Appropriations subcommittee separately approved a $14.45 billion foreign-aid bill that would significantly expand on the Bush administration's proposals for aid to Eastern Europe while seeking to curb military aid in El Salvador.  The Overseas Private Investment Corp. would be authorized to back U.S. investment in Poland and Hungary, and the subcommittee added $75 million more for Poland, which would receive the bulk of a total package of more than $100 million for the two countries.  The El Salvador issue is sure to be fought on the Senate floor.  But the bill parcels out the promised $85 million in military aid in three portions, and establishes a process requiring consultation by the State Department and seeking some leverage over the conduct of the new Salvador regime.  Total spending for foreign assistance remains effectively frozen at current levels; these accounts have borne the brunt of fiscal pressures in recent years.  Major differences remain with the House over what priority to give development assistance and, in an effort to stretch available military aid, a provision in the bill has provoked the influential Greek-American lobby.  Military aid to Turkey and Greece would continue to be allocated on a traditional 10-7 ratio, but the bill would now allow the administration to cut back on unobligated funds that have backed up over the years to the two rival countries.  Greece, which has failed to spend much of what it has been given, is the more vulnerable and could lose as much as $350 million.  Though few anticipate such a large cut, the issue is a sensitive one for the nation, where new elections are expected soon.  The same budget pressures can play havoc with domestic policy as well.  To buy itself some leeway in funding housing and space programs, the Senate committee agreed to do away with the current cap of nearly $101,000 on Federal Housing Administration residential mortgages and allow the government to insure loans of up to 95% of the median costs of homes in a sales area.  The anticipated result will be to stimulate loans and fees collected from borrowers, yielding a short-term gain of $157 million in fiscal 1990 and papering over spending elsewhere.  "I wonder if we are making worse law in meeting targets," said Sen. Pete Domenici (R., N.M.), the ranking minority member of the Senate Budget Committee.  "It is a glaring example of policy driven by budget targets."  In similar fashion, a backlog of appropriations to fund state claims for aid given new immigrants has become a favorite target for both lawmakers and the Bush administration.  An estimated $241 million was reallocated from the account to cover new, more pressing demands in health and human services, and the Senate panel signaled that it would hold a further $320 million in reserve if needed to pay for new funding sought by the president for his anti-drug initiative.  As the Senate moves through its appropriations bills, the impact is felt in the House, which wrestled yesterday with a rider attached by Sen. Jesse Helms (R., N.C.) setting new restrictions on funding by the National Endowment for the Arts.  In heated language, conservatives demanded a vote to show support of Mr. Helms's amendment.  But the House Appropriations Committee leadership sidestepped the issue by offering a substitute resolution focusing on a separate Senate amendment requiring the disclosure of paid consultants who lobby on behalf of federal grants.  By a 264-153 margin, the Democratic-controlled chamber supported the panel, and the upshot is to further increase the likelihood of both houses accepting sweeping changes in disclosure rules covering those who lobby the executive branch.  Speaker Thomas Foley (D., Wash.) yesterday expressed his support of the requirements, first proposed by Senate Appropriations Committee Chairman Robert Byrd (D., W.Va.) largely in response to the influence-peddling scandals at HUD.  The dollar slipped amid a relatively minor collection of reports and rumors that was enough to shake an edgy market.  Foreign-exchange traders said selling based on technical factors accelerated the U.S. currency's slide but noted that the quick move underscored the market's jitters over a series of U.S. economic data due for release today and tomorrow.  The dollar has posted strong gains recently on perceptions that a steady slowing of U.S. economic activity has halted and that a modest rebound is under way.  Traders cautioned that if the economic indicators betray the latest view, the dollar may tumble.  Concerns also continue to weigh on the U.S. currency that European central banks -- in particular the Bundesbank -- will raise interest rates soon, drawing away money from dollar-denominated interest-bearing investments, traders said.  In late afternoon New York trading, the dollar was at 1.9705 marks, down from 1.9863 marks late Tuesday, and at 146.33 yen, down from 146.95 yen.  Sterling was at $1.5600, up from $1.5488.  In Tokyo Thursday, the U.S. currency opened for trading at 146.05 yen, down from Wednesday's Tokyo close of 146.70 yen.  Dealings got under way uneventfully in Asia yesterday, with prices confined to Tuesday's narrow range.  The dollar slipped below technical support at 147 yen in the Tokyo afternoon, however, and the Bank of Japan sold dollars as the currency was weakening in order to amplify the effect of its intervention.  The intervention, although reportedly small, helped trigger further selling, which pushed the dollar beneath its trading range by the start of European dealings.  Then, a rumor that the Bundesbank was planning to switch its key Lombard rate to a daily floating rate from a fixed level unnerved the market further, traders said.  Although reaction to the rumor was limited and it was subsequently found to be untrue, "it's the sort of thing that reinforces to a lot of people that caution is the way to play it," said Valerie Walker, corporate foreign-exchange manager at Harris Trust & Savings Bank in New York.  Traders pointed to jumps in some German interest rates as a likely background for the rumor.  Profit-taking kept the dollar under pressure at the start of U.S. trading.  And, in the afternoon, the market was further unsettled by reports that early September U.S. car sales had fizzled and a statement from a meeting of the Group of 10 industrial nations, stressing the need for more intense cooperation in monetary policy coordination.  At one point, the dollar fell below a closely watched chart point at 1.9750 marks, sparking fears that the U.S. currency would tumble rapidly, unleashing a wave of technical sales that bore the dollar to its lows of 1.9700 marks and 146.15 yen.  In hindsight, dealers said the lower car sales figures, largely because of small Ford Motor Co. inventories, and the G-10 official's routine statement would have gone unnoticed in a less nervous market.  Traders with more optimistic views on the dollar stressed that the currency's fall has cleaned up a market perceived as top-heavy with long-dollar positions and has paved the way for new buying once the indicators are released.  Others, however, see the move as indicative of a shift away from confidence that the U.S. indicators due at the end of the week will bolster the dollar.  "While 2.05 {marks} is still possible, I think with the momentum having stopped here this week it's going to take some really good, good {economic} news to push us up.  And I'm expecting just OK news," said John Lynam, vice president at Security Pacific International Bank in New York.  "If we don't get through 2.00 {marks}" tomorrow, "we then could see a serious correction," Mr. Lynam said.  On the Commodity Exchange in New York, gold for current delivery settled at $359.90 an ounce, up 40 cents.  Estimated volume was a light 1.3 million ounces.  In early trading in Hong Kong Thursday, gold was quoted at $359.55 an ounce.  The House unanimously approved legislation to tighten federal oversight of the nation's commodities markets and take strong steps to curb trading abuses.  The bill, passed by a vote of 420-0, is the first major legislative action in the wake of the Federal Bureau of Investigation's sting operation earlier this year at the Chicago Board of Trade and the Chicago Mercantile Exchange.  The Senate Agriculture Committee is expected to create its own bill by the end of the month, and its chairman, Sen. Patrick Leahy (D., Vt.), says he wants legislation to pass the full Senate by year end.  The House bill, authored by Rep. Glenn English (D., Okla.), chairman of the House Agriculture Subcommittee on Conservation, Credit and Rural Development, is designed to toughen futures-exchange rules and put more clout into the hands of the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.  "We have got to have a tough, strong, hands-on regulator, an arms-length regulator," Rep. English said.  The changes are part of legislation that would permanently reauthorize the CFTC and boost the agency's budget 14% to $40 million in the fiscal year starting Oct. 1.  The bill would prohibit dual trading in any contract market with daily average volume of 7,000 contracts or more -- those considered difficult to track without a sophisticated computer system.  Dual trading, in which a broker trades for his own account as well as for a customer, became the hottest issue amid widespread customer complaints that brokers were trading for their own accounts just before they placed large orders for customers.  The bill also calls for the exchanges to maintain an "audit trail" that would provide information on all executed transactions.  The exchanges would be required to pinpoint to the minute the time of any trade; within three years, the standard would be tightened to 30 seconds.  The Senate committee is likely to propose much tougher audit-trail procedures.  Last week, the General Accounting Office reported that 84% to 90% of trade times at three exchanges can be verified as meeting that one-minute standard.  Last month the CFTC proposed steps to tighten control over the preparation and submission of trading cards, ordering that those cards be turned in every half-hour.  But the GAO told the Senate Agriculture Committee that leaving the trading cards in the hands of floor traders still leaves room for abuses.  Yesterday's House bill also would make insider trading at the futures exchanges a felony.  It would raise the penalties the CFTC can impose to $1 million for companies and $500,000 for individuals, from the current levels of $500,000 and $100,000, respectively.  Moreover, the bill includes several amendments that take on sticky issues at the exchanges.  Rep. David Nagle (D., Iowa) offered an amendment that would force exchange governors to recuse themselves from important votes if they or their employers has a position in a contract that would be effected by that vote.  Six Chicago Board of Trade governors, including its chairman and vice chairman, found themselves in such a position in July but didn't recuse themselves.  An amendment approved yesterday would require the CFTC to monitor margin levels of stock-index-futures contracts so that they are high enough to protect the integrity of the futures markets.  An amendment proposed by Rep. English also would tighten standards for the qualifications of CFTC commissioners.  Future nominees would have to have "demonstrated knowledge in futures trading or its regulation" or be involved in some aspect of the commodities industry.  The amendment appears in part to be directed at President Bush's most recent nominee to the CFTC, Margot Machol, who has served as a member of the Federal Trade Commission and on the Council of Economic Advisers.  "We can no longer afford to conduct on-the-job training for the agency's commissioners," Rep. English said.  CFTC Chairman Wendy Gramm said she hadn't "had a chance to look at all the amendments.  We have some minor questions and concerns with some parts of the bill, but on balance it's a good bill."  The U.S. is trying a softer line in trade talks with the Japanese: We want to help you.  So far, the new approach has gotten lip service from the Japanese government and mostly lip from Japanese commentators.  Commerce Secretary Robert Mosbacher elaborated on the theme in Tokyo this week.  At least eight U.S. officials invoked it at the first session here last week of the so-called Structural Impediment Initiative talks designed to attack deep-rooted practices that inhibit free trade.  The message: If Japan changes its business practices, it will help its own people live better lives.  Prices will be lower.  Choices will be greater.  Oh, by the way, Americans also might sell more here so that tension between the two allies might ease.  "Whether a corporate consumer of telecommunications services or a housewife buying groceries, the Japanese consumer does not get a fair break in his own marketplace," said Mr. Mosbacher.  He emphasized that the U.S. is serious about seeing "concrete, measurable results" from the structural-impediment talks within a year.  The Commerce Department's new approach is an attempt to look for areas where U.S. interests can dovetail with Japanese concerns about their economy.  For example, many Japanese recognize that Japan's notoriously high prices would probably drop if its distribution system were streamlined.  So, the official response has been to parrot the U.S. line.  "We must think more of the consumer, not because we are told to do so from outside, but to enhance the quality of our own life," said Prime Minister Toshiki Kaifu on his visit to the U.S. early this month.  But many Japanese bridle at the tone of the American approach and few think changes can be made within a year.  Most Japanese are fairly content with the existing systems.  Japan's manufacturers benefit from the financial and cultural ties that bind businesses together and bar the way to outsiders.  These "keiretsu", as the corporate ties are called, assure a stable supply of quality materials over the long haul.  Japanese housewives will pay high prices in exchange for the service that accompanies even the purchase of a head of lettuce, especially since local prices have hardly risen in recent years.  And everyone is delighted that the system means Japan has almost no unemployment.  All those magnanimous American officials strike some as plain old patronizing Yankees.  "Such American high-handedness may well reflect the condescending attitude the U.S. has continued to have, if unconsciously, toward Japan, ever since its victory in World War II and the ensuing occupation," says Masahiko Ishizuka in an editorial in the Japan Economic Journal.  Those that aren't offended by the tone of the new American message dismiss the tactic as insincere.  "They should be rational, stick to a yes-or-no discussion," says Jimbe Ando, a writer and informal adviser to Takako Doi, chairwoman of the Japan Socialist Party, adding: "If they want to talk softly to show we're not locked in an economic war, that's all right, but otherwise they should just stick to their real concern -- whether Japan is fair or not."  The Socialists recently outstripped the ruling party in an election for the upper house of the parliament largely on a pro-consumer, anti-consumption tax platform.  The U.S. approach has already generated at least one measurable result.  It has sparked an explosion of sarcasm, not a common form of humor in Japan.  At Mr. Mosbacher's speech, where some 300 people snickered through several irreverent questions, one by a local television reporter captured the mood best.  "In your speech you expressed so much concern about the Japanese public, and I feel I must thank you very much," a Tokyo Broadcasting System reporter said.  He went on to point out that in his upbeat speech, the commerce secretary never mentioned the words "U.S.-Japan trade imbalance."  "Does that mean that as long as the Japanese people are happy and content, you will be satisfied, even if your trade deficit doesn't decline?"  Mr. Mosbacher ignored the sarcasm, but responded: "If Japan has an open market and we have an open market and the trade imbalance remains the same, I'd say it's because we're not being competitive in the U.S.  If that happens, it'll be totally our problem."  Robert Campeau knew he was risking everything in his audacious bid to assemble the nation's foremost department-store empire.  Now, barely a year after the empire was assembled, it is on the verge of crashing down around him, starved for cash as lenders move to take control.  Just five days after the Canadian entrepreneur put his crown jewel, Bloomingdale's, up for sale in a bid to raise operating funds, Mr. Campeau's Campeau Corp. disclosed that Olympia & York Developments Ltd. may gain control of the company under a complex agreement in principle in which the big Canadian real-estate concern would inject $250 million in desperately needed funds.  Without the loan from Olympia & York, Campeau disclosed yesterday, it doesn't have the money to operate its retail subsidiaries -- raising the specter of half-empty shelves at some of the nation's leading department stores, like Jordan Marsh and Abraham & Straus, during the all-important Christmas season.  One of Campeau's operating units also faces a $50 million interest payment due tomorrow.  But in exchange for what is only a relatively modest cash infusion, O&Y, already the owner of some 25% of Campeau, could take control of the retail company's board.  Executives familiar with the loan talks say O&Y -- owned by the three Reichmann brothers of Toronto -- then would be likely to break up Campeau Corp., selling additional assets besides Bloomingdale's.  "For Campeau, this is panic time," says Howard Davidowitz, a New York retail consultant.  The widening disclosures of Campeau's financial problems sent its stock tumbling C$3.375 a share to C$13.50 on the Toronto Stock Exchange.  The bonds of Campeau's Allied Stores and Federated Department Stores units plunged as much as 20%.  Apparel makers, already jolted by the bankruptcy-law filing of retailer L.J. Hooker Corp. earlier this year, nervously were monitoring Campeau's liquidity squeeze.  Campeau's abrupt disclosures followed weeks of upbeat remarks by company officials about its financial condition.  At the annual meeting in late July, Mr. Campeau indicated the stores' cash flow would considerably exceed interest expenses.  Campeau also indicated that it would shortly obtain $1 billion in loans needed to refinance debt.  Moreover, retail sales have been showing signs of strength in recent months.  In particular, women's apparel, the mainstay of any department store, has been rebounding after a two-year slump.  Indeed, both Federated and Allied said yesterday that sales for the second quarter ended July 31 increased more than 5% from the year-earlier period.  But this wasn't enough to get Mr. Campeau out from under the mountain of debt he had taken on.  The problems are undoubtedly a shattering blow to Mr. Campeau.  Last year, when he acquired Federated for $6.6 billion after a bidding war with R.H. Macy & Co., Mr. Campeau spoke of creating a vast retailing and shopping-center empire.  He took particular pride in his ownership of Bloomingdale's and the entree to New York society the glittering store provided, say people who know him.  The former Ontario factory hand, who had made his fortune in real estate, was a beaming host at elegant store openings and charity dinners.  His wife, Ilse, would sometimes phone Bloomingdale's Chairman Marvin Traub to offer suggestions on merchandise the store should carry.  The 66-year-old Mr. Campeau "had visions of grandeur of owning the most glamorous retail chain in the world and now that dream is shattered," asserts Kurt Barnard, the publisher of Retail Marketing Report. (Mr.  Campeau wasn't available for comment yesterday.)  The crunch also could be seen as an embarrassment to Bruce Wasserstein, the celebrated investment banker who was Mr. Campeau's lead adviser on the purchase of Federated.  Mr. Wasserstein's old firm, First Boston Corp., which provided financing for the Federated bid, still owns several hundred million in Campeau junk bonds that it couldn't sell, people familiar with the firm say.  Prices of many of these securities have declined as much as 45%, or $450 per $1,000 face amount.  First Boston officials declined to comment about their exposure to Campeau.  Mr. Wasserstein, chief executive of Wasserstein, Perella & Co., wouldn't comment either.  Even at the time of the Federated deal, skeptics doubted that Mr. Campeau could succeed after paying such a steep price.  In fact, shortly after the purchase, an O&Y executive almost seemed to be anticipating the empire's demise.  "We're like the Allied powers in World War II," the executive said.  "When the war is over we'll be moving in to scoop up as many of the pieces as we can."  Mr. Campeau toasted his Federated acquisition with a glass of Dom Perignon in mid-1988.  But the cold reality of what he had taken on was clear: Combined with his 1986 purchase of Allied, Mr. Campeau had a staggering debt burden of $10 billion.  The mercurial risk-taker figured he would confound the skeptics with a bold program of asset sales, cost cutting and expansion of such chains as Bloomingdale's.  Indeed, a glamorous new Bloomingdale's opened in Chicago last year.  But that was one of the only successes in Mr. Campeau's master plan.  Sales of such chains as Ann Taylor and Gold Circle brought less than projected.  Caught in an industrywide slump in women's apparel sales, Campeau's retail operation failed to meet the ambitious revenue projections that were crucial to servicing the debt.  The Allied unit, for example, reported a cash flow of $40.6 million for the first fiscal quarter ended April 30 -- while its interest costs were an overwhelming $65.3 million.  Campeau's big troubles started last November, when the company's ability to tap previous lenders petered out.  Underwriters at First Boston tried and failed to sell a $1.15 billion offering of junk bonds for the Federated unit.  First Boston scaled back the offering to $750 million, but still wound up keeping a significant portion of the securities when it couldn't find sufficient investors.  The Federated bonds have dropped about 20 points, or $200 for each $1,000 face amount, since then, while Allied Stores has posted a decline on its bonds of some 45%.  Unable to sell more securities, Campeau now found its feet held to the fire by First Boston, PaineWebber Inc. and Dillon Read & Co., which lent Campeau $1.1 billion in the form of a bridge loan when the Canadian company acquired Federated.  Campeau couldn't pay off the entire loan, as scheduled on Jan. 27 of this year, and wound up ceding greater power to its investment bankers.  Campeau and First Boston said they intended to sell $400 million of Federated bonds.  But they couldn't find sufficient buyers to make such a sale possible.  A financing involving mortgages on Campeau's U.S. properties was then proposed.  According to industry executives, Campeau's bankers were willing to provide $1.4 billion in conventional mortgage financing, and Mr. Campeau's advisers urged him to accept.  Instead, according to the executives, Mr. Campeau persisted with a proposal to borrow over $3 billion using an unconventional method of mortgage financing.  Under his proposal, Mr. Campeau wanted a lower interest rate in the early years of the loan than banks had proposed.  But in exchange, creditors would receive an interest in the future sales growth of the Campeau department stores.  Lenders balked at Mr. Campeau's proposal.  Worse, bankers became increasingly reluctant to provide even conventional mortgage financing to Campeau.  At Campeau itself, President James T. Roddy resigned in April.  He was soon followed by Carolyn Buck Luce, a former First Boston investment banker who had joined Campeau to help with financing the debt.  During the summer, as the remaining Campeau executives struggled to obtain new financing, Federated and Allied were rapidly depleting their working capital facilities.  According to Securities and Exchange Commission filings made yesterday, Allied had used up $272 million of its $350 million working capital credit line by the end of July.  Of its total working capital facility of $750 million, Federated is permitted to withdraw only $600 million; it had drawn down $514 million by the end of July.  Although sales at both divisions were on the upswing, they were lagging behind gains at some other department stores.  In the first six months of the year, Federated and Allied posted sales increases of between between 5% and 6%, compared with double-digit gains at such chains as Limited Inc., Dayton Hudson Corp., and May Department Stores.  At the same time, costs weren't dropping significantly.  At Federated, overhead expenses amounted to 24% of sales in the second quarter, down only slightly from 25% in the prior year.  Top Federated and Allied executives still are receiving princely salaries and perks.  John W. Burden III, chairman and chief executive of the two chains, has an employment contract giving him an annual salary of $1 million plus an annual living allowance of $250,000.  James Zimmerman, president and chief operating officer of the chains, received an interest-free housing loan of $1 million.  As Federated and Allied were running out of money, Christmas loomed on the horizon.  Stores order their merchandise for the critical Christmas season in the summer.  They have to pay for that merchandise in the fall.  "October is the critical time because a lot of payables come due for the holiday season," notes Mr. Davidowitz, the consultant.  Neither Federated nor Allied would have enough money to pay vendors.  What's more, new loans were supposed to be in place by this summer to replace $800 million in debt that comes due next January and a $400 million bridge loan provided by First Boston, PaineWebber and Dillon Read.  Under the terms of the bridge loan, if Campeau can't obtain refinancing commitments by this week, the bridge lenders will obtain a 7% equity stake in Federated.  Campeau announced yesterday that it still doesn't have the new-loan commitments.  But of more pressing concern to Mr. Campeau is the short-term cash needs of his stores.  In addition to Christmas-season merchandise, one of the store units, Allied, has $50 million in interest payments due to bondholders this Friday and doesn't have the funds to meet that commitment.  Mr. Campeau, apparently with nowhere else to turn, approached O&Y and its owners, the secretive and hugely wealthy Reichmann family.  Executives familiar with the situation say O&Y reluctantly agreed to bail out Campeau to protect its investment.  According to an agreement in principle announced late Tuesday, O&Y would lend Campeau $250 million, and the loan would be convertible into Campeau stock.  Neither company released details, but some analysts estimate the loan could increase O&Y's stake to 35% fully diluted, and decrease Mr. Campeau's controlling position below 50%.  In addition, O&Y would be expected to take control of Campeau's board.  Executives familiar with the situation say the Reichmann brothers aren't eager to run department stores.  If, as expected, the Reichmanns wind up controlling the company, they may sell or spin off the retailing operations.  The first of such transactions could be Bloomingdale's, which Mr. Campeau put up for sale last week.  However, the Reichmanns have been known to back out of negotiations at the last minute.  Within the last month, they pulled back on proposed purchases of the real estate unit of BCE Inc. and the Sears tower in Chicago.  Moreover, the O&Y deal needs approval of all the lenders, including Ohio mall developer Edward J. DeBartolo.  Campeau acknowledged it doesn't have any assurance it will get the $250 million loan.  ---  Neil Barsky contributed to this article.  ---  @ What Remains of Campeau's Empire  @ NET SALES FOR  @ NUMBER OF YEAR ENDED  @ STORES AT JAN. 31, 1989*  @ JAN. 31, (In millions  @DIVISION MAIN U.S. LOCATION 1989 of dollars)  @ Allied  @The Bon Pacific Northwest 39 $ 587  @Jordan Mash New England 26 726  @Maas Florida 38 628  @Stern's New York, New Jersey 27 704  Federated  @Bloomingdale's  @ Eastern U.S. Illinois, Texas 17 $ 938  @Abraham &  @ Straus New York, New Jersey 14 584  @Burdines Florida 30 645  @Lazarus Midwest 43 746  @Rich's Southeast 26 662  Supermarkets  @ Ralphs Southern California 134 $2,400  @ TOTAL 394 $8,620  *Net sales shown for Federated are for the period May 3, 1988, to Jan. 31, 1989, reflecting results of operations following the corporation's acquisition of Federated  Wiener Enterprises Inc. said three representatives of Boots Co. were named to its board, succeeding three representatives of a Ward White PLC unit.  The New Orleans-based specialty retailer also said the board voted to omit the dividend.  Wiener said the board decided it wouldn't declare the six-cent-a-share quarterly dividend because the company had a $57,000 loss for the second quarter ended July 29 on sales of $21.6 million.  It also cited difficult conditions related to its home-improvement stores.  Wiener said Gordon R. Solway, chairman of Boots Co. (USA), was elected chairman of Wiener, and James S. Lyons, chief financial officer of the U.S. unit, and James E. Morrow, general counsel of the U.S. unit, were elected directors.  They succeed Philip Birch, former Wiener chairman; John W.E. Sharp and David D. de Carle on the eight-member board.  For the six months, Wiener had a net loss of $47,000 on sales of $43.5 million.  A top mergers and acquisitions adviser at Citicorp resigned, citing his frustrations with organizational changes and the bank's reluctance to advise parties making hostile offers.  Gordon F. Wolf, who joined Citibank's mergers and acquisitions unit 2 1/2 years ago, said he quit to join Golodetz Group, a New York trading and finance company with $1 billion in assets, to set up a leveraged buy-out operation.  Mr. Wolf is the second person to leave the Citibank unit in recent months.  In June, Robert H. Whitby, who headed the mergers and acquisitions unit, resigned.  Mr. Wolf, 44, said he resigned after several advisory assignments ran into difficulties within Citibank.  "We had three or four situations where we were advising clients -- not raiders, but legitimate business owners -- who had made offers where the situation could become hostile.  These were situations where the targets were good companies with lousy management."  Mr. Wolf added: "This was controversial.  Inside Citicorp, there is a great reluctance to advise on the hostile side, even though they find it okay to finance hostile offers by Marvin Davis, Carl Icahn and others.  There was a feeling that we were going after a potential client, and over there everybody is a potential client.  They were eliminating the possibility of generating that kind of revenue."  Mr. Wolf declined to identify the specific situations.  Asked about Mr. Wolf's departure, J. Robert Clement, head of mergers and acquisitions at Citicorp, said: "In the U.S., there have been no resignations which were regretted."  Mr. Clement added, "There is no question that we are committed to mergers and acquisitions.  This business is increasingly complex.  The only way to build it is global teamwork.  We have two strengths in this business, the size of our balance sheet and our global network.  If we use those effectively, we can truly compete with the leaders in this business.  We are in the process of building that organization."  Mr. Wolf also chafed at organizational changes that required mergers and acquisitions advisers to work with clients in cooperation with account officers.  "That was terrible," he said.  "I was disappointed in the last year by the total performance of the specialized finance group," he added, referring to a group that also included Citibank's leveraged buy-out unit, its venture capital operation and structured finance unit.  "The synergies just weren't there.  Mergers and acquisitions work is driven by individuals, not organizations."  Before joining Citicorp, Mr. Wolf scouted takeover candidates, including Ashland Oil Inc. and USG Corp., for the Belzberg brothers' First City financial Corp. of Vancouver.  Mobil Corp. said it would realize a net gain of $192 million from the exchange of waterfront property leases in Hong Kong.  The New York oil giant's affiliate in Hong Kong will build a terminal at the site, which will include 1.6 million barrels of fuel tankage and marine facilities to handle tankers up to 80,000 deadweight tons.  It is expected to be completed by early 1993, Mobil said.  Mobil's gain will be realized in the current third quarter.  In exchange for the lease on its 33-acre site, Mobil received rights to 24 acres and a cash payment from the Hong Kong government.  The plots of land, both on Tsing Yi Island, are about one mile apart.  Georgia Gulf Corp., rebuffing investor Harold Simmons and NL Industries Inc., said it authorized its financial advisers to explore an array of possible transactions.  Specifically, Georgia Gulf said it told Goldman, Sachs & Co. to investigate the possibility of a leveraged recapitalization, an acquisition, a joint venture, the sale of the company, "or other business combination."  Georgia Gulf said its executives met yesterday with NL officials to review their suggestions regarding a leveraged recapitalization or other transaction.  Georgia Gulf, a chemicals concern, had previously given a cold shoulder to a Simmons-NL Industries offer to acquire the company or help it recapitalize.  That proposal would bring shareholders at least $55 a share in cash, or $1.38 billion.  Mr. Simmons and NL Industries own 9.9% of Georgia Gulf.  In Dallas, Michael Snetzer, president of Valhi Inc., Mr. Simmons' 88%-owned holding company, said that if Georgia Gulf's alternatives "mean delivering $55 a share to shareholders, that's a good start."  Valhi owns 66% of NL.  LINCOLN N.C. REALTY FUND Inc. reduced its third-quarter dividend to 21 cents a share from 35 cents a share, citing lower income expectations.  The Palo Alto, Calif., real estate investment trust said the lower expectations stem from transactions involving a research and development complex in Milpitas, Calif.  Lincoln, which has interests in other California real estate including multifamily developments, said the dividend is payable Nov. 3 to stock of record Oct. 16.  Huntington Bancshares Inc., Columbus, Ohio, said it agreed to acquire First Macomb Bancorp, Mt. Clemens, Mich., in a stock swap valued at about $52 million.  Under terms of the agreement, shares outstanding of First Macomb will be exchanged for Huntington Bancshares common stock and accounted for as a pooling-of-interests.  First Macomb, with assets of about $380 million, will become a unit of Huntington Bancshares Michigan Inc., which upon completion of the merger will have four banks with 35 offices and about $1.2 billion in assets.  The merger is subject to regulatory and shareholder approval.  Datapoint Corp. accused a group of shareholders trying to oust Chairman Asher B. Edelman of violating Securities and Exchange Commission rules.  In a suit filed in federal court in Manhattan yesterday, the San Antonio, Texas, manufacturer of data processing and computer systems accused New York lawyer Martin S. Ackerman and other members of the dissident group of directly contacting Datapoint shareholders without filing the necessary proxy materials with the SEC. Mr. Ackerman is chairman and chief executive officer of Authorized Distribution Network Inc., Blackwood, N.J., which also was named in the suit.  Mr. Ackerman wasn't immediately available for comment.  The dissidents, who own about 4.6% of Datapoint's approximately 10 million shares outstanding, began a consent solicitation last week to replace Mr. Edelman and six directors with their five nominees.  Chiron Corp. reported that its loss widened in the first quarter ended July 31 from a year earlier largely because of higher research and development costs.  The Emeryville, Calif., biotechnology concern said its loss widened to $3.9 million from $2.4 million a year earlier.  Revenue increased 5.6% to $7.5 million from $7.1 million.  The company said its research and development costs increased 27% to $9.6 million.  Costs increased, the company said, because of preclinical and clinical trials for products moving closer to market.  Chiron said earnings also were hurt by a $581,000 charge in connection with a decision to postpone construction of new pilot manufacturing facilities and by an increase in marketing expenses for its Chiron Ophthalmics Inc. subsidiary.  Congressional investigators have broadened their investigation of the generic-drug industry to include production problems reported by federal inspectors at a plant operated by Eli Lilly & Co.  In a letter to Food and Drug Administration Commissioner Frank E. Young, the chairman of the House investigations subcommittee called for records on inspections of more than 50 Lilly manufacturing plants dating back to 1985.  Subcommittee chairman John D. Dingell said the request was triggered by the FDA's disclosure Tuesday of widespread quality-control problems at one of Lilly's drug plants in Indianapolis.  Lilly said it had halted all drug shipments from the Indianapolis plant and recalled 10 products made there after the FDA reported the findings of its four-month investigation.  Separately, FDA officials disclosed yesterday that three other Lilly drug-manufacturing plants are under investigation in Puerto Rico.  An FDA spokesman in Washington said documents from the Indianapolis investigation were sent to Puerto Rico and that investigators were "looking for the same sort of problems that were found in Indianapolis."  The Puerto Rican investigation was started in late August, the FDA spokesman said.  FDA officials said they would probably decide within the next few weeks whether to expand their investigation to other Lilly manufacturing facilities.  "We are examining the results of the Indianapolis inspection to determine the magnitude and severity of the problems there and the likelihood they may affect the manufacture of other products," said Carl C. Reynolds, the FDA's Detroit district director.  The FDA's Detroit office is in charge of the investigation of Lilly in Indianapolis.  A Lilly spokesman said yesterday the company had received a call from a staff member of Rep. Dingell's subcommittee "expressing interest" in the FDA probe of the Indianapolis plant.  The Lilly spokesman declined to give details.  He also declined to discuss any details of the Puerto Rican investigation.  In composite trading yesterday on the New York Stock Exchange, Lilly's shares closed at $59.00, down 62.5 cents.  Rep. Dingell's subcommittee has been leading the federal probe into alleged wrongdoing by generic-drug makers.  So far, three FDA employees have pleaded guilty to charges of taking illegal gratuities from generic-drug makers, and manufacturing and record-keeping problems have been found at nearly a dozen generic-drug makers' plants.  The subcommittee's request for the inspection reports on Lilly marks the first time the federal probe has been extended to brand-name drug makers.  "We want to make sure that the FDA and the subcommittee treat the brand-name companies the same way the generics are treated," a subcommittee staff member said yesterday.  The House panel is seeking to learn whether Lilly filed false or misleading information with the FDA about its manufacturing processes in Indianapolis, the staff member said.  "We'd also be concerned if they changed drug formulations without notifying the FDA or didn't report problems like stability failures with their drugs," he said.  The FDA's report on its Indianapolis investigation relates a number of instances where Lilly's drugs failed to maintain their stability or to dissolve properly.  The report says Lilly did not maintain proper followup records on the failures.  OHIO EDISON Co. said it was selling $108 million of pollution control revenue refunding bonds.  The move will reduce the Akron, Ohio, utility company's annual interest expense by about $4.5 million.  Managing underwriters are Morgan Stanley & Co., Goldman, Sachs & Co., and McDonald & Co. Securities Inc.  MGM/UA Communications Co. said it received a surprise bid of about $1.4 billion, or $23.16 a common share, from Rupert Murdoch's News Corp. and its Fox Inc. unit.  The new bid comes just as Australian Qintex Group is trying to complete its acquisition of MGM/UA's United Artists studio and other assets in a complicated transaction valued at about $600 million.  As part of that agreement, Kirk Kerkorian, MGM/UA's majority shareholder, would retain ownership of the famous MGM lion logo and other assets.  MGM/UA officials couldn't be reached for comment on the News Corp. bid, but the company's directors are scheduled to meet today to discuss the proposal.  Nevertheless, MGM/UA said in a release that it expects to complete its planned merger agreement with Qintex.  MGM/UA shareholders are scheduled to vote on the agreement Sept. 23, and the Qintex acquisition was expected to be completed by Sept. 30.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, MGM/UA shares jumped $1.50 to close at $21.25.  Mr. Kerkorian has tried to sell MGM/UA for more than a year, and News Corp.'s Fox studio was one of two final suitors when the agreement with Qintex was announced in April.  Qintex agreed to buy all of MGM/UA shares for about $20 apiece, or $1 billion, and then to sell back certain assets to Mr. Kerkorian.  Qintex is an operator of resorts and an Australian commercial TV network.  It also has a stake in Qintex Entertainment Inc., a producer of TV movies and miniseries such as "Lonesome Dove."  Qintex officials declined to comment yesterday.  "You might see a bidding war, but I think it's unlikely," said Andrew Wallach, an analyst at Drexel Burnham Lambert Inc.  "I don't think Qintex can afford to go much higher," Mr. Wallach said, adding that "the market wasn't expecting a higher price."  A purchase of MGM/UA would be another bold and expensive move for Mr. Murdoch, who has managed to rapidly expand his media and entertainment businesses world-wide in recent years despite a seemingly crushing debt burden and difficulty in raising new funds.  News Corp., whose officials couldn't be reached for comment, has interests in daily newspapers, TV Guide and other magazines.  If the bid suceeds, it isn't clear whether News Corp. would try to merge MGM/UA with Fox.  Sources said that in its first round of bidding, officials inside News Corp. were divided on the issue.  However, analysts said the acquisition would give News Corp. an important supply of movies for its satellite pay-TV service in the U.K.  One of MGM/UA's most valuable assets is a library of some 4,000 titles, including such franchises as the Rocky, James Bond and Pink Panther films.  MGM/UA assets also include a film production and marketing unit, a domestic film distribution unit, a one-third interest in a world-wide film distribution venture, an international TV distribution unit and MGM/UA Home Video.  The assets that Mr. Kerkorian has planned to keep under the Qintex pact include MGM's TV production arm, a 34-title film library of movies that MGM has made in the last three years and MGM's new headquarters here.  Jeffrey Russell, an analyst at Drexel Burnham, said the acquisition of MGM/UA by News Corp. would make strategic sense for News Corp., because "it would give them more clout and more product" for both Fox Television and the European Sky Channel, the satellite service.  Analysts termed the News Corp. bid a reasonable price for all of MGM/UA's assets.  "The old {Qintex} price was pretty fair.  The new price is great," said Mr. Wallach of Drexel.  Mr. Wallach added that the United Artists library produces $90 million to $100 million in cash flow a year.  He also said that Mr. Murdoch has been negotiating with studios for certain movie rights to supply his distribution networks.  "He has gotten a lot of product, but he has had to pay up," said Mr. Wallach.  News Corp. has big financial obligations already.  Its ambitious European Sky Channel began beaming TV signals to homes in Britain and Ireland in February and expects to spend $780 million before breaking even in three to five years.  Analysts said that in recent months, however, News Corp. has sold some assets and taken other steps to cut its debt and restore some financial flexibility.  "There is some capacity for borrowing on top of an expanded equity base," said Mr. Russell.  As of June 1, he said, News Corp. is within the debt-to-equity ratio of 1.1 to 1 required under its covenants.  In addition to bidding $23.16 a share for MGM/UA's 53 million common shares, News Corp. bid $18 a share for MGM/UA's preferred shares, MGM/UA said.  Mr. Kerkorian holds about 10 million preferred shares, almost all of the preferred.  News Corp. also would assume $400 million of MGM/UA debt.  Under the Qintex pact, MGM/UA may terminate the merger if it decides to accept a higher bid.  If the pact is terminated, Qintex gets an $18.2 million fee.  According to an MGM/UA proxy, News Corp.'s Fox Inc. bid $19.80 a share for MGM/UA earlier this year.  The proxy material said antitrust issues were a factor in the rejection of the bid.  AMERICAN STORES Co. called for the redemption of all its Series A $4.375 cumulative convertible exchangeable preferred stock at $1 par value a share.  The preferred stock of this Salt Lake City grocery-store chain, unless converted into common, would be redeemed at $52.625, plus 70.72 cents a share in accrued and unpaid dividends through the Oct. 13 redemption date, for a total of $53.3322 a share.  American Stores said Series A holders have until 5 p.m. EDT, Oct. 12, to convert the preferred into common; each preferred share is convertible into 1.0782 common shares.  After Oct. 12, Series A holders will receive the redemption price.  American Stores has about 3.9 million Series A preferred shares that are convertible into 4.2 million common shares.  It has approximately 30 million common shares outstanding.  American Stores said the move will allow it to save about $12.8 million annually because of the difference between preferred and common-stock dividends.  Quaker Oats Co. said it will dismiss 245 employees under a plan to phase out production of its Van Camp's canned beans and specialty products at a plant in Indianapolis.  The Chicago food, pet food and toy company said the plant, which currently employs 350 people, will continue to produce its Gatorade thirst-quencher product.  The production phase-out will begin Nov. 13 and is expected to be completed by Dec. 15.  Quaker said the action is part of a recently announced cost reduction program in place at its U.S. Grocery Products Group to help the company meet higher financial targets.  The costs of the phase-out were reflected in the company's fiscal 1989 results, Quaker said.  For the year ended June 30, Quaker earned $203 million, or $2.56 a share, which included a restructuring charge of $124.3 million.  Los Angeles investor Marvin Davis isn't expected to raise his $6.19 billion bid for UAL Corp. before the carrier's board meets today to consider a higher bid of $6.75 billion by a pilot-management group.  According to people familiar with the battle for United Airlines, the UAL directors notified Mr. Davis yesterday that they plan to consider financing obtained by the group led by UAL Chairman Stephen Wolf, and intimated that they might accept that bid.  Mr. Davis is just completing a review begun Monday of UAL confidential data to help decide whether to raise his offer.  In response to questions from board representatives, Davis advisers are said to have indicated that he didn't anticipate making any further proposals before the meeting.  His reply apparently didn't rule out an increase later.  The lack of response from Mr. Davis could make it easier for the UAL board to hand the nation's second-largest airline over to what would become the largest employee-led airline owner.  That bidding group includes UAL pilots, management, and British Airways PLC.  But the 13 outside directors considering the two bids have acted cautiously during the seige, which is nearing the end of its sixth week, and may give Mr. Davis one more chance to top the Wolf group's $300-a-share offer.  UAL stock continued to advance yesterday on traders' belief the management buy-out may proceed swiftly.  It rose $2.25 a share to $283.25 in composite trading on the New York Stock Exchange, after a gain of $4.625 on Tuesday.  Mr. Davis is at a disadvantage in a bidding contest against the Wolf group because United pilots have agreed to cost concessions that will save the company $250 million a year.  By some calculations, that amounts to a bidding advantage of $30 to $50 a share.  The Wolf group is hoping the directors will respond favorably to bank-financing plans wrapped up earlier this week.  Late yesterday, the group said Citicorp would be the lead lender, with help from Chase Manhattan Corp. and others.  Citicorp is also the lead lender on Mr. Davis's $275-a-share proposal.  The Wolf group wants to conclude a speedy agreement because its fragile coalition could unravel in a lengthy internecine battle among United's four employee groups.  In a letter mailed to employees Monday, Mr. Wolf urged other employees to join the pilots in participating.  Mr. Wolf acknowledged that all employees who participate will have to take wage cuts.  He said this would happen no matter who ends up owning UAL.  "All of us -- through our efforts -- are going to pay for United's purchase in any event.  In the end, the issue is who owns the company," Mr. Wolf wrote.  He urged employees to consider any concessions as an "investment."  Mr. Wolf's letter kicked off what could be a tough public-relations campaign to bring the other employee groups on board.  It's still uncertain whether United's flight attendants and machinists will agree to participate, though the flight attendants say they are nearing a decision.  The Coalition Acting for the Rights of Employees, or CARE, a group that says it represents 40,000 UAL non-contract employees, opposes the Wolf buy-out.  Because the non-contract employees have no bargaining agent, UAL can cut their wages unilaterally.  Allen Kelley , CARE's president, says the group may seek an injunction to prevent the board from accepting the proposal.  But he concedes CARE would face an uphill fight.  Mr. Kelley said UAL management hasn't contacted CARE to explain the proposal, as it has United's unionized groups.  The machinists, who form United's largest union, have attacked the bid because of the debt load it will impose on the airline, saying that could threaten their job security as well as the airline's survival.  They have cut off further talks with UAL management about participating in the bid because management wants the union to sign an agreement promising to keep details of the labor-management proposal secret.  The machinists have refused to do this.  If the board does accept the Wolf group's bid, Mr. Davis can't make a hostile tender offer or seek the ouster of the board for a year under an agreement he reached to obtain confidential UAL data.  He can top the Wolf bid in a proposal to the board; challenge the sale process as unfair, or merely hang back and see whether the Wolf group can close the purchase.  National Intergroup Inc. said it has reached a definitive agreement to sell part of its aluminum operations to the U.S. unit of Toronto's Noranda Inc. for $117.7 million.  The sale, which has been long awaited, will result in a non-recurring gain of about $30 million in the third quarter ended Dec. 31.  In the year-ago quarter, National Intergroup earned $3.4 million, or 10 cents a share, including a $1 million tax benefit, on sales of $743.6 million.  While the sale of the rolling division was applauded by analysts, they questioned whether the company will be able to soon sell the remaining aluminum divisions, especially the company's 54.5% interest in a smelter plant.  The ailing company has promised investors that it would sell aluminum and steel operations to concentrate more fully on the wholesale drug distribution business.  Outside investors have pressured the company to shore up its balance sheet and to improve earnings following losses in six out of the last seven years.  Proceeds from the rolling-division sale will be applied toward debt.  National Intergroup appears to have received a respectable price for the rolling division given that those operations contributed $15.2 million in operating profit and $204.6 million in sales.  The division, with plants in North Carolina, Ohio and Arkansas, produces light gauge sheet and foils and employs about 500 people.  The aerospace systems group of Ball Corp., Muncie, Ind., received a contract valued at about $50 million to build a spacecraft for Canada's Radarsat Program.  Ball said it was selected by Spar Aerospace Ltd., the prime contractor of the Canadian-led international project, which is a major part of the Canadian space program, to build the spacecraft and to perform support services for the remote-sensing satellite program.  The packaging, industrial and aerospace-products concern said the National Aeronautics and Space Administration will launch the satellite and will operate a data-reception station in Alaska in exchange for radar data needed for its research programs and those of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration.  Radarsat will put a radar system into space to gather data to serve as a navigation aid and assist in management of offshore oil, gas and mineral exploration and oil-slick monitoring.  Ball said the launch is scheduled for 1994.  About a dozen Internal Revenue Agents swarmed over Southern Co. headquarters yesterday, executing three search warrants seeking records in connection with a criminal investigation of spare-parts accounting at the giant utility.  Gale Klappa, a Southern Co. spokesman, said he "had no earthly idea why they chose this route for obtaining records, since we have been cooperating fully with them in the investigation."  An IRS spokesman in Atlanta, declined to comment.  Southern Co. said the agents appeared in the lobby of the company's headquarters about 12:45 p.m. EDT and split into teams searching three areas of the building where tax records are kept by the Southern Co. Services unit, which oversees tax functions at the electric utility.  Mr. Klappa said the agents "yellow flagged" various records pertaining to spare parts accounting so that senior agents could determine whether they are relevant to an investigation by a federal grand jury that has spanned more than a year.  Among other things, the grand jury is looking at whether Southern Co.'s Georgia Power Co. unit and others conspired to defraud the federal government of millions of dollars in income taxes.  Yesterday's search marks the third time federal agents have raided Southern Co. facilities in connection with the probe.  An initial search warrant executed at Georgia Power in August 1988 was followed by a second in July 1989.  However, yesterday's raid is the first in which Southern Co.'s headquarters and the Southern Co. Services records were targeted.  First Chicago Corp. consolidated certain operations into a new North American banking group, a merchant banking group and a capital markets group.  The changes include naming several executives to new positions.  A.D. Frazier Jr., 45 years old, was named to manage the North American banking group, the banking concern's main domestic commercial banking operation.  He remains an executive vice president of the parent company.  He succeeds Leo F. Mullin, 46, in the North American group.  Mr. Mullin, also also an executive vice president at the parent, was named chief operating officer of First Chicago's Superregional Bank, its retailing operation.  John A. Canning Jr., 45, and J. Mikesell Thomas, 38, were named to manage the merchant banking group, specializing in corporate financing, restructurings and corporate buy-outs.  Both remain executive vice presidents of the parent.  David A. Vitale, 43, will manage the capital markets group, specializing in securities trading activities and other investment instruments.  He remains an executive vice president of the parent.  Richard L. Thomas, 58, president of the bank holding company, was named to the additional and new position of chief executive officer of the Superregional Bank.  Texas Instruments Inc., Dallas, said it will take a $10 million pretax charge for the third quarter to cover severance pay and overhead costs associated with a reduction in its work force.  The electronics and defense concern said it fired about 130 people in its defense electronics division when it reduced operations at a Colorado Springs, Colo., plant.  It cut another 100 defense jobs around the U.S.  In addition, the company said that about 700 workers in the division took advantage of a voluntary program offering severance or early retirement.  In a speech to analysts, company officials also said the semiconductor market is softening, especially for memory chips.  The company's comments follow the semiconductor industry's monthly report earlier this week, which indicated that new orders aren't keeping up with products shipped.  In the third quarter last year, Texas Instruments had net income of $93.7 million, or $1.03 a share, including a $17 million gain from settlement of litigation.  In New York Stock Exchange composite trading yesterday, the company's shares fell $1 to close at $40.125.  The nuclear weapons facility in Fernald, Ohio, isn't complying fully with environmental laws and with agreements it has reached with federal and state agencies, an Energy Department study found.  What's more, the staff of the facility isn't capable of ensuring that all environmental, health and safety requirements will be met on a timely basis, according to the report, which was prepared by a department team sent in to inspect Fernald for compliance with environmental laws and regulations.  The team, which completed its inspection Aug. 25, also found that the facility's method of establishing safety and operating standards doesn't live up to Energy Department requirements.  Fernald, about 18 miles from Cincinnati, processes uranium used in producing nuclear weapons.  In July, the plant's contractor ordered the facility closed temporarily to focus resources on meeting environmental regulations.  Energy Secretary James Watkins said the report, which includes 47 specific findings, "makes a strong statement about areas where both DOE and its contractor must improve to keep pace with today's requirements."  In response to the report, he has ordered department officials and Westinghouse Materials Co. of Ohio, which operates Fernald, to develop a plan to address the deficiencies.  The plan is due Oct. 20.  He is also ordering additional health and safety experts to be sent to Fernald.  Westinghouse Materials is a unit of Westinghouse Electric Corp.  The department plans to inspect 35 nuclear plants.  The report on Fernald is the first to be issued publicly.  Fernald already has been cited for a range of health and safety violations, and the plant has reached agreements with state and federal agencies to improve environmental and health practices.  The Energy Department, which owns the plant, recently agreed to pay $73 million to settle a lawsuit filed by area residents who alleged environmental damage and related health problems.  The Securities and Exchange Commission accounting staff said banks won't have to automatically write down to market value debtor-country loans restructured under some of the options in Treasury Secretary Nicholas Brady's debt-reduction plan.  Observers said the decision could help give breathing space to banks to offer new lending to debt-laden developing countries.  Bankers could be under heavy pressure from shareholders not to offer new loans after taking big write-downs.  On the other hand, the practice may let banks hide continuing loan problems.  Under the proposed settlement, whose final details were worked out last night, banks were given three basic options: cutting interest payments, reducing debt principal, or making new loans.  The first two options are new initiatives in the debt crisis, and it has been unclear exactly how the government would say accounting for them would be handled.  The SEC accounting staff said that debt swaps in which principal or interest is reduced should be treated as modifications to existing loan agreements.  The bank would have to recognize a loss only if the total future cash receipts specified by the new terms of the loan are less than the book value of the loan.  If the cash receipts, including receipts designated as both principal and interest, equal or exceed the book value, no loss needs to be recognized.  Cash receipts in these calculations would be the actual dollars received over, say, the 30-year term of the loans envisioned in the Mexican plan.  There would be no adjustment for inflation.  Thus, it seems unlikely that even deep reductions in principal or interest would cause huge write-downs, because 30 years of interest payments added to principal probably would exceed current book value.  "One could take the position that this is an exchange transaction: one asset for another," said Edmund Coulson, chief accountant of the SEC.  Under accounting rules, that would require the loans to be marked down to market value.  But Mr. Coulson said the transactions envisioned in the Mexican settlement "pretty clearly" fall into the category of a "troubled debt restructuring."  Nevertheless, other accounting rules could force the loans to be marked down in some circumstances -- for instance, if a bank doesn't plan to hold a loan to maturity.  "And this doesn't relieve auditors and banks of the responsibility to make sure {loan-loss} reserves are adequate," Mr. Coulson said.  According to the SEC staff position, outlined in a letter to the Treasury, banks also must disclose such things as the amount of loans that have been restructured, the interest that would have been recorded at the original terms, and commitments to make additional loans to the same debtor.  Mike Moran, a banking partner at Peat Marwick Main & Co. in New York, said the SEC's position could make it easier for bankers to offer new loans.  If banks were forced into large write-downs, they "couldn't lend additional funds because they'd be afraid of litigation" on behalf of shareholders arguing that would be bad business, he said.  Mr. Moran said the accounting decision "may help in the short term.  Over the long term -- I don't know.  The real issue is whether these transactions start to resolve the problem."  The SEC's accounting staff took a different view of debt swaps arranged last year by J.P. Morgan & Co. and Mexico.  Under those swaps, Mexico offered commercial banks $10 billion in marketable Mexican securities in return for the forgiving of loans.  The SEC's accounting experts said those loans had to be marked down to market value because the banks weren't holding the loans to maturity.  Yesterday, a Treasury spokesman said, "We welcome the clarification by the SEC of their accounting and disclosure requirements and believe it will clear up any uncertainties that may exist."  National Heritage Inc. and Southmark Corp. said an Atlanta Superior Court judge lifted restraining orders preventing the two companies from taking actions that the other opposes.  As a result, Southmark said it plans to deliver consents solicited from shareholders allowing it to oust National Heritage's board.  And National Heritage, an operator of nursing homes and retirement centers, said it will try to proceed with a restructuring that calls for it to spin off its two main business units into two companies, to be owned by its current shareholders.  Southmark, a troubled real estate and thrift concern that owns 62.5% of National Heritage, has opposed National Heritage's restructuring.  Southmark has been soliciting consents from holders of two-thirds of National Heritage's shares to change National Heritage's method of electing board members and to replace the board with Southmark nominees.  The Atlanta judge also ruled that National Heritage's Aug. 31 annual meeting has ended and doesn't have to be reconvened.  American Telephone & Telegraph Co. said it was awarded a $40 million, four-year contract to provide communications services to Allied-Signal Inc.  New York-based AT&T said it would provide a voice and data network connecting all Allied-Signal divisions in about 300 locations.  Allied-Signal said the network would consolidate services that were previously provided by AT&T and other long-distance companies, and would result in cost reductions.  AT&T, a telecommunications giant, already provides international service to Allied-Signal.  The contract calls for use of a billing system that will allow Allied-Signal to track or bill expenses at different levels.  Allied-Signal, based in Morris Township, N.J., is a technology company with businesses in aerospace, automotive products and engineered materials.  ELECTRONIC DATA TECHNOLOGIES said its public offering of 1,083,478 of its common shares at $11.25 each is under way.  The offering includes the sale of some one million shares by International Game Technology, lowering that company's stake in Electronic Data Technologies to 50% from 77%.  Another shareholder is selling 43,000 shares, and about 40,000 new shares are included in the offering.  Electronic Data has 3.7 million common shares outstanding.  The company couldn't state why Las Vegas-based International Gaming was selling some of its shares, and International Gaming officers couldn't be reached to comment.  Electronic Data, which designs, develops and makes computerized systems for the gaming industry, said Raymond James & Associates Inc. will manage the underwriters.  OVER-THE-COUNTER stock trading gets more regulatory scrutiny.  State and federal regulators step up surveillance, but critics point out the large universe of unlisted stocks offers plenty of shadowy corners for hiding.  A recent report indicated the number of completed state probes jumped by 51% from 1987 to 1988.  "The penny stock investigation might have to be done all over again in a couple of years unless it's followed up with more money and more people keeping a constant vigil," says Lipper's Perrin Long.  Meanwhile, the National Association of Securities Dealers, the industry watchdog, considers initiating collection procedures for fines it levies against miscreants who simply walk away from the business.  To help investors, the NASD carries data on 450,000 broker-dealers and salespeople, answering written inquiries about any disciplinary actions.  So far, the NASD inquiry service has 10,000 requests.  Investors get two inquiries hits per quarter; others cost $20.  And, most state regulators will provide a broker's disciplinary history on the phone.  Several states consider going after top salespeople as well as principals to stamp out "boiler rooms."  GRIDIRON GATE: Cardinals' ticket prices are clipped; others keep running.  The Phoenix Cardinals nearly double the number of cheap ($15) seats to 6,500.  The move effectively trims the average ticket price to $36 from $38.  "People had the misconception you couldn't buy a ticket for our games," says a spokesman.  This year, Phoenix sells about 40,000 season tickets, down from about 55,000 in 1988.  But the New England Patriots (under new owner and Remington chief Victor Kiam) raise the tariff.  Choice 50-yard-line seats jump 30% to $43; the cheapest tickets rise about 20%.  Why are prices climbing?  "It sure wasn't because we won a lot of games," admits Jack Ragsdale, head of ticket sales for the Atlanta Falcons.  About 85% of the seats in Atlanta's Fulton County Stadium sell for $20, up from $17 last year.  And the Jets and the Giants still charge New York prices even though they play in New Jersey these days.  Both teams up prices by a couple of dollars to the mid-20s.  The Los Angeles Raiders hike the tab on the most costly seats to $30 from $28.  Most stadiums curb beer sales and the brew is banned altogether at Giants, Jets and Buffalo Bills night games.  MONEY CAN'T BUY the kind of credibility these "news" services provide.  Quaker's Gatorade has its Sports Science Institute, Reebok its Aerobic Information Bureau and Nutri/System operates the Health and Fitness Information Bureau.  The "marrying of a company's interest and consumers' interest" isn't new, but it's on the rise, says John Paluszek, head of the Public Relations Society of America.  The popularity of bite-size newspaper items fuels demand.  Mr. Paluszek says the credibility gained by having a firm's material judged newsworthy by a "gatekeeper" editor is "very valuable."  Cereal-makers are among the most prolific practitioners of ersatz news.  Health-care firms aren't far behind.  Last year Kellogg launched "Project Nutrition," which featured a cholesterol-lowering contest; this summer an offshoot program promotes "healthy hearts" among children.  The Chlor-Trimeton Allergy Season Index has been measuring pollen counts since 1984.  The Reebok items -- snippets on fast-walking and the like -- reap 130 to 150 news clippings a month.  DEAR CHAIRMAN: Only half the individual investors polled by Hill & Knowlton read the management discussion part of their annual reports.  TWO LEATHER DRESSES or 250 pairs of socks can be bought for $1,250 -- the average amount spent on clothes last year, according to a R.H. Bruskin Associates survey of adults earning $40,000 and more.  FINALLY, A USE for Susan B. Anthony dollars: a New York-to-New Jersey subway accepts the coins at a few turnstiles and issues them as change for $5.  SMALLER "WASHLOADS" are target of rules to thwart money launderers.  Starting tomorrow, the Treasury can zero in on a specific geographic area and require that every bank and financial institution report all cash transactions.  The new rule, tied to the Anti-Drug Abuse Act of 1988, takes the pursuit of money launderers into personal and small business banking.  Targeted amounts (theoretically from $1 on up) and areas (a state, county, city or few blocks) are up to the government.  Now, banks are required to report cash transactions of $10,000 or more.  Banks, which originally opposed the rule, ask that the Treasury review its usefulness after a year, says John Byrne, counsel for the American Bankers group.  The sweeps could cover small dealings, like buying traveler's checks for the family vacation, to large cash dealings by high-turnover firms that are now exempt, like retailers and fast-food chains.  Another proposal: A log of each time a customer buys traveler's checks or the like for as little as $3,000.  "Targeting could potentially be the most dramatic change" for banks in tracking launderers, says Mr. Byrne.  BRIEFS: Anti-takeover laws now exist in 39 states, creating a de facto national policy, says a book from the Investor Responsibility Research Center. . . .  The U.S. ranks worst in a Gallup spelling survey testing adults in four English-speaking countries, says Franklin Computer, which makes electronic language and spelling aids.  Bribing regulators.  Doctoring records.  Falsifying product samples.  The generic-drug industry is being pelted with one horrendous headline after another.  So what is Wall Street telling the queasy investors that hold shares in generic-drug makers?  In essence, "Don't worry.  Take two aspirin and call me in a few years."  "The investigations may be the best thing that could have happened to the industry," contends Hemant Shah, an independent analyst in Warren, N.J.  The spate of troubling disclosures, Mr. Shah reasons, will lead to tighter surveillance of the generic industry.  This in turn will give the public more confidence "that what's left on the market are high-quality products."  Despite the scandal, he and other industry followers expect generic-drug sales to continue to explode, perhaps doubling in five years to about $4 billion annually.  "By 1995, some of the most widely used drugs will be out in generic form," Mr. Shah predicts.  "And the pressure to use the lower-priced generics will be even more irresistible than today."  Even as publicity from several government investigations is savaging the industry's reputation, analysts are concluding that there isn't any drop-off in sales.  Of the estimated 300 generic-drug makers, only four companies and their subsidiaries have been charged with fraud or potentially fraudulent activities.  And although the U.S. Food and Drug Administration did say that a review of 13 companies turned up 11 with some manufacturing and record-keeping problems, an FDA staffer notes that the agency regularly snares such problems in inspections of brand-name companies, too.  Halfway through sampling the potency of 30 top-selling generic drugs in the marketplace, the FDA has found that less than 1% of roughly 1,000 lots tested haven't passed muster, an FDA spokesman says.  To be sure, a number of professional investors advise giving generic-drug-company stocks a wide berth in view of the spreading scandal.  But followers of the pharmaceutical business say the current hubbub is likely to subside before long, after regulatory reforms and perhaps the expulsion of some shady businessmen.  Alas, securities analysts who track the dozen or so publicly traded generic-drug companies say the very best scandal-free industry performers aren't available to investors because they are owned by big drug concerns or are closely held, such as Rugby Laboratories, which has about $500 million in annual revenue.  Little-known Rugby's generic products account for about 8% of U.S. pharmacy sales in terms of unit volume, compared with 3.4% for Merck.  Of the public companies, Mr. Shah likes Bolar Pharmaceutical, even though its shares have fallen 31% in a month, reflecting the FDA's threat to ban its version of the big-selling, anti-hypertensive drug Dyazide.  For one thing, market data indicate that despite the FDA's threat, sales of Bolar's generic Dyazide are exploding, running at about $50 million for the year, largely because the product is priced at about half the brand-name version.  Also, Bolar owns 50% of the marketing rights to a non-generic new drug, Eldepryl, that was just released for treating Parkinson's disease.  The drug could generate $120 million in annual sales, Mr. Shah predicts.  He recommends Mylan Laboratories because it shares the rights to Eldepryl.  The analyst is generally unimpressed with prospects for other companies until 1991, when patents begin expiring for a slew of big-selling drugs.  For then, he suggests a "package" of companies that survive the scandal.  David Saks, an analyst with Wedbush Morgan, doesn't recommend waiting.  He also likes Mylan because of Eldepryl, as well as three smaller companies: Biocraft Laboratories, Halsey Drugs and Duramed Pharmaceuticals.  Biocraft, Mr. Saks says, is especially appealing because the company is becoming "one of the lowest-cost producers of generic antibiotics," having recently opened a state-of-the-art manufacturing facility.  Because of several new products, including a generic version of Merck's heart drug Moduretic, Mr. Saks says Biocraft earnings in the fiscal year ending March 30 will rebound from a depressed fiscal 1989, doubling to about $1.20 a share.  Halsey, a tiny company with $18 million in sales in 1988, is a "consistent performer with a large number of small-sized products that sell well in the New York area," Mr. Saks says.  He is projecting that per-share earnings this year will rise about 42% to 34 cents.  And Duramed is expected to post a strong profit, following last year's loss, Mr. Saks says, noting that the company also has completed a $14 million, 2.3 million-share sale that erased some debt. ---  One Price Clothing Stores blamed hot weather for a sudden sales drop that will push third-quarter earnings below expectations.  The stock fell 14% yesterday, sliding 2 1/2 to 14 3/4.  Bears say the company has other problems.  Sales at existing stores fell 4.2% in the latest quarter (although overall sales are up because the chain keeps opening new stores.) The stock sells at more than 20 times estimated 1989 earnings, even after yesterday's decline.  That's the argument from the short-sellers, who sell borrowed stock and thus will profit if the price declines.  The stock's boosters call the bad news a buying opportunity.  "I would be a buyer at 15 and below," says Fred E. Wintzer Jr., an analyst with Alex.  Brown & Co. (Alex.  Brown has an underwriting relationship with One Price.) "The time to buy the stock has been when they had a little problem like this."  He thinks same-store sales will snap back, and argues that most specialty clothing retailers sell for a high multiple of earnings.  One Price, based in Duncan, S.C., sells close-out merchandise, with all items priced at $6. (Some are marked down to two for $6 or three for $6.) It said that unusually hot weather in its nine-state Southeast region has hurt sales of its fall clothes, especially "fleece and wool skirts" in late August and early September.  Third-quarter profit, it said, will fall "significantly below" analysts' estimates of 15 cents to 17 cents a share.  Short-sellers also like to talk about insider selling that has taken place this year.  Three of the retailer's major shareholders did sell some shares, but the sales represented only a small percentage of holdings for Chairman Henry D. Jacobs Jr. and for Secretary J. Randall Groves.  Raymond S. Waters, executive vice president and treasurer, sold 100,000 shares this spring and 20,000 shares Aug. 25.  The 65-year-old Mr. Waters said the earlier sales were for estate-planning reasons, and the August sale was to finance a house he's building.  The August sale, he said, was made before he or other executives became aware of the abrupt sales decline.  Mr. Waters still holds some 244,000 shares, and says he is "upbeat" on the company's prospects.  -- John R. Dorfman  ---  What's an actuary?  Someone who flunked the personality test to become an accountant.  Jokes like this tend to irritate the nation's actuaries, who spend their time figuring out the risk that a thing will happen and how much it will cost if it does.  So now, 100 years after the first actuary appeared in North America, the actuary profession has hired a public-relations firm and surveyed its members on what they expect to happen in the stock market by the year 2000.  The actuarial collective wisdom is as breathtaking as one might expect.  Some 94% of the actuaries went out on a limb to predict the Dow Jones Industrial Average will top 3000, meaning the Dow average will have to climb roughly 11% over the next 11 years.  Some 38% thought 4000 on the Dow was possible by the end of the century.  On the downside, 65% said the Dow average will touch 2000 by 2000.  Nearly half the 446 actuaries surveyed expect a market crash in which stock prices drop more than 30%; such a collapse would be more severe than Oct. 19, 1987, when the Dow average fell less than 23%.  But 52% said a crash was unlikely to spark a depression.  -- James A. White  Japanese steel makers produced a total of 8.8 million metric tons in August, up 2.3% from a year ago, the Japan Iron and Steel Federation said.  Crude-steel products rose 3.9% from a year ago, while production of speciality-steel products fell 5%.  August's growth followed July's 2.8% year-on-year rise in all categories, when output was 9.2 million metric tons.  August's year-to-year rise was the sixth consecutive gain in as many months.  A federation spokesman said growth in production of ordinary steel was because of vigorous domestic demand from major users like construction industry, car manufacturers and machinery makers.  The average estimate of Britain's gross domestic product rose a revised 4.4% in 1988 from 1987, compared with a previous estimate of a 3.7% rise, the Central Statistical Office said.  The latest figures are contained in the office's 1989 "Blue Book," an annual report which gives the latest annual estimates of national income, expenditure and output and of financial transactions during the past 10 years.  The estimate is the average of the output-based, income-based and expenditure-based measures of GDP.  It is seasonally adjusted and calculated at 1985 prices.  The upward revision in the 1988 GDP figure reflects new information and the introduction of statistical adjustments to the expenditure measure of GDP.  Pre-payment of loans led to a decline in Malaysia's foreign debt at the end of 1988, but the prepayment also caused a balance of payments deficit.  The national news agency Bernama said the Statistics Department reported that as a result of the government's policy to retire high-cost loans early, and the strict control on new borrowings, external debt outstanding fell in 1988 to 25.46 billion ringgit ($9.42 billion) from 27.63 billion ringgit at the end of 1987.  Standard & Poor's Corp. said it added shares of Ryan's Family Steak Houses Inc. to its 500-stock index.  Ryan's, a Greenville, S.C., restaurant operator, replaces Cullinet Software Inc., Westwood, Mass., which was acquired.  The thousands of East Germans pouring into Bavaria are reshaping Europe's economic landscape as well as its political structures.  The most profound consequences fall within West Germany, the new homeland for about 100,000 emigrants expected to arrive this year from East Germany, as well as for some 350,000 ethnic Germans expected to stream in from elsewhere in the Communist bloc.  But because West Germany is Europe's largest economy and a major creditor for its allies, the economic ripple effects will likely travel far.  The dam-burst of emigrants has upset myriad assumptions about the West German economy.  As a result, economists are in the process of revising forecasts to take into account the influx.  The changed outlook entails higher economic growth than was previously assumed, which is regarded as positive for both West Germany and its trading partners.  But the future may be clouded by the prospect of higher inflation, and lower German investment in other nations.  "We've increased our forecasts somewhat," says Norbert Walter, economist with Deutsche Bank AG in Frankfurt.  The waves of young, well-trained East Germans, essentially arriving without worldly possessions but expected to get jobs quickly, harbinger a consumer-spending push that's likely to extend West Germany's current economic boom.  Mr. Walter predicts that the economy will grow 4% this year and at least 3% in 1990.  "The influx is adding strength," he said.  As the East bloc arrivals earn and consume more, the effects will carry well into the next decade.  "There was an underlying assumption that the German economy would grow at about 2.7% in the 1990s," said Krafft Holtz, head of Euroeconomics, a forecasting and consulting firm based in London.  "That should be increased.  You'll see a growth pattern of the economy rising by about 3.3%, at least through the early 1990s."  By extending the growth phase of the West German economic cycle, the emigration wave may lock in another trend that economists consider to be healthy: syncopated economic cycles.  As the U.S. and British economies slow down, the German economy -- and closely tied European economies -- stays robust, keeping the world out of a collective slump.  The expected surge in West Germany's domestic demand will also help shrink world trade imbalances.  For years, the U.S., which runs a huge trade deficit, and various international organizations, have been jawboning West Germany to step up domestic consumption and shrink its current-account surplus, which totaled 85.2 billion marks last year ($42.8 million).  A consumption boom could do that.  Deutsche Bank's Mr. Walter estimates that next year, as the new arrivals purchase more clothing, durable goods and household products, imports will shoot up 7%.  The risk is that the rally will turn into a binge.  Perennially fretful of inflation, the West German Bundesbank would be expected to raise interest rates to cool the economy off.  That could force other European nations to increase their base rates to avoid a slide in their own currencies relative to the mark.  In the case of Britain, where base rates already stand at 14%, another increase could shove the economy into a recession.  The new West Germans, 32% of whom are under 18, mitigate another national problem -- a graying population.  Showing one of the world's lowest birth rates, West Germany faces a growing proportion of citizens over 65 and a shrinking population of younger people still active in the work force.  According to some demographic estimates, West Germany can expect nearly 30% of its population to be 65 or older by the year 2040.  "It could remedy many of the structural, long-term demographic instabilities," says Robin Mitra, an analyst with Salomon Brothers in London.  Mr. Holtz predicts that by 1995, West Germany's population could rise to 65 million, instead of dropping below 60 million, as was predicted before the deterioration in Eastern bloc countries spurred mass emigrations.  Its 1989 population has been estimated at 60.2 million.  West German economics minister Helmut Haussmann said in a statement earlier this week that the emigrants will bring "additional burdens on public finances" initially.  Outside the flood of relatively well-trained East Germans, many of the ethnic Germans arrive with a poor command of the language and few marketable skills.  They will require considerable training before they can be absorbed in the economy.  Moreover, the fact that the West German population will be growing instead of shrinking will likely force new investments in roads, water services and power plants.  Heavier investment at home will probably mean that the West Germans will have less money to invest in other countries.  With high exports driving up the German current-account surpluses, West Germany is one of the world major creditors, pushing up investment in allied European nations.  With more projects seeking funds at home, this pattern could change also.  ---  Terence Roth in Frankfurt contributed to this article.  Jaguar PLC posted a precipitous decline in pretax profit for the first six months to #1.4 million ($2.2 million) from #22.5 million.  The U.K. luxury car maker said earnings were hurt by a decline in U.S. sales, adverse currency factors, and a #35.2 million depreciating charge.  These factors were partly offset by improvements in cost efficiency, the company said.  The results were below analysts' expectations, which averaged around #7 million.  The loss after tax and minority interests was #1.1 million compared with profit of #13.4 million, when per-share earnings were 7.4 pence.  Jaguar left its interim dividend unchanged at 3.7 pence.  Sales climbed 3% to #553.6 million from #537 million.  The company reported an operating loss of #2.8 million, compared with profit of #18 million.  LTV Corp. will pay the federal government $29 million to settle claims that the company defrauded an Education Department student-loan program, the Justice Department said.  Under the settlement, approved yesterday by a federal bankruptcy judge here, the government will drop a pending lawsuit against LTV over the alleged student-loan fraud, the Justice Department said.  Dallas-based LTV, which is in bankruptcy-law proceedings, previously contested the fraud claims.  Officials with the company couldn't be reached for comment yesterday.  In its lawsuit, the government had alleged that LTV "defrauded the government through systematic and pervasive abuse of the Federally Insured Student Loan Program between 1969 and 1975," the Justice Department said in a prepared statement.  The government had alleged that LTV provided illegal financial inducements to several Texas banks to assure that the banks would make federally insured student loans.  In a related criminal action, LTV had earlier pleaded "no contest" to charges of abusing the federal student-loan program and paid aggregate fines of $500,000, the Justice Department said.  American Home Products Corp. said it will sell its South African interests, consisting of its Wyeth-Ayerst Pty. subsidiary and two related entities to a group of South African investors.  Terms weren't disclosed.  The New York maker of food, drug and household products said licensing and supply agreements will be in effect for a limited time to allow for a smooth changeover.  The sale is subject to the approval of South African authorities.  Wyeth-Ayerst, a pharmaceutical company, was American Home's last holding in South Africa.  Including Wyeth-Ayerst, American Home has sold four companies in South Africa since 1984.  "This was just a direction we'd been moving in for some time," a company spokeswoman said.  Live Entertainment Inc. has replaced the law firm it retained to investigate the murder of its chairman, Jose Menendez, following a report in this newspaper that the firm had a potential conflict of interest.  Live, a distributor of audio and video entertainment, said the law firm of Paul, Weiss, Rifkind, Wharton & Garrison was being replaced on the investigation by the firm of Kaye, Scholer, Fierman, Hays & Handler.  Live also announced that 1989 per-share earnings "may be somewhat below analyst estimates" of $1.70 to $1.75.  The company declined to elaborate.  In 1988, Live earned $17.5 million, or $3.22 a share.  Live is 49%-owned by Carolco Inc., which finances, produces and leases movies.  Yesterday, Live's stock fell $1.125 to $14.875 in national over-the-counter trading.  Roger Smith, Live's acting president and chief operating officer, said the law-firm change came largely because of a Sept. 5 story in The Wall Street Journal raising questions about a possible conflict of interest.  Mr. Smith said that while neither Live nor Paul Weiss believes there actually is a conflict "we want to remove anything that might be an appearance of a conflict."  Paul Weiss's potential conflict involves Morris Levy, a record-industry executive.  Last year, the law firm represented Mr. Levy, in his unsuccessful defense of extortion charges in a New Jersey federal court.  Live recently bought the Strawberries chain of record stores from Mr. Levy.  That purchase attracted attention in the wake of the Menendez killing because of Mr. Levy's alleged organized-crime ties.  An FBI affidavit filed in New York federal court identifies Mr. Levy as a longtime "lucrative source of cash and property for leaders of the Genovese" crime family.  The affidavit also quotes an unidentified informant as saying that Strawberries was partly owned by a faction of the Genovese family.  In the Journal's Sept. 5 story, Mr. Levy said his attorney had sent a letter to Paul Weiss charging that "a conflict of interest exists" if the Live internal investigaton includes Mr. Levy's former company.  Mr. Levy, who has consistently denied any links to organized crime, remains free pending an appeal of his conviction. 